Craig Brandist

Gramsci, Bakhtin and the Semiotics of Hegemony
Antonio Gramsci and Mikhail Bakhtin were very different types of thinkers. While the former spent the 1920s maximally involved in the Italian revolutionary movement as leader of the Communist Party, the latter, living in Petrograd at the time of the revolution and throughout the second half of the 1920s, reflected on the experience in religious and philosophical rather than political ways. In the 1930s, while Gramsci languished in Mussolini's prison, theorizing the process by which the revolutionary party could achieve hegemony and seize political power, Bakhtin was internally exiled in Kazakhstan where he taught in an obscure pedagogical institute and wrote erudite essays on the anti-hegemonic potentialities of the novel in the cultural arena. At first glance little appears to promise a productive comparison. Yet when one looks more closely, continuities of theme, approach and theoretical heritage abound, suggesting a more widespread and deeper meeting of Marxism and idealist philosophies of language than has hitherto been acknowledged. Out of the respective critiques of positivist-dominated social science and romantic aesthetics emerges a strikingly similar pragmatist recasting of the Marxist theory of ideology which anticipates many of the themes of contemporary post-structuralism while embedding the realm of ideas firmly in the social practice of different social groups.

While Gramsci was involved with the Turin factory council movement and studying historical linguistics at Turin University, Bakhtin and his friends, who included Valentin Voloshinov and Pavel Medvedev, were involved in the revolutionary artistic scene and studying neo-Kantian philosophy in the Byelorussian towns of Nevel and Vitebsk. Though usually sleepy provincial places, the civil war took place in close proximity and the radical artistic movement, which included Chagall, and Malevich, had transformed these towns into centres of artistic experi-me nt and intellectual debate. The major intellectual influences on Gramsci at this time were the work of the Italian idealist philosopher Benedetto Croce and the Marxism of the Third International, while for Bakhtin, Husserlian phenomenology and the work of the Jewish neo-Kantian Hermann Cohen played major roles. By the mid 1920s, however, both Gramsci and the Bakhtin school had identified language and ideology as objects of analysis and were attempting to forge a Marxist 94

theory of ideology and its relationship to language. The crucial conceptual link was an encounter with the works of Saussure through the neolinguistics of Gramsci’s research supervisor Matteo Bartoli and the works of the Russian Formalists respectively. In each case language was seen to be a social given which structured consciousness, demanding a reconsideration of the idealist conception of consciousness common to both neo-Hegelian and neo-Kantian philosophy.

Gramsci had become dissatisfied with the Crocean conception of language after the 1923 Education Act, following Croce’s contention that a normative grammar was impossible, made no provision for the teaching of normative Italian. The result was, according to Gramsci, the reinforcement of class divisions by leaving the ‘subaltern classes' illiterate and trapped within provincial dialects: ‘Thus we are going back to a division into juridically fixed and crystallized estates rather than moving towards the transcendence of class divisions.'1 This was, however, quite the opposite of what Croce had intended. In his enormously influential Aesthetic as Science of Expression and General Linguistic (1902) Croce had slammed positivist social science and linguistics for their elitism, noting that ‘among the principal reasons which have prevented Aesthetic, the science of art, from revealing the true nature of art, its real roots in human nature, has been its separation from the general spiritual life, the having made of it a sort of special function or aristocratic club’.1 2 Art and language needed to be identified, they are the creative self expression of the individual and the national-popular masses and as such cannot be subject to the abstract schemas of grammarians, which serve to limit and restrict popular creativity. Language, for Croce, was the flow of unique intuition-expressions, ceasing to exist outside works of art. Every utterance is a work of art, for ‘the limits of the expression-intuitions that are called art, as opposed to those that are vulgarly called non-art, are empirical, and impossible to define.’3 Through the expressive objectivization of impressions, that is artistic activity, mankind liberates itself, raising itself above those impressions and driving away passivity. Grammar, on the other hand, stresses language as ‘isolated and combinable words, not in living discourse, in expressive organisms, rationally indivisible.'4

A Historical Science

This combination of Romantic philosophy and egalitarian politics was very attractive to those, like Gramsci, who sought to break out of the deterministic laws of Social Darwinism and Second International Marxism, but the reactionary adoption of Croce’s philosophy now demanded a significant reformulation of the problem. This was being undertaken by Bartoli, who had developed a ‘spatial’ analysis of language that owed a lot to Saussure's langue, and sought to trace how ‘a dominant speech community exerted prestige over contiguous, subordinate communities’. With this move, Gramsci argued, linguistics became a historical science, charting the flow of innovations from the prestigious langue to the receiving one. Bartoli was, however, unable to develop his observations beyond the cataloguing of innovations, and turned to the ‘intellectually repugnant' idealist Bertoni to develop a methodology. Neolinguistics was, however, dependent only on ‘historicism in general', with no special reliance on Crocism, and was thus capable of being developed on a Marxist base.5 This had to be developed through a critical engagement with Crocism, and particularly with reference to the works of the German philologist Karl Vossler, who shared significant common ground with both Croce and Bartoli.

Croce's romantic populism was also very close to the dominant production aesthetic of the Russian avant-garde which, especially in the works of Andre Bely and the Futurists, viewed art as the absolute adversary of positivism. The so-called zaum (trans-rational) poetic movement in particular aspired to the creation of an absolute ‘language in the making' that could never be fixed in print, hence the slogan of the Cubo-Futurists, ‘After reading tear to pieces'.6 Aesthetic activity and cultural artefacts were treated as antipodes that parallel the bifurcation of language into energeia, vital, living discourse, and ergon, the static system of grammatical rules, now finding its modern expression in Saussure's langue. In developing this absolute poetic discourse, the poet would be able to raise the speech of the masses to new heights, releasing their expressive potential and forging a new communal culture, what the Symbolist Ivanov called sobornost. To some extent Bakhtin's early work can be seen as a phenomenological investigation of this process, examining how the author recontextualizes the intention of the hero, and in so doing co-nse-crates the existence of that hero. Without the aesthetic activity of the author, the hero would be condemned to live in a stream of consciousness the meaning and significance of which would remain shrouded in a thick fog. By recontextualizing the intention of the hero, the author reveals the connectedness of the utterance to the immediate situation or event and, beyond this, the interconnectedness and open-endedness of human development. When cultural products are isolated from the purposeful activity of life then that culture will develop immanently according to impersonal, logical laws reminiscent of Social Darwinism.7 Thus those doctrines which treat the ergon of culture apart from the energeia of the creative process are not only mistaken but also dangerous.

It is not surprising, therefore, that the Bakhtin school should react with such hostility to the Saussurean system which stressed the autonomous system of signs as the key factor in structuring social consciousness. The terms of the Saussurean claim to the ground occupied by phenomenology were diametrically opposed to the thrust of Bakhtin's philosophy and the expressive aesthetic of the avant-garde. The society described by Saussure's langue, as Hirschkop notes, is ‘a bureaucratized world . . . in which every subject behaves according to formal rules, to be obeyed without reference to ends, values or mitigating circumstances',8 while Formalist critics, at least initially, responded to Saussure's linguistics by rigorously separating the literary and wider social spheres, device and motivation. Consequently, stylistic and ideological factors were treated as autonomous spheres which, like the arbitrarily coincident signifier and signified, had no necessary connection. Poetic ‘defamiliarization', as Medvedev noted, nihilistically strove to destroy the already established connection, or meaning, without establishing a new, positive meaning.9 The absolute discourse for which the Symbolists and zaumniki strove, revealing the creative process in language was, according to this account, a hedonistic play of the signifier revealing the relativity of language. The traditional demand of the Russian intelligentsia that literature should ‘teach us how to live', (that is, to pervade our being, to affect our deepest impulses and our most intimate reactions; to shape our sensibility; to transform and organize our vision—and thus ultimately to affect our whole behaviour',10 11 was now abandoned in favour of (tickling our sensibility and providing us with pleasurable sensations'. The only other alternative was the development of an ideologically didactic literature of the sort advocated by the theorists of proletarian culture and later demanded by the state in the form of ‘Socialist Realism'. These two poles, the two (capital sins' that result from inability (to transform',11 were now legitimized with unrivalled cogency by the Saussurean account of language. By the late 1920s both directions were becoming politically unacceptable to Bakhtin's group.

These political factors impelled the Bakhtin school to directly confront the works of Saussure, and to do so meant an engagement with the romantic philosophies of language developed by Croce and Vossler. As representatives of the Europe-wide movement against positivism in the human sciences, these theorists proved valuable allies, and had been drawn upon by a large number of idealist philosophers in Russia in the early part of the century.12 The chief encounter can be found in Voloshi-nov's 1929 book Marxism and the Philosophy of Language which the author presents as an attempt to develop an area of Marxist theory dominated by ‘the category of mechanistic causality' and ‘the still unsurmounted positivistic conception of empirical data—a reverence for "fact" understood not in a dialectical sense but as something fixed and stable'.13 In effect, Marxism was contaminated by the very elements that, the book goes on to show, constituted the Saussurean conception of language. Gramsci similarly turned to the ideas of Croce to overcome the importation of mechanical materialism into Marxism under the name of Marxist orthodoxy, the most systematic exposition of which he found in Bukharin's The Theory of Historical Materialism (1921). For Gramsci, Croce had (translated the progressive acquisitions of the philosophy of praxis into speculative language and in this retranslation is the best of his thought'. The task now was ‘to redo for the philosophical conception of Croce the same reduction that the first theorists of the philosophy of praxis [Marx and Engels] did for the Hegelian conception',14

The first move, for Gramsci and the Bakhtin school alike, was to challenge Croce's romantic conception of the individual so that language is no longer individual artistic expression but ‘the “material" of art, a social product and the cultural expression of a given people'.15 Croce saw language in the same terms as Bakhtin characterized the Symbolist poet who ‘considers the word already aestheticized ... transforming it into a mythical or metaphysical entity’.16 Bakhtin's and Gramsci's critiques closely followed on from that of Vossler who had chided the Italian for his explication of the speaking subject apart from the linguistic environment. Croce's abstraction, argued Vossler, was akin to the Hegelian ‘Absolute Mind', ignoring the diversity of speech communities and thereby profoundly monologic:

Everything that is spoken on this globe in the course of the ages, therefore, must be thought of as a vast soliloquy spoken by the human mind, which unfolds itself in untold millions of persons and characters, and comes to itself again in their reunion. It follows from this that the human mind as such should be or become, a single person.17

The Crocean individual had to be abandoned in favour of the concept of person which, being indivisible from ‘persona' and ‘part', locates the speaker firmly within a specific speech community. The ‘person':

can claim some qualities of absolute mind and a certain unity; but this does not include the possibility of an infinite number of parts played by one person . . . Our desire for power and knowledge is essentially the same. It, too, yearns for the infinite, but is baulked and opposed by reality in a different way for everyone; for here also the concept of person with its claim to godlike unity in multiplicity is at work.18

The linguistic manifestation of this diversity is a multiplicity of styles at individual and national levels which interact through the mediation of translation: ‘Wherever and whenever we enter into the speech of someone else, or our own past speech, we are translating'.19 Croce had denied the possibility of translation, arguing that any attempt to render a meaning in another language was the production of another unique intuitionexpression, but Vossler now posed it as the essence of all human communication. This point is adopted in its entirety by Bakhtin's group, as Caryl Emerson notes in her preface to Bakhtin's famous Dostoyevsky study. For Bakhtin the boundaries of national languages were only one pole of the linguistic environment: ‘at the other extreme, translation processes were required for one social group to understand another in the same city, for children to understand parents in the same family, for one day to understand the next.’19 20

The Presence of Contradiction

The picture of the linguistic environment presented by Vossler, and adopted in modified form by Gramsci and Bakhtin, is not, however, as untroubled as Emerson suggests. Translation involves the transferral of the inner form of language, 'the tendency of mind towards a definite goal’, across the borders of outer form, where it becomes differently embodied in the receiving language. Moreover, the surety of meaning is disrupted by 'interest, that faithless and ever changing thing’ which comes between 'words and objects, between poetry and truth’ and undermines 'the whole permanence and the real value of languages'. As style coincides with world-view ('style and form tendencies coincide with the sentiment and meaning of the speakers7) each language is threatened by the others, compelling a language community to employ translation as a means of self-preservation. 'Taste’ stands guard over the boundaries of the language, binding man aesthetically just as sentiment binds him ethically, maintaining linguistic and thus ideological independence in the face of attempts to 'throttle' and dominate the community. While the inner form of language is present in all languages, a unifying (one might say centripetal) force impelling the word towards the extralinguistic object, the plurality of outer form and interest cuts across and interferes with this directedness. As a result language becomes a field of force where different interests, ideologies and styles contend.21

The extent of Vossler's influence on Bakhtin and Gramsci is rarely acknowledged. In shifting the Crocean identification of language and world-view to an analysis of style, Vossler implicitly acknowledged ideologies as existing in social, semiotic forms and defined by their relation to other competing ideologies. This is directly adopted by both Gramsci and Bakhtin's group in the late 1920s but reaccentuated so as to correlate with the sociological stratification of society as defined by Marxism. Vossler and the nineteenth-century philologist von Humboldt had recognised the philosophical significance of the diversity of languages but had seen language only as the expression of national spirit and the utterance as the expression of individual spirit; Bakhtin and Gramsci added the crucial extra dimension of social diversity. In doing this, however, both rejected the Marxian base and superstructure model in favour of the Hegelian reduction of the social whole to the expressions of a single essence interpreted, through Vossler (and ultimately von Humboldt), in terms of the inner form of language. For Gramsci, a determinate social group, thereby, has a conception of the world implicit in its social practice and which is manifested in the language it uses. In Bakhtin’s mature work dialogism, the relation between discourses, is taken to be the expression of this single essence, running throughout all social interaction and which the novel models. Heteroglossia, the socially stratified national language, is, however, subject to the power relations and hierarchy of society in which a dominant discourse imposes itself on others, presenting itself as universal and ideal. This skewing of the linguistic environment imposes different types of interaction between discourses such that ‘within a single nation', as Gramsci noted, ‘a new ruling class brings about alterations as a “mass", but the jargons of various professions, of specific societies, innovate in a molecular way.’22

The Saussurean langue, the unitary and normative grammatical structure of the national language, is therefore, as Bakhtin put it in 1934, ‘not something given [dan] but is always in essence posited [zadan]—and at every moment of its linguistic life it is opposed to the realities of het-eroglossia.’23 As Gramsci noted in rather different terminology:

Written ‘normative grammars' tend to embrace the entire territory of a nation and its total ‘linguistic volume', to create a unitary national linguistic conformism ...But it is obvious that someone who writes a normative grammar cannot ignore the history of the language of which he wishes to propose an ‘exemplary phase' as the 'only' one worthy to become, in an ‘organic' and ‘totalitarian' way, the ‘common' language of a nation in competition with other ‘phases' and types or schemes that already exist (connected to traditional developments or to inorganic and incoherent attempts of forces which . . . act continuously on the spontaneous ‘grammars' immanent in the language).24

These ‘ideologically saturated' styles or ‘grammars' thus relate to each other according to their position in the social structure. While the official, dominant language is systematically articulated through a matrix of institutional channels, the conceptions of ‘the people (the sum total of the instrumental and subaltern classes of every form of society that has so far existed)' is by necessity ‘discontinuous and limited to local social strata or local centres'. In this locality a certain ‘normative grammar' is established through ‘the reciprocal monitoring, reciprocal teaching and reciprocal “censorship" expressed in such questions as “What did you mean to say?", “What do you mean?", “Make yourself clearer", etc., and in mimicry and teasing.' These are often directed ‘in opposition . . . to “official" conceptions of the world' (or in a broader sense, the conceptions of the cultured parts of historically determinate societies) that have succeeded one another in the historical process25 and constitute linguistic folklore. The operations of this unofficial culture are exactly the same as Bakhtin characterizes in carnival culture, parodying and deflating the universalist pretensions of the official language and culture which, as Gramsci noted, remains ‘somewhat fossilized and pompous'. When official language approaches immediate reality and ‘tries to be informal it breaks up into so many refractions of the dialects'.26 After 1934 Bakhtin seeks to establish a continuum between this oppositional tendency in popular culture and that of the novel.

While an extraordinary conceptual convergence between the works of Bakhtin and Gramsci is clear, a difference in emphasis, and ultimately political principle, emerged in the late 1920s and early 1930s. This stemmed from the specific conditions in which the writers lived and to which they responded. In Gramsci's Italy, the fascist party had capitalized on the regional economic unevenness of the country which was (juridically fixed' by the absence of a universally utilized national language. The division of the national proletariat, and to a greater extent peasantry, into regional dialect areas obstructed the formation of a united, revolutionary class alliance of the sort that had facilitated the revolution in Russia. Thus the process whereby the revolutionary party could gain political hegemony was intimately tied up with the overcoming of linguistic provinciality which ‘creates friction . . . in the popular masses among whom local particularisms and phenomena of a narrow and provincial mentality are more tenacious than is believed.' Bakhtin, on the other hand, was less concerned with forming ‘hundreds and thousands of recruits, of the most disparate origins and mental preparation, into a homogenous army capable of moving and acting in a disciplined and united manner'27 than with popular resistance to the state's authoritarian imposition of a pattern of social development and accompanying ideological system. The Stalinist plan in many ways resembled the tyrannical shaping of society according to a bureaucratic schema legitimized with reference to the word of the divinely chosen tsar that had characterized the rule of, most notably, Peter 1.28 Furthermore, the establishment and encodement of European literary languages, including Russian, in the eighteenth century and the secret imposition of ‘Socialist Realism' also found many fruitful parallels that permitted Bakhtin to plot a constellation between the cultural policy of feudal absolutism and modern Russia. The unified language thereby became a model of ‘the tyranny of abstract ideas and dogmas over life'.29

Aesthetics and Politics Redefined

Bakhtin's treatment of the question of unified language and of the relationship between poetry and the novel is one of the clearest modern examples of the disguising of political questions as cultural ones, typical of single-party dictatorships. As Gramsci noted, when the political function of a party is indirect, amounting to the exercise of ‘propaganda and public order, and moral and cultural influence', then political struggle is shifted to the sphere of art and culture generally. In the absence of ‘real, non-mystified political activity' to resolve social and political contradictions ‘the intelligentsia finds itself in constant ''chronic" opposition'30 to officialdom, like the novelist against the poet in the Bakhtinian scheme. From 1934 Bakhtin sees the novel as an aestheticized version of popular carnival, no longer limited to ‘islands' of popular holidays ‘or in the fluid realm of familiar speech' but intensified and systematized so that ‘official, serious culture'31 could no longer maintain a parallel and separate existence. Bringing official discourse into contact with ‘immediate reality', through narrative, facilitates its break-up into socially specific dialects; as it enters the realm of recontextualization and experiment the ideological structure, or in Vossler's terminology the ‘spirit of the language', is revealed. Carnival culture is, however, not so much counter-hegemonic as anti-hegemonic, at its extreme threatening the very concept of discursive truth, but always orientated against the fear-inspiring official, ruling stratum. Maximally tied to material reality, the peasantry of medieval Europe were maximally imbued with becoming, with the vital inner form of language, and thus spurned the crystallized official language in favour of a Dionysian anti-systematic revel. It takes the novelist to organize and systematize this popular critical impulse into an analytical organ that tests the validity of discourses against extra-discursive reality.

The authorial function, always endowed with a political significance, has now begun to sound like a fully-fledged political function. When the source of ideological difference has been located within the matrix of productive relations (which Voloshinov had established in the 1929 study of the philosophy of language), then attempts to complete and organize those ideologies into a whole looks very like political organization. Indeed the relations between author and hero, artist and society become distinctly reminiscent of the relation between the vanguard party and the working class in Lenin's formulation. This was certainly not overlooked by Gramsci, who applied the terms of Croce's aesthetics to the workings of the revolutionary party, and could scarcely have been overlooked by any members of the Bakhtin school:

Political intuition is not expressed through the artist, but through the ‘leader'; and ‘intuition' must be understood to mean not ‘knowledge of men', but swiftness in connecting seemingly disparate facts, and in conceiving the means adequate to particular ends——thus discovering the interests involved and arousing the passions of men and directing them towards a particular action. The ‘expression' of the ‘leader' is his ‘action'.32

Even in his earliest works Bakhtin sees aesthetic activity as expressing the connection between language and human purpose and capable of translating philosophical abstractions into ‘concretely obligating utter-ances'.33 Later, the novel is seen as dedicated to unmasking discourses as socially specific and interested and thereby debunking the authoritative claims of ruling discourse.

Thus where Gramsci recast aesthetic activity in terms of the relationship of the political party to the ‘common sense' of a nation, Bakhtin posed the relationship of author to the diversity of social discourses. In the Dostoyevsky study the author's own worldview, manifested in his language, is seen as less significant than his ‘form-shaping ideology', the way in which other discourses are approached and organized. Bakhtin sees a ‘monologic' approach taken by writers who simulate a struggle between discourses but in reality are only providing the means by which ‘his own direct or refracted word might ring out all the more energetically'.34 This Gramsci sees as constitutive of ‘bureaucratic centralism' in which the organization is ‘technically a policing organism, and its name of “political party” is simply a metaphor of a mythological character'.35 In each case here, any apparent dialogue and debate is merely a means for the acceptance of the perspective emanating from the centre; the result is known in advance, ‘all accents are gathered into a single voice'. In Dostoyevsky's ‘polyphonic' novel, however, the authorial design is the (most extreme activization of vari-directional accents in double voiced discourse' rather than the subordination of these to (the verbal and semantic dictatorship of a monologic, unified style and unified tone'.36 For Gramsci, similarly, a party is (progressive' when it functions according to (democratic centralism', keeping previously dominant forces (within the bounds of legality and [raising] the backward masses toward the level of the new legality'.37 Voices usually drowned beneath (louder', authoritative voices, are raised to an equal level where all compete freely according to their intrinsic merits rather than the authority they wield.

If each discourse articulates a world-view and discourses struggle to establish their superiority as a necessary corollary of the class struggle, then a discourse becomes hegemonic when one social class's world-view is accepted as kindred by other social classes. This does not mean the struggle for hegemony consists merely of a conflict between two preformed ideologies but a conflict of hegemonic principles. Discourses seek to bind other discourses to themselves according to two basic principles: either by establishing a relation of authority between the enclosing and target discourses or by facilitating the further advancement of the target discourse through the enclosing discourse. In (Discourse in the Novel' Bakhtin terms these hegemonic principles (authoritative discourse' and (internally persuasive' discourse respectively. The former:

[D]emands that we acknowledge it, that we make it our own; it binds us, quite independent of any power it might have to persuade us internally; we encounter it with its authority already fused to it. The authoritative word is located in the distanced zone, organically connected with a past that is felt to be hierarchically higher. It is, so to speak, the word of the fathers.38

This is termed the monologic and the poetic approach to another discourse. Behind the enclosing discourse lies a power that is is impossible to question, any independent ideological perspective is necessarily excluded. This is the mature form of Bakhtin’s ‘abstract whole' that operates at the expense of the specific, or what Nikolai Bachtin called the (Platonic attitude' in which 'perfection is conceived of as the liberation of the higher from the lower: a refusal to cooperate with it.' In the realm of the mixed 'we must consider as better that in which the positive imposes itself forcibly on the negative, subjugates it, conceals, reduces it to silence.' Plato's attitude is that of the intransigent reformer aiming to 'cut and reshape the living texture of reality—by force, from outside— according to some rigid and rigorous pattern.'

The other hegemonic principle is like the antithetical 'Aristotelian attitude' in which 'value is felt as inherent in reality, as the “indwelling" design which life strives to fulfil. The higher is not a mere negation and exclusion of the lower; it is a completion and fuller actualization of the lower.'39 In discursive terms this means raising the partial insights of another's voice to new levels, organizing the mixture that is everyday consciousness to facilitate new and productive verbal production and inspiring 'independent ideological life':

Internally persuasive discourse . . . is, as it is affirmed through assimilation, tightly interwoven with 'one's own word' ... Its creativity and productiveness consists precisely in the fact that such a word awakens new and independent words, that it organizes masses of our words from within ... More than that, it enters into an intense interaction, a struggle with other internally persuasive discourses. Our ideological development is just such an intense struggle within us for hegemony among various available verbal and ideological points of view, approaches, directions and values.40

Thus the interaction of discourses in the novel is but the most thoroughgoing manifestation of the interactions within the language community itself. The polyphonic novel is the artistically heightened expression of the progressive hegemonic principle which is always present within society, while the monologic principle is akin to the workings of authoritarian social forces.

In Gramsci's prison writings the above divergent hegemonic principles coincide with the exercise of hegemony by the bourgeoisie and proletariat. In bourgeois society the 'active man-in-the-mass has a practical activity, but has no clear theoretical consciousness of his practical activity', having 'for reasons of submission and intellectual subordination' adopted the conception of the dominant class. While 'theoretical consciousness' and practical activity may be historically contradictory, this does not make itself apparent in 'normal times' when the dominant conception is 'inherited from the past and uncritically absorbed'. The hegemonic conception, like 'authoritative discourse', serves to conceal and subjugate the conception 'implicit' in his social practice 'to produce a state in which the contradictory state of consciousness does not permit of any action, any decision or any choice, and produces a condition of moral and political passivity'. When the subordinate social group begins to act in a unified fashion, however, the implicit conception begins to appear from within the dominating discourse with the dawning of ‘critical understanding of self’ which ‘takes place through a struggle of political “hegemonies" and of opposing directions, first in the ethical sphere and then in that of politics proper, in order to arrive at the working out at a higher level of one's own conception of reality.’41 This process Bakhtin very closely approaches in the 1934 essay on the novel, noting that ‘[w]hen thought begins to work in an independent and discriminating way, what first occurs is a separation between internally persuasive discourse and authoritarian, enforced discourse, along with a rejection of those congeries of discourses that do not matter to us, that do not touch us’. With this separation begins the long process through which ‘one's own discourse is gradually and slowly wrought out of others’ words that have been acknowleged and assimilated'.42

The development of ‘critical self-consciousness’ means, however, the development of intellectuals who organize the process of differentiation through the ‘conceptual and philosophical elaboration of ideas’. This stratum finds its modern expression, for Gramsci, in the leaders of the vanguard political party who through their political organization maintain contact with their mass base. Political parties, argues Gramsci, in a passage extraordinarily close to Bakhtin’s characterization of the novel in the 1934 essay, ‘work out the ethics and the politics corresponding to these conceptions and act as it were as their historical “laboratory".' In structuring and elaborating ‘implicit’ conceptions through the dialectical use of agitation and propaganda, parties are ‘the elaborators of new, integral and totalitarian intelligentsias and the crucibles where the unification of theory and practice, understood as a real historical process, takes place’.43 In Bakhtin’s aestheticized version of this coming to selfconsciousness the author, in the ‘crucible’ of the novel, subjects competing ideologies to fictional experiment (in the form of narrative events), simultaneously revealing the ideological structure of those ideologies and their conceptual adequacy. Outside the novel is only an eternally sceptical ‘people’ and a repressive ruling stratum.

The Struggle for Hegemony

It was Vossler who had first analyzed the struggle between languages in terms of the aesthetically regulated acceptance of one worldview by another. Yet Vossler also made a distinction within the world of signs between languages with a hegemonic potential and those whose status is less secure. In terms of language, therefore, as of politics, there are leaders and led. For Gramsci and Voloshinov it is only the bourgeoisie and proletariat who can develop a thoroughly differentiated and united discourse by virtue of their structural positions within the relations of production. Proletarian hegemonic language is Marxism, which can unite economic, political, intellectual and moral conceptions, but must be developed ‘to the point of it becoming the hegemonic exponent of high culture', a development which is simultaneously ‘the struggle for the cultural unification of the human race’.44 The ideologies of other social groups are akin to Vossler's conception of ‘doubtful national languages':

In doubtful cases a national language is like a church—— ne can belong to it, and also change it. That language binds us into nations is a natural historical fact, but not a law of nature.45

The status of the social discourses of the peasantry and other intermediate groups is akin to that of dialects in relation to a national language with universal aspirations. In a modern context we could mention the (spontaneous' discourses of different oppressed groups like gay liberation, feminism and black nationalism which remain limited to their own group concerns. Those discourses which are unable to develop beyond this stage must seek alliances with other, potentially hegemonic discourses:

[A] language that is merely individual, merely ornamental and national, and remains fixed in its particular provincialism, will degenerate into a mere dialect. Above all, in the iron grip with which the language would try to retain its national aspect, the language itself would crumble.46

Crushed by political, economic and cultural factors, a language is attracted to or repelled by other languages according to the degree to which the external form of the ‘would-be hegemonic' language conforms to the ‘inner form' of the ‘doubtful case'. In Crocean terms this is intuition, in Bakhtin ‘socially evaluative accent' and in Gramsci the practice of a social class. The distinctive feature of Marxism is that it can be developed to a point where it actualizes all that is valuable in ‘subaltern', ‘fragmentary' conceptions and thereby can become constitutive of the new order. The choice of with which languages to ally depends upon aesthetic factors. Vossler argues:

An aesthetic element is concerned in every act of suggestion of the will. Whether we call the gate through which an alien will enters into us ear or eye or nose or touch or sensibility or the power of perception, the spirit on guard, who opens and closes the gate and lies awake behind the eyelids, is an aesthetic force——taste.47

Thus identification with or rejection of another's viewpoint is an aesthetic action. Gramsci, following Bartoli's development of this point, termed this fascino-prestigio (attraction-prestige). The proletariat and bourgeoisie have the ability to become hegemonic and generate prestige enough to win the leadership of other social groups. Aligned to each of these classes is a group of intellectuals who articulate the most systematic and advanced version of the hegemonic discourse, winning leadership of the class to which they are aligned. While the relations of intellectuals and social group, party and class, are dialectically reciprocal, the positions are not interchangeable; thus Gramsci can write that ‘it is necessary to reject vigorously as counter-revolutionary any conception that makes the [proletarian] party into a synthesis of heterogeneous elements.'48 In Bakhtin's formulation this is not clearly defined. As Hirschkop notes, the role of author in consecrating the existence of the hero implies a God to person (irreversible) relationship, while the derivation of these roles from everyday experience suggests a person to person (reversible) relationship.49

The novelistic structure in the 1929 Dostoyevsky study facilitates not only reflection by the author on the hero, but the self-reflection of the hero on himself. When translated into the Hegelian terms of the 1934 argument, this self-reflection is that of culture on itself. The new casting of this argument in ‘Discourse in the Novel' shows the novel to be literature's (organ for perceiving the heterodox nature of its own speech'. Preexisting social dialects, in and through the novel, are seen to become self-conscious: they are ‘dialogically implicated in each other and begin to exist for each other'.50 Yet Bakhtin simultaneously argues that the novel is shaped by its monologic opponent, poetry, which aims to dominate other languages with its own favoured language. The extent to which the novel is simply the self-consciousness of discourse, which many ‘Bakhtinians' stress, however, the less able it is to challenge the domination of the poetic. It merely shows the fact that there are many discourses in society that relate to each other rather than a single discourse that relates to reality alone. Posed in such a way, as Bakhtin himself recognizes in the Dostoyevsky study, the effectivity of the novel is denied since (relativism and dogmatism equally exclude all argumentation, all authentic dialogue, by making it either unnecessary (relativism) or impossible (dogmatism).'51 To be politically effective the novelist must organise other languages against the authoritative language. In this sense the novelist, like Gramsci's party leader, ensures the structure (remains united and consistent in its on-going activity', fixing (the limits of freedom of discussion and propaganda'.52 Bakhtin's novelist, in his most political role (builds a superstructure over these languages made up of his own intentions and accents, which then becomes dialogically linked with them.'53 The limits imposed by the leader and the novelist (should not be conceived of in the administrative and police sense, but...in the sense of fixing the direction of cultural policy.'54

Perhaps the biggest problem with Bakhtin's analysis is an all too complete translation of a political problem into the terms of an artistic form. The institutions within which literary production and reception are realized and controlled disappear from view and their effects are felt only in terms of linguistic forms whose relevance largely depends upon that institutional framework. Perhaps the clearest example of this is Bakhtin's entirely negative attitude to the avant garde poets' attempt to reintegrate art into a transformed social life by creating a ‘special “language of poetry”’. This, as Nikolai Bachtin noted some years later, was not a poetic gesture in Bakhtin’s terms but an intensely novelistic attempt to ‘release and gather the latent powers of folk-poetry and popular speech and, investing them with new functions, build up a new medium of poetic communication'.55 It was precisely the absence of social transformation, dependent on the internationalization of the revolution, that left the artists as simply artists and transformed their project into ‘a typical utopian philosopheme’.56 The degeneration of the mass popular festivals of 1918—19 in which the avant-gardistes had organized huge carniva-lesque pageants and public performances, was typical of the bureaucratization of the institutional and social orders that left the avant garde beached. The Stalinist eulogization of Mayakovsky and demand for tendentious literature deliberately obscured the changes in the context of poetic production between the 1930s and the revolutionary era, and Bakhtin’s ambiguity over the poetic as type of discourse and stance towards other discourses is undoubtedly a symptom of this. As a result the generic in itself appeared reactionary rather than the specific conditions of performance that imbued poetry with its social value. The novel thereby often appears an anti-genre concerned with the purely anti-hegemonic work of the carnivalesque rather than a counter-genre.57

The meeting of Bakhtin and Gramsci alerts us to these problems in Bakhtin’s analysis but also shows the incompatibility of Bakhtin’s work with that of the liberal establishment’s ‘literary critics’ who have tried to enlist his work in their struggle against the more radical versions of poststructuralism. From the work of the ‘post-marxist’ idealists of the first twenty years of the century both Bakhtin and Gramsci fashioned a political aesthetics which aimed to organize the deconstructive impulses of the ‘subaltern classes7 into a force for revolutionary change. Furthermore, Bakhtin, at his best, supplies a welcome corrective to some aspects of Gramsci’s work which led the latter into a partial accommodation with Stalinism and moreover does so without sliding into the void of the post-structualist ‘hors texte. This chiefly refers to Gramsci’s relatively undeveloped understanding of the systematic nature of language which has allowed writers to advocate the complete separation of the notion of hegemony from ‘classism’, based on a post-structuralist philosophy of language in which meaning is solely the unstable effect of shifting relations of difference.58

Croce believed that the subject could intuit reality before its translation into the linguistic terms which became its social embodiment. Gramsci similarly believed that through the synthesizing activity of social practice workers could have a pre-verbal, semi-consciousness of their position in productive relations which could then be translated into discourse given favourable historical conditions. Reminiscent of Lukacs, Gramsci seems to be suggesting that the standpoint of the proletariat is the basis of a class consciousness that is synonymous with truth and that the revolutionary party, in providing the highest expression of that consciousness would have extra-discursive access to reality. Hence his comment that the party ‘takes the place of the divinity or the categorical imperative'.59 It is, however, left unexplained as to exactly how a conception of the world can be implicit in the practice of a given social group, especially when we consider language as the ‘articulated structure which makes contact with reality only at the periphery'60 which Saussure's work demands. While Gramsci's anti-realist epistemology allowed him to break with then dominant ‘false consciousness' Marxist theories of ideology, facilitating the development of an account of ideology as something continually reorganized in the face of the struggle between classes, it often led him to reduce the social to the subject's consciousness of it. While Bakhtin's failure to account for the material determinants of heteroglossia frequently led him into the same reduction, he did more satisfactorily examine this weak area than did Gramsci.

In rejecting Gramsci's suggestion of an unmediated link between economic class interest and political ideology, some have gone on to argue that there is no correlation at all between discursive meaning and the economic organization of society. As Ann Jefferson notes:

[D]ialogism is positively activated by intensifying mimesis at every turn ... whether one begins with reference or with dialogism, the two concepts prove to be inextricably linked . . . There is a kind of complementarity whereby representation necessarily entails the active heteroglossia of dialogism, and dialo-gism necessarily leads back again to questions of representation.61

Mikhail Bakhtin's theory of the novel was an attempt to reintegrate the work of the cultural critic with contemporary problems of social justice after these Bohemian excesses, and he did so in the most difficult circumstances one can imagine. Bakhtin's novelist and Gramsci's ‘modern prince' both structure and maximize dialogism so as to intensify representational adequacy; drawing on the valuable observations of the last generations of ‘post-Marxists', they both served to enrich historical materialism but to do so they had to completely dismember the methodology of those theories. Today, too, Marxism cannot advance by simply absorbing the post-structuralist method but can learn from the inadequacies of that method and its valuable observations. To move beyond mere intellectual dissent, however, we still need the ‘modern prince'.

International Studies Review

International Studies Review (2012) 14, 666-686

Gramsci for the Twenty-first Century: Dialectics and Translatability

Edited by Marlies Glasius

University of Amsterdam and Free University, Amsterdam

Reading Gramsci62 today may feel like reading the bible must have been for early Renaissance scholars: working across time and space, sensing how alien the social context is and how necessarily inadequate even the best translation, we attempt to establish a direct line of communication. We always find passages and turns of phrase not noticed before that seem to speak directly to current affairs, but we also find parts of the text hard to comprehend and probably less relevant.

Nonetheless, Gramsci’s work on hegemony, intellectuals, the state, civil society, and popular culture continues to fascinate and inspire political scientists like ourselves, including those who would identify themselves as neo-Gramscians as well as those who use his work in more eclectic and heterodox ways. In this Forum, we reflect on the extent to which we can ‘‘translate’’ Gramsci and what we can learn from him when it comes to the current financial crisis, the onset of revolutions and civil wars and other instances of sociopolitical contestation.

Warnaar opens with a theoretical contribution, positing Gramscian approaches to International Relations as crucial to overcoming infertile agency/structure and materialideational debates: not only does Gramsci’s work place agency and structure as well as material and ideational dimensions in a dialectical relation to each other, it actually helps us analyze why change happens in one place and not in another. The next three contributions illuminate elements of this general insight.

Glasius traces two main interpretations of Gramsci’s influential take on ‘‘civil society,’’ a deterministic thick hegemony interpretation and an agentic counterhegemony interpretation. She concludes that the original text points at less predetermined and more complex readings of discursive struggles in global civil society.

Holman argues that contrary to some postmodernist understandings, the concept of class is central to Gramsci’s work, and interprets the current moment in European politics as an instance of a ‘‘passive revolution’’ in which the dominant class agents pull together to present particular interests as the general interest.

Ruggeri shows how Gramsci’s use of the concepts of ‘‘party,’’ ‘‘intellectuals,’’ and ‘‘hegemony’’ in connection with each other can enrich classical rationalist explanations for rebellion with a broader understanding of the role of political entrepreneurs.

Ives finally focuses on the obstacles to interpreting and applying Gramsci. He finds that problems relating to Gramsci’s ill health, his supposed self-censorship, and the unfinished nature of his work have perhaps been overemphasized. On the other hand, Gramsci’s clear intention to reflect on and respond to his own historical moment, rather than deriving general laws about human nature, and the extent to which that moment differed from our own, have been too much overlooked. Gramsci’s own concept of ‘‘translation’’ as a complex interaction gives us a valuable tool to approach his work with a view to understanding contemporary social reality.

Gramsci’s Bridges: A Dialectical Approach to International Studies

Maaike Warnaar

Leiden University Institute for Area Studies

One useful way of assessing what Gramsci has to offer International Relations (IR) is by placing neo-Gramscian approaches within the on-going debate on the compatibility of IR’s main competing paradigms: realism and constructivism. The Spring 2004 issue of the International Studies Review featured a forum on the possibility of a middle ground between constructivism and realism (Jackson and Nexon 2004) building on the arguments put forward by Samuel Barkin (2003) and Jennifer Sterling-Folker (2002) in previous issues of the same journal. The main debate between these two approaches to IR revolves around the question whether relations among states are predetermined by the structural constraints of the international system or part and parcel of a socially constructed reality, which is simultaneously shaped and reshaped through social practice. In essence, this central question in IR deals with the (interrelated) issues of structure versus agency, material versus ideational, and stasis versus change. The discussion on the compatibility of realism and constructivism has, however, so far failed to acknowledge its main conclusion: post-positivist approaches to IR offer the best ground for engaging realism and constructivism. Perhaps hesitation to acknowledge the assets of poststructuralism is due to its imprecision on the topics of structure versus agency, material versus ideational, and stasis versus change. In that case, an alternative may be found in neo-Gramscian approaches.

The search for a middle ground between realism and constructivism implies that neither theory is seen as satisfactory and, more importantly, that what the one is lacking, the other can offer. With regard to debates on structure versus agency, material versus ideational, and stasis versus change, realism is often placed on the side of the former and constructivism on the side of the latter. This is of course a gross oversimplification of either approach, but attempts to find a common ground between realism and constructivism are usually attempts to come to theory that accounts for both. Neither Jennifer Sterling-Folker (2002) nor Samuel Barkin (2003) in their analysis of the compatibility of realism and constructivism include postmodern variants of constructivism. Instead, they look for what realism is lacking in conventional constructivism and vice versa. This means that neither Sterling-Folker nor Barkin have so far been able to move beyond constructivism with realist characteristics (or a realism with constructivist characteristics) toward a ‘‘unique school of thought,’’ which ‘‘takes international politics as socially constructed’’ meaning not just a focus on norms and rules as social constructs, but ((everything in international relations’’ (Mattern 2004:345). Perhaps, neo-Gramscian approaches could provide the alternative. While neo-Gramscian approaches take on board many of the criticisms voiced by constructivists and poststructuralists—rationalists5 focus on structure and continuity instead of agency and change, the artificial separation of independent and dependent variables that neglects their interrelation, as well as the risk of reproducing power relations through research instead of uncovering them—it also retains an amount of structuralism that makes it possible to speak of continuity and material basis of social phenomena. Neo-Gramscian approaches may provide just those bridges between constructivism and realism that Barkin and others have been looking for.

As discussed by Ives in this Forum, Gramsci’s Prison Notebooks are no easy read, nor can Gramsci’s concepts be translated one-to-one to present-day international phenomena. Nevertheless, IR scholars have drawn from the Prison Notebooks with much success. Robert Cox’s translation of Gramsci to international developments is without doubt the most influential application of Gramsci in IR. Surely, one could debate whether the Coxian approach to IR is all that faithful to Gramsci’s original message. Perhaps ''neo-Gramscian'' does not capture quite how different Cox’s approach is from Gramsci's thought (Bieler and Morton 2001). However, in general terms, neo-Gramscians in IR do continue in Gramsci’s footsteps with regard to his dialectical approach, which also resonates in the contributions by Holman and Ruggeri in the current Forum, particularly on the subjects of structure/agency and materialideational. This is their most important contribution to IR, as it offers a much-needed alternative to the sustained bias of constructivism and realism toward one or the other.

Robert Cox’s (1981 and 1983) Millennium articles offered IR an ontological alternative to prevailing rationalist approaches. In the first article, Cox criticizes rationalist approaches for ''building theory on theory," structurally neglecting social forces and for being unable to account for change (Cox 1981:128). In his second article, Cox elaborates on his neo-Gramscian approach and clarifies the basic concepts. According to Cox, two kinds of theorizing can be distinguished in the social sciences: problem-solving and critical theory. He claims that ''works of sophistication usually share some of the features of both’’ (Ibid 130). The aim of problem-solving theory is ''to be a guide to help solve the problems posed within the terms of the particular perspective which was the point of departure’’ (Ibid 128). Critical theory, on the other hand, ''does not take institutions and social and power relations for granted but calls them into question by concerning itself with their origins and how and whether they might be in a process of changing’’ (Ibid: 129). In that sense, critical theory according to Cox is concerned with ''a continuing process of historical change,’’ (1981:129) and ''it approaches practice from a perspective which transcends that of the existing order, which problem-solving takes as its starting-point’’ (Ibid: 130). ''The juxtaposition and reciprocal relationships of the political, ethical and ideological spheres of activity with the economic sphere of activity avoids reductionism’’ (1983:167). Cox avoids reductionism with Gramsci,s juxtaposition of, yet interrelationships between, the political, ethical, and ideological spheres on the one side and the economic on the other. ''It avoids reducing everything to economics (economism) or to ideas (idealism).…ideas and material conditions are always bound together, mutually influencing one and another, and not reducible one to the other" (1983:167-168).

The central concept in Robert Cox’s work is historical structure (after Gramsci’s historical bloc). Within a historical structure, three categories of forces interact: ideas, material capabilities, and institutions. ''No one-way determinism need be assumed among these three: the relationship can be assumed to be reciprocal,’’ he argues (Ibid: 136). The role of institutions is crucial in this interaction, as they are:

...a means of stabilizing and perpetuating a particular order. Institutions reflect the power relations prevailing at their point of origin and tend, at least initially, to encourage collective images consistent with these power relations. Eventually, institutions take on their own life; they can become either a battleground of opposing tendencies, or stimulate the creation of rival institutions reflecting different tendencies. Institutions are particular amalgams of ideas and material power, which in turn influence the development of ideas and material capabilities. (Ibid: 137)

Cox applies the concept of historical structures to three levels: at the subnational level, the organization of production and the social forces engendered by this; at the national level, the different manifestations of the state-society complex; and at an international level, world orders. It is with the latter category that Cox makes his contribution to IR. In an international environment, Cox acknowledges the importance of change while maintaining the idea of structural continuity over extended periods of time within a historical structure. In unraveling this historical structure, he acknowledges the mutual constitution of the social, institutional, and the material as well the duality of agency and structure. Cox’s framework is summarized by Bieler and Morton (2001:22) as ((the social ontology of historical structures that refer to persistent social practices, made by collective human activity and transformed through collective human activity'' The unity of objective and subjective forces manifests itself in the social construction of structures or, in Cox's words: ((what is subjective in understanding, becomes objective through action'' (Cox 1992 quoted by Bieler and Morton: 22). ((To say that structures are socially constructed,'' Bieler and Morton explain, ((therefore means that structures become part of the (objective' world by virtue of their existence in the intersubjectivity of various people'' (Ibid) Moreover, structures may be socially constructed, but structural continuity is what characterizes his historical structure.

Bieler and Morton (2001:17) discuss in detail Cox's contribution to the agentstructure debate in the social sciences. This debate originally took place between structuralists and intentionalists, but with Giddens' structuration theory, the debate moved into a discussion of their dialectic relationship. This dialectic relationship ((implies that social structures are constituted by human agency and are, at the same time, the medium of this constitution. Both are internally related through social practices'' (Ibid: 7). Bieler and Morton identify two problems with Giddens' theory, both concerning his inability to account for change, and emphasize the need for a theory that can explain how ((it is possible to relate actors to their surrounding structures, as being even engendered by structures, and realize at the same time that they always have several possible strategies from which to choose a particular course of action'' (Ibid. 16). They find it in Cox's (actually: Gramsci's) ((historicist method,'' through which he identifies ((connections between the mental schema through which people perceive action and the material world that, in turn, both constrains what people can do and how they think about action'' (Ibid: 17).

A historicist method in IR offers a better understanding of the relationship between agent and structure, Bieler and Morton argue, but in doing so it poses challenges ((to conventional assumptions in IR that have framed the debate on agency and structure'' (Ibid). Most importantly, a historicist approach combines explanatory and interpretive modes of inquiry, which are usually treated separately. This use of a combination of both explaining and understanding is the consequence of ((an emphasis on how social relations in the present of any particular era are, to some extent, prefigured by the past and how it is important to appreciate a combination of the objective and subjective elements within the historical process'' (Ibid 18). As Gramsci said, ''we know reality only in relation to man, and since man is historical becoming, knowledge and reality are also a becoming and so is objectivity’’ (Ibid 20), which means that the concept of knowledge involved in developing such a historical mode of thought involves an interpretative or hermeneutic process, whereby ‘‘the enquirer’s mind enters into the historical process—observer and observed, agent and structure, become intertwined’’ (Ibid: 21).

But there is more to Cox’s neo-Gramscian approach than the notion that production and reproduction of social structures happens only through human agency, as Bieler and Morton contend. If that was all neo-Gramscianism had to offer, Sterling-Folker’s criticism of constructivism’s inability to explain which institutions are being reproduced and which modified at any given moment in time would hold here as well. Gramsci’s thought, however, dealt in the first place with why revolutionary change happens in one place and not in another. Which institutions are being reproduced and which modified then depends on the ability of groups to challenge the institutions and the ability of these institutions to absorb these challenges. Internationally, we may expect change where groups of states find or create space to challenge the way international relations are organized, perhaps weakening the current system, perhaps creating a counterhege-monic challenge. If one were to research international change, one would identify international forces challenging the status quo and analyze their strategies. This is perhaps the most important contribution of the neo-Gramscians to the agency-structure debate: it does not only show their dialectic, it also helps to analyze which has prevalence over which at what point in time.

This essay started with the suggestion that neo-Gramscian approaches to IR can provide a middle ground between realism and constructivism in that it both acknowledges the social construction of reality that allows for acknowledgment of the role of ideas in social change, while at the same time pointing toward the institutionalization that gives this construction a somehow determined, continuous character. When neither realism nor constructivism can explain both stasis and change, both material and ideational, both agency and structure, combining the two runs the risk of explaining nothing at all. What we have arrived at with the neo-Gramscian theory, however, is perhaps not merely a middle ground but rather a more complete alternative: unlike mainstream approaches, the neo-Gramscian approach to IR is able to grapple with structure and agency, point both at the mutual constitution of the material and ideational, and explain both stasis and change. Historical structures are contested, but, nevertheless, they are characterized first and foremost by continuity over a certain period of time. Challenges to the historical structure by social forces point toward the possibilities for change. Neo-Gramscians then are able to account for both stasis and change, both agency and structure, both material and ideational, but also point at how these relate to each other. This is how neo-Gramscian approaches provide a more complete alternative to attempts toward a realist constructivism or a constructivist realism.

Gramsci’s Trenches: Civil Society as ‘‘Warfare’’

Marlies Glasius

University of Amsterdam and Free University, Amsterdam

On first reading, Gramsci’s writing on civil society appears highly unpromising as a seminal text. First, as pointed out by Quintin Hoare in the introduction to this part of the Notebooks (Hoare and Smith 1971:207-208), Gramsci’s use of civil society is inconsistent, sometimes denoting economic life (Gramsci 1971:266-267, Q17§51) and sometimes being subsumed under the state (Ibid 261; Q8§190). It is only his third use of ‘‘civil society,’’ as the handmaiden of both economic life and the state but yet something analytically separable, connected to the exercise of hegemony, that has excited much scholarly and activist interest.

A second element that would seem unpromising is the ‘‘war’’ metaphor. Gramsci compares political struggle to military occupation: ‘‘the victorious army occupies, or proposes to occupy, permanently all or part of the conquered territory. Then the defeated army is disarmed and dispersed, but the struggle continues on the terrain of politics and of military ‘preparation.’’’ Interestingly, Gramsci invokes Gandhi, now widely seen as the pioneer of civil resistance, to explore this metaphor of warfare for political struggle: ‘‘war of movement, war of position, and underground warfare.’’ Underground warfare in Gramsci conception is distinctly military, but little more is said of it (Gramsci 1971:229; Q1§134). Through the distinction between war of movement and war of position, Gramsci attacks the Marxist-Leninist faith in spontaneous revolution sparked by economic crisis. This ‘‘iron economic determinism’’ aggravated by ((historical mysticism’’ (Gramsci 1971:233; Q13§24), which would dictate war of movement, that is, full-on revolutionary confrontation, in times of economic crisis, has turned out to be fallacious. At least ((in the case of the most advanced States, where (civil society’ has become a very complex structure and one which is resistant to the catastrophic incursions of the immediate economic element (crises, depressions, etc.). The superstructures of civil society are like the trench-systems of modern warfare.’’ Gramsci then proposes that what is necessary is ((studying in-depth which elements of civil society correspond to the defensive systems in a war of position’’ (Gramsci 1971:235; Q13§24). Gramsci’s writing on state and civil society is shot through with military language throughout, yet some activists, like Weffort (1983/1989) in Brazil and Konrad (1984) in Hungary, have managed to combine a Gramscian concept of civil society with an emphatic embrace of the ((civil’’ element as non-violence and anti-violence.

I believe what they and many others have been drawn to in Gramsci’s conceptualization is the repeated use of the metaphor of ((fortifications’’ or ((trenches’’： ((when the State trembled a sturdy structure of civil society was at once revealed. The State was only an outer ditch, behind which there stood a powerful system of fortresses and earthworks’’(Gramsci 1971:238; Q7§16, see also 243; Q13§7 for more trenches). The trench warfare has both an associational and an ideational aspect, which are closely connected. Gramsci describes how both progressive and reactionary (read: communist and fascist) parties may ''attack’’ and conquer the associations of civil society: ((It always happens that individuals belong to more than one private association and often to associations that are objectively in contradiction to one another. A totalitarian policy is aimed precisely: (i) at ensuring that the members of a particular party find in that party all the satisfactions that they formerly found in a multiplicity of organizations, that is, at breaking all the threads that bind these members to extraneous cultural organisms; (ii) at destroying all other organizations or at incorporating them in a system of which the party is the sole regulator’’ (Gramsci 1971:265; Q6§136). The ideational element of the struggle comes to the fore in a footnote: "Conformism has always existed: what is involved today is a struggle for hegemony, a crisis of civil society. The old intellectual and moral leaders of society feel the ground slipping from under their feet; they perceive that their sermons have precisely become mere sermons’’ (Gramsci 1971:242 fn.; Q13§7). The ending of this passage, just like the associational one, makes abundantly clear how Gramsci would have the struggle ending, with a totalitarian workers’ utopia. This ((end of history’’ element of Gramsci’s thinking has of course been willfully ignored by many neo-Gramscians.

Gramsci never gives a comprehensive list of civil society institutions (probably an advantage, as it allows for contextual adaptation), but he throws out a series of useful hints. In Marx’s time, it contained craft organizations, Jacobin clubs, secret conspiracies, and journalist groups (Gramsci 1971:259; Q1§47). In his own time, it contains private associations, natural (that is, family) and contractual ties (Gramsci 1971:264; Q6§136), schools, the Church (again also associated with the state, as in cahoots in the exercise of hegemony), possibly the law, also in cahoots, (Gramsci 1971:243-246; Q13§7; Q15§10; Q6§81), and probably also the ((readers of a newspaper’’(Gramsci 1971:265; Q6§136).

Two opposing conceptions of civil society have been derived from Gramsci’s hints. The first, which seems most directly to follow from Gramsci’s own writing, can be called in Scott’s (1990) term ((thick hegemony.’’ It has civil society as the sphere or set of institutions where hegemony is exercised and reproduced.

Michel Foucault (1977), who never explicitly acknowledges Gramsci’s influence, seems very clearly to be following in Gramsci’s footsteps in his famous works on punishment and education, specifically, like Gramsci, invoking schools and courts as institutions where hegemony is exercised, but departing from Gramsci in his emphasis on the self-propelling circulation of power. Again, he appears to be taking Gramsci’s notion of power as consisting in coercion and hegemony as his point of departure to claim that in liberal modernity, coercion appears to be withering away in favor of hegemony. In media studies, Chomsky and Herman (1988) and the school of authors and activists following in their wake do explicitly acknowledge Gramsci in their seminal book and documentary Manufacturing Consent. Theirs is a much more unreconstructed Gramscianism, linking exercise of hegemony to media ownership. In more recent work, Lipschutz (2005) treads a middle line between Gramscian and Foucaultian interpretations of the exercise of hegemony, connecting it to the actors often considered as comprising civil society in contemporary understandings: non-governmental organizations. In all these interpretations, the possibility of resistance is not entirely excluded, but the emphasis is on the reproduction of the status quo in civil society rather than on challenges to it.

The second conception of civil society, which can be called the ((counterhege-monic’’ or ((liberating’’ version, was being derived from Gramsci by dissident intellectuals in the 1970s and 1980s in two different continents. In the Latin American case, the derivation was rather obvious and widely acknowledged. Both Marxist intellectuals and armed insurrection movements found themselves helpless and in danger of their lives in the face of right-wing dictatorships, quite similar to Gramsci’s own circumstances. Gramsci’s civil society concept ((provided the left with hope even in its darkest hour by offering up an arena for transforma-tory political action from under their very noses, one that they had never noticed before but whose potential was enormous’’ (Baker 2002:59). In Eastern Europe, the influence has been muted. Yet, the path to resistance identified by Michnik (1985) in Poland, Konrad (1984) in Hungary, and Havel (Havel, Keane, and Lukes 1985) in Czechoslovakia, among others, is entirely associational and ideational. Gramsci’s trenches literally reappear in a 1988 essay by Vaclav Benda, a prominent member of Charta 77: ((Given the time and the means available, only a certain number of trenches can be eliminated. If, at the same time, the parallel polis is able to produce more trenches than it loses, a situation arises that is mortally dangerous for the regime ...the mission of the parallel polis is constantly to conquer new territory’’ (1988:219). Not much later, western political theorists like Bobbio (1988), Cohen and Arato (1992), and at the international level, Cox (1999) began to also rediscover the trenches as a way to conceptualize ideational struggle. Once the thinking had shifted from capturing the world, or at least the state, to capturing civil society itself with ideas and associations, a further move could be made. As Cohen and Arato describe: ((The alternative, conflict-theoretical view of hegemony building in civil society implies (even if Gramsci never explicitly draws such a conclusion) a positive normative attitude to the existing version of civil society or, rather, to some of its institutional dimensions. Clearly a principled version of radical reformism could be based on such an attitude’’(150; see also Howell and Pearce 2001:34).

With this came what I would call a naive neo-Gramscian view, where (global) civil society, instead of being first and foremost hegemonic, becomes counter-hegemonic only. This is exemplified for instance by Rupert Taylor’s insistence that ‘‘to date, current research into global civil society suffers from weak description and inadequate theorization. The way forward requires interpreting global civil society as a progressive multi-organization field with innovative network forms and transformative purpose’’ (2004:339; see also Katz 2006).

As suggested above, Gramsci’s conception of civil society as ideational trench warfare has taken readers in two completely different directions. The thick hegemony version, notwithstanding the obvious differences between Foucaul-tian, Chomskyan, and other variants, provides a rather static version of our current stage in history as necessarily lasting. Moreover, they share the assumption so vigorously attacked by Scott (1990) that nearly all of us buy into hegemonic discourses nearly all the time. On the other, utopian, side, we have the progressive worldwide movement of Taylor, but perhaps also Hardt and Negri’s (2004) multitude, or Cox’s global civil society (Cox 1999:10-11), which free of vanguardist leaders now, is still struggling, in the now global trenches, for all things good.

Against both of these readings, Gramsci’s civil society concept, and more specifically the trench warfare metaphor, remains attractive precisely because of the complexity it injects into any analysis of ideational struggle. First, the real trenches of the First World War were characterized by little real movement most of the time. This element of stuckness of the war of position appears highly applicable for instance to the current state of affairs in relation to climate change. Yet, second, these long static periods were interspersed with brief bursts of confusion in which participants did not always know whether they were winning or losing, or which way to run. This is illustrated perhaps by the current politics around the European debt crisis, as described by Holman. Third, while there were typically still two warring parties, the metaphor easily allows for multiple parties and shifting alliances. Finally, while the trenches are situated within the concept of hegemony, and there is therefore a definite element of power imbalance (usually with capital, coercion, and dominant ideology lined up on one side), the metaphor itself tells us that change is difficult but not impossible.

Finally, there is an ambiguity in Gramsci’s view of the unfolding of world history that allows for an opening to a properly dialectic, rather than teleological, interpretation. The ambiguity is provided by the fact that on the one hand, Marxism had Gramsci believe he found himself in the one but last phase of history, but on the other hand, most of his work is actually devoted to understanding the difficulty of moving into the very last phase. Hence, while trench warfare is often discussed as a means to an end, the work is also permeated with references to a dialectical process consisting of progressive and reactionary phases.

Wars of position do sometimes get won, but that is not the end of it. They become new hegemonies that never quite reproduce the old ones and that in turn call forth new challenges. The location of the new trenches is neither contingent nor ever-progressing, but follows from the last synthesis.

Gramsci’s Social Forces: Class and Class Formation and the European Sovereign Debt Crisis

Otto Holman

Department of Politics and Amsterdam Institute of Social Science Research, University of Amsterdam

Years ago, during a round table debate about the impact of the neo-Gramscian Amsterdam School of International Political Economy (IPE), keynote speaker Peter Taylor qualified Gramsci as ‘‘the kind of Marxist you can bring home to mummy.’’ His remark produced a jolly good laugh. Behind the joke, however, is the image problem of Marxism and, indeed, the Marxist-inspired neo-Gramscian approach. All kind of ‘‘posts’’ (postmodernists, poststructuralists, post-Marxists, and what have you) embrace Gramsci as one of their intellectual godfathers. They see his work as really nondogmatic. One of the finest examples of this relativism is the proclamation of the ‘‘death of class.’’ Postmodern societies are characterized by many conflicts and many conflicting identities, but class has ceased to be one of them.

Yet, contrary to how these ‘‘posts’’ interpret Gramsci, in this article the importance of class in the Prison Notebooks and in the writings of Gramsci in general is emphasized. According to some, prison censorship made Gramsci write about social groups or forces rather than class (see Donaldson 2007:3). Whether this is true or not, it was class he meant to talk about from the very beginning. The use of the notions of class and class formation in this article has been inspired by the work of Gramsci.

Their applicability in today’s world can be illustrated by briefly referring to the current sovereign debt crisis in Europe and the underlying patterns of hegemony. Four years after the specter of credit crunch-turned debt crisis started to haunt Europe, we have to conclude that the ‘‘free market’’ has proved to be one of the strongest trademarks ever, apparently surviving one of the severest crises in the last 100 years. Those who believe(d) that this crisis may offer an opportunity for systemic change—whatever that may be—are utterly wrong. In fact, underneath the evident crisis-induced social chaos, there are signals of crisis management and grand design of the old hegemonic variety.

In between chaos and grand design, we may find Gramsci, and particularly his analysis of discourse production in the context of hegemony, which means the capacity to present one’s particular interest as the general interest:

This is the most purely political phase...bringing about not only a unison of economic and political aims, but also intellectual and moral unity, posing all the questions around which the struggle rages not on a corporate but on a ‘‘universal’’ plane, and thus creating the hegemony of a fundamental social group over a series of subordinate groups. (Gramsci 1971:181-182; Q13§17)

What will be decided in terms of solving the eurocrisis is certainly not the outcome of mere chaos, although it is true that politicians and economic scientists alike were rather ignorant about the causes and consequences of this crisis from its very start. Similarly, those who think in terms of grand design and conspiracy are equally wrong in as much as they assume a secret plot that is largely unknown to the general public. On the contrary, politicians, organic intellectuals, business leaders, etc. are doing their utmost best to present ‘‘a new common legal framework’’ for the 17 members of the eurozone, based on macroeconomic and monetary austerity, as the general interest. Those who think that this is about German hegemony do not understand the full meaning of a process called transnational class formation (cf. Paterson 2011).

Political Economy proper originally referred to the study of the intersection of economics, that is, market integration, and politics, that is, state formation, including their institutional, cultural, and ideological environments. Also, Gramsci’s historical materialism—though internationalist in spirit_ as confined to the nation-state in its application. It was only in the course of the 1970s and 1980s that historical materialist analysis became truly international or, indeed, global through such diverse literatures as dependency and world system theory, the New International Division of Labour approach, regulation theory, and neo-Gramscianism. Arguably, the overarching label Global Political Economy—or heterodox IPE—captures these theoretical and empirical developments of the last three decades best, particularly since it combines both geographical (global, transnational), economic (transnational capital, global commodity chains), and political (hollowing out of the state, governance, hegemony) notions.

The position taken in this article comes close to what David Harvey calls historical-geographical materialism or what Kees van der Pijl refers to as the interrelationship of modes of production and modes of foreign relations, the latter combining ((definite patterns of occupying space, protecting it, and organizing exchange’’ (Harvey 2005:1; Van der Pijl 2007:18). The ontological point of departure is that unequal distribution of power and welfare in time and space is independent of cultures and common within, across, and between communities of all sorts (be it tribes, nations, civilizations, or religions). As such, this real world of unequally distributed power and welfare is the most important ‘‘dependent’’ variable. Following this language, and looking at the present eurocrisis, integration is one of the most important ‘‘independent’’ variables: how did European integration alter existing power relations and patterns of socioeconomic inequality within and between member states? Yet ((integration’’ as such does not bring us any further. Following Marx’s method of abstraction, we need to unpack ((integration’’ to fully understand its real historical, that is, social meaning. The notions of class, class formation, and class agency may be used to give a deeper meaning to the process of European integration. Without identifying its internal social structure and the class strategies resulting from it, integration will remain an empty abstraction (and will persistently be cast in state-centric terms).

A central concept in a historical materialist approach to European integration, then, is the notion of class. In reaction to those who proclaimed the ((death of class,’’ Erik Olin Wright distinguished two conditions for a genuine class society: (i) ownership and control of the economically relevant assets or income-generating productive resources (such as land, capital [including shares, stock options, etc.], skills, information, labor power) by a small minority in society; and (ii) the consequences of this unequal distribution of income-generating assets for the material well-being (i.e., welfare and security) of the people. Or to put it the other way round: ((the more egalitarian the distribution of assets and the less a person’s material wellbeing depends upon their relationship to those assets, the lower the classness of a society’’ (Wright 1996:699).

We have to keep in mind, first, that the income-generating nature of capital assets is anchored in the labor process. Or better, that the level of income inequality (whether or not the result of direct ownership or control of capital assets) is related to the level of exploitation of labor power and the price it fetches in the market, like other commodities. In this sense, it can be argued that the postwar period of de-commodification has come to an end in the course of the 1970s and has turned into a period of accelerated commodification of labor since the early 1980s. This indeed is the real meaning and objective of the flexibilization of labor markets in Europe, one of the centerpieces of neoliberal restructuring. Second, we have to realize that both the ownership and control of economically relevant assets, and the income-generating nature of it, are increasingly transnational phenomena. In Europe, the dominant trend of transnational production and finance and the ever closer integration of capital markets are just two cases in point.

Is this enough ground to speak of transnational class formation? Certainly not. At stake is the difference between class and class formation. An important addition is that the structures, which reproduce or decrease/increase the unequal distribution of assets and income at the transnational level, have to be reduced to the agency of transnational actors (in the same way as these and other structures determine the behavior of transnational actors). In other words, we have to ascend from the abstract level of commodification and exploitation to the concrete level of agenda setting and policy planning. Apart from the institutional context, the level of ideas is of particular importance here. How can we present decisions— hich have the net effect of increasing inequalities—as being in the general interest? And which are the politico-institutional points of reference at the national, transnational, and supranational level? Which transnational coalitions are possible or necessary in order to translate certain interests into policymaking?

In other words, a process of class formation does not take place spontaneously. It needs political and ideological leadership and action based on a highly developed political and ideological consciousness of the dominant social class agents; ‘‘dominance’’ is then defined in terms of actorness or agency.

Returning to our claim that the process of European integration must be understood as an instance of transnational class formation, it is inter alia at this level of ideas that we can question state-centric views of European integration. The EU is increasingly functioning as a ‘‘quasi-state’’ structure, characterized by a complex system of multilevel decision making in which national (and subnational) governments, bureaucracies, and business elites develop converging ideas about, and interests in, a new European political economy. Elsewhere, I have extensively argued that the European Round Table of Industrialists (ERT) has been a particularly influential actor in shaping the socioeconomic contours of such a hybrid state-civil society configuration at the European level. In a world of ongoing commodification and accelerated deregulation and flexibilization, transnational business opinions play a privileged role in mobilizing economic interests, governments, and Union institutions. The ERT was clearly the primus inter pares in the European landscape of think tanks, agenda setting, and policy planning groups (see most recently, Holman 2012).

The consequences of this argument are twofold. First, transnational forces have become strong enough in the EU to resist nationalist or protectionist reflexes at the member state level. Let us take the sovereign debt crisis in Greece, Spain, Portugal, and Ireland as an example. It has been frequently explained by referring to the so-called ‘‘competitiveness gap’’ within the eurozone. Structural reforms should be implemented in these deficit countries in order to reverse trade flows and hence put an end to the German beggar-thy-neighbor policy. Among the structural reforms most often suggested, labor market flexibility and fiscal austerity figure prominently. It is difficult to see how these measures would structurally close the competitiveness gap, however. The most obvious way out of the structural eurozone crisis would be technological innovation as one of the central pillars in a more comprehensive attempt to increase competitiveness. For this to happen, public and private investments should have to be increased and redirected, which at least partially runs counter to the present fiscal austerity programs and the outward orientation of the respective capitals. The dilemma’s involved are difficult to solve, particularly because of the macroeconomic and monetary discipline imposed from above.

And this is exactly what will happen in the years to come: decisions to strengthen top-down mechanisms of austerity will be presented as the general interest and presented to the general public as inevitable. In Gramscian terms, we may very well witness a European ((passive revolution’’ or revolution from above, that is, the gradual introduction of a European state/society configuration based on austerity, discipline, and competitiveness. Let us remember the two ((fundamental principles of political science’’ from which, according to Gramsci (who is quoting Marx from memory here), the concept of passive revolution must be derived:

(i) that no social formation disappears as long as the productive forces which have developed within it still find room for further forward movement; and (ii) that a society does not set itself tasks for whose solution the necessary conditions have not already been incubated. (Gramsci 1971:106; Q15§17)

It is a sad story, but the second fundamental principle is also related to the absence of any effective resistance against neoliberal hegemony. In the best of all cases, a more growth-oriented course will be pursued in exchange for credible commitments in the field of ((structural reforms.’’ A worst-case scenario boils down to simply expelling reluctant partners from the eurozone. And this is the second consequence of the theoretical argument presented in this article. Any alternative strategy should first grasp the transnational nature of neoliberal hegemony to the full extent and subsequently take the form of a ((war of position’’ (see the contribution by Glasius) at the transnational level. The state-civil society configuration within the EU is simply too complex to allow for ((catastrophic incursions’’ at the national level.

Gramsci’s Persuaders: Studying Collective Mobilization

Andrea Ruggeri

Department of Political Science, University of Amsterdam

Often a fallacy is committed when in our historical-political analysis we do not have a right relation between what is organic (('organico'') or occasional (''occa-sionale’’)： in this way we tend to claim that causes that are just facilitating/contextual ("operanti mediatamente") are the immediate triggering factors, or immediate causes are the only causes [...] there are two fallacies, "economismo" and ((ideologismo’’, in the first we overuse the mechanic explanation, in the second we overestimate the individual and voluntary element. (Gramsci 2007:1580; Q13§17).

Never-ending debates have plagued the study of collective mobilization. Do people mobilize because structural characteristics (society, economics, culture, etc.) affect their behavior, or because the interests and features of single actors can trigger collective action? This has been the classic structure/agents divide. Or, do people mobilize for mundane payoffs or for ideas? In this case, the divide stresses explanations based on material interests versus ideational motivations. This article aims to make use of my reading of Gramsci to elaborate a research agenda on both analytical (structure/ gency) and explanatory (materialidea-tional) approaches to collective mobilization. I argue that reading Gramsci, in combination with Olson and Hirschman, can provide insights to bridge both material interests and ideational approaches through the role of political entrepreneurs. These actors play at mesolevel, analytically they are between an approach that conceptualizes actors as all equals (microapproach) and a structural one that understands actors as mere puppets of a material context (macroapproach). In this short piece, I link theoretical insights and suggest some possible mechanisms of mobilization.

I introduce a caveat about my use of Gramsci. For some readers, combining Olson and Hirschman with Gramsci may seem far from natural. I am aware that Gramsci did not embrace positivism or interest-maximizing individuals. However, his later work (Quaderni) signals a degree of ambivalence toward the positivist method, rather than the hostility apparent in his early work (see Garin 1997). For instance, he insists that every thinker follow certain methodological tenets including the following: (i) apply rigor and coherence when we deduct implications from our assumptions; (ii) always evaluate and assess the assumptions; and (iii) are the assumptions homogenous or is there any contradiction? (Gramsci 2007:1659; Q14§5). It must be granted that Gramsci explicitly criticized those trying to use economic models in order to study politics as ((playing with little formulas (‘formulette’)’’ (Gramsci 2007:1595; Q13§18). He was merciless with anyone who wanted to use for historical analysis covering-laws like in natural science, or to put it differently ((those using formulas to predict everything’’ (Gramsci 2007:1617; Q13§24). Nonetheless, he did mention and use as metaphor the theorem of proportions and the optimum principle (Gramsci 2007:1622; Q13§25). When studying ruling class behavior, moreover, he assumed them to ((seek the best equilibrium for political survival’’ as well as being utility oriented, ''in search of wealth’’(Gramsci 2007:1631; Q13§34).

Mobilization and Political Entrepreneurs

In this article, collective mobilization is defined as the action of an organized group aiming toward a political goal, or put it differently, when people collectively get organized to change the existing status quo. Therefore, rebellion and civil wars can be understood as classic examples, also in Gramscian terms, of collective mobilization. A recent evaluation of research on collective action highlighted the importance of political entrepreneurs and noted how often their role is called in cause, but stressed as well a lack of a coherent theory and empirical studies on them (Ahlquist and Levi 2011). Scholars from different social disciplines, in particular economics, political science, and psychology, sought to study how political entrepreneurs can overcome collective action problems, but largely did so by focusing on a few mechanisms or limited cases. For instance, some empirical studies consider the role of political entrepreneurs in local governments (Schneider and Teske 1992) or social movements (Nepstad and Bob 2006). Moreover, the study of civil war, an extreme case of collective mobilization, has either ignored the role of political entrepreneurs or merely assumed their existence without systematically investigating their role, importance, and influence (Kalyvas and Kocher 2007).

Several authors mention leaders or political entrepreneurs, but then they leave them aside as residual or undertheorized categories. For instance, Weinstein (2005) in his work on forms of mobilization and effects on violence suggests the importance of leaders in recruiting, providing either social or material rewards. Moore states that ((entrepreneurial leaders enter an exchange relationship with each group member where they provide a mechanism that guarantees the other individual’s contributions in return for that member’s contribution’’ (1995:440). And in an often-cited piece, Gates sees the leader of a rebel group as someone who ‘‘can offer an incentive scheme to a subordinate agent through a benefit stream for compliance and punishment for defection’’ (2002:116). Clearly, political entrepreneurs are often cited but not sufficiently theoretically explored. Hereafter, I elaborate on the role of political entrepreneurs.

Using Gramsci, but after Having Read Olson and Hirschman

Why people mobilize can be seen as a central puzzle in political science. This puzzle is more evident if explained through the logic of collective action (Olson 1965). Since mobilizing, or rebelling, can be quite risky (costly) and the final output of a mobilization in order to change or modify the existing status quo will be a public good, therefore a good that everyone will benefit from without any respect to individual participation, rational agents should not participate to collective action, and therefore, we should not see collective mobilizations. Indeed, we come across several mobilizations and rebellions everywhere in the world. Scholars have attempted to provide explanations why yet this happens; I highlight the most known explanations and then stress how an elaboration of Gramscian insights can be portrayed as material to develop further explanations. The classic Olsonian solution is based on selective incentives, namely selective benefits that only those that contribute to the mobilization get. Therefore, mobilization happens because, even though the final outcome of the collective action has a public good nature, those involved in the mobilization will benefit from additional goods or club goods.

Kalyvas and Kocher (2007) challenge the idea that in extreme cases of collective action, such as civil wars, the highest risk is to mobilize. In a nutshell, mobilizing and being member of either the rebels or the incumbents can be less risky, and therefore more rational, than non-mobilizing. This solution is not challenging an Olsonian selective-incentive solution, it is just challenging the assumption that non-mobilizing is always less costly than mobilizing. Hence, this elaboration of Olson just modifies some assumptions in order to explain why we see collective mobilization.

However, Hirschman (1982) twists Olson’s perspective and provides a bridge to lessons from Gramsci. In broad terms, two categories of utilities and different understandings of rationality can be highlighted: (i) goal utility; and (ii) process utility. Put it differently, instrumental versus non-instrumental strategies. If the Olsonian conceptualization is focused on the instrumental rationality that is based on goal utility, Hirschman provides a possible explanation to resolve the collective action problem based on non-instrumental strategies that are moved by process utility. Hirschman uses the concept of ‘‘striving,’’ which is a term that precisely intimates the lack of reliable relation between effort and result. He stresses that in a certain context, when means-end or cost-benefit calculus is impossible or highly uncertain, a goal utility is not feasible. His insight is based on the distinction of possible use of different strategies (instrumental versus non-instrumental) in different contexts where goal utility is less practicable than process utility. In fact, a strong affinity exists between instrumental and routine activities, on the one hand, and between non-instrumental and uncertain activities on the other hand. Indeed, this discussion between contextuality and dramatic changes, or non-routine events, implicitly echoes several arguments and assumptions of Gramsci (see Gramsci 2007:1578-1603; Q13§17-26). It should be stressed, in fact, that historically important and relevant collective mobilization happens when facing high level of uncertainty and not in ‘‘routine’’ periods. Hirschman’s reasoning, therefore, stresses that the fusion of striving and attaining, characteristic of non-instrumental action, leads to an opposite to the Olso-nian argument on collective action: ((Since the output and objective of collective action are […]a public good available to all, the only way an individual can raise the benefit accruing to him from the collective action is by stepping up his own input, his effort on behalf of the public policy he espouses. Far from shirking and attempting to get a free ride, a truly maximizing individual will attempt to be as activist as he can manage...'' (Hirschman 1982:86).

Hence, first Olson portrays collective mobilization as a puzzle and then Hirschman provides a solution to this puzzle highlighting the existence of different forms of utility and relative strategies according to different levels of uncertainty. Now it is possible to elaborate how Gramsci's insights on party organization, organic intellectuals, and hegemony can be interlinked with Hirschman's insights. I elaborate how and by whom non-instrumental strategies can be facilitated in order to trigger collective mobilization in the context of political uncertainty.

Gramscian Insights

Gramsci's analytical advice in the opening of this article suggests a balance between using context and individual role when studying politics. However, this is not merely a call for epistemological balance. If this is read in relation with further theoretical points, it is evident that the meso-analytical level, between macro-structure and micro-agents, has been employed and suggested by Gramsci. The clearest example is the role of political entrepreneurs within political movements. Here I aim to highlight three interconnected concepts in Gramsci's work that influenced my understanding on political entrepreneurs and collective mobilization: first, his discussion on political parties and their organization; second, the role of intellectuals; and finally, the concept of hegemony.

Gramsci, inspired by Machiavelli's works, analyzed the role of political parties, how they are organized, and what are their different components. Here we need to conceptualize party as the most organized form of collective mobilization. Gramsci asserts that political parties are constituted by three layers. The first layer, what usually we understand as grassroots, joins the organization (political party) for faith, for enthusiasm, without a critical approach and without unifying and organizing skills. Second, there is another layer that is ((the principal cohesive element [.], which can make efficient and powerful a group of forces that, without the organization of this layer, would be fruitless. This layer is characterized by a capacity of cohesion, centralization and discipline, but also of creativity. It is also evident that this layer alone cannot constitute the party'' (Gramsci 2007:1603; Q13§26). Then, there is a third layer that is between the first, the grassroots, and the second layer, the ruling class or leadership. All three layers are necessary for a party, but the organizational backbone is the second layer (Gruppi 1972:94). One of the crucial skills and instruments that this second layer, political entrepreneurs, can use to organize and mobilize is the often-cited term hegemony or the capacity to lead without coercion but with legitimacy (see Gramsci 2007:1603; Q13§26).

The members of this second layer, and therefore the difference between political entrepreneurs and leadership, are defined by Gramsci as ((intellectuals.'' As highlighted by Gruppi (1972:101), the expression that the ((intellectual is the mediator of consent'' has never been used explicitly by Gramsci, but it can summarize the role of intellectuals. Thus, intellectualpolitical entrepreneurs persuade and lead, and these actions are crucial components of hegemony. It must be noticed that the characteristics to define intellectuals for Gramsci are not those used by Marx, labor (manual work) versus intellectual work. The intellectual can be a worker or an illiterate sergeant if they are the organizer of hegemony (Gruppi 1972:103). Hence, the role of intellectuals, according to Gramsci, is to organize the hegemonic discourse for mobilization, ‘‘the role of mobilizer echoes Antonio Gramsci’s discussion of organic intellectuals’’ (Block 2003:733). In fact, their role is to make rational mobilizing through consent and not coercion, clearly in a hegemonic way. As a historical example, the Italian Communist Party developed the role of political entrepreneurs during the underground collective mobilization against the Naz^Fascist regime. Every single rebel band had a ‘‘commisario politico’’ who was in charge of political indoctrination and enrollment of fighters (Pavone 1991).

Final Remarks, Future Elaboration

An Olsonian approach has been used to open this brief theoretical exploration of collective mobilization. This deeply individualistic approach has been extended using Hirschman’s contribution on in-process utility. In turn, I introduced Gramsci’s insights precisely as a corrective to an overly narrow micro- and individualistic understanding of collective mobilization. The role of political entrepreneurs, or intellectuals in Gramscian terms, is crucial to understand the link between hegemony, organization, and collective mobilization. Political entrepreneurs organize consent and mobilize other actors linking material motivations to ideational reasons. They shift the political struggle over ‘‘divisible goods’’ to ‘‘indivisible principles’’ (Hanf 1993) making rational collective mobilization trough the shift from goal-oriented behavior toward utility in-process strategies. Political entrepreneurs are persuaders, and they clearly are different actors from the average actors.

In fact, if one of the solutions provided by the literature on collective action has been the role of political entrepreneurs (Popkin 1988, Lichbach 1995), this has been always suggested within a goal-utility framework, they triggered mobilization for their own final benefit. However, I highlighted the precious distinction of the Gramscian party layers: I suggest that political entrepreneurs use a goal-oriented utility but offer to the grassroots (first layer) a process utility. The role of political entrepreneurs is to make mobilization rational, shifting, under certain non-routine conditions, actors’ approach from goal-oriented utility to in-process utility. They are not leaders, they do not just supply the lead for the collective mobilization, they are creators of mobilization demand as well. They make collective mobilization happen.

Concluding, we should not forget that the Quaderni were notebooks, where Gramsci wrote book reviews, research questions, and future research projects. Most of his pages are not filled with coherent theories or empirical narratives; they are frequently filled with questions, most often provocative questions. This is the spirit of this contribution: not to close a debate on Gramsci and his actual contribution to the study of politics but to provoke and open one.

Gramsci’s Writings: Genuine versus Exaggerated Obstacles to Learning from the Prison Notebooks

Peter Ives

Department of Politics, University of Winnipeg

Many obstacles face any contemporary IR scholar (or any other type of scholar) when reading Gramsci’s Prison Notebooks. However, as a political theorist at the

edges of IR, I fear there is often too much focus on certain problems that are either specious or misplaced. This can obscure more fruitful grappling with those distinctive features of Gramsci’s writings that at once create difficulties but also hold the greatest potential in contributing to our analyses of our current conjunctures. I will argue that claims of fascist censorship, and the unfinished, fragmented, ambiguous, and supposed inconsistent nature of his notes are exaggerated obstacles (the classic example is Germain and Kenny 1998; see also Saurin 2008:30; and the debates discussed by Warnaar above). These can get in the way of significant engagement with two more genuine, difficult but potentially constructive obstacles; (i) Gramsci’s method aims not at creating general abstractions about human interactions that transcend history but rather at deep engagement with debates of his time and history that seem arcane to us; and (ii) the context of those debates are significantly different from ours (which matters more given the first point). I will argue that it is really only the first point here on which Gramsci is particularly distinct from most major thinkers, especially those that inform IR, including Machiavelli, Hobbes, and Marx. By working through these genuine ‘‘obstacles,’’ we come to the perspectives of Stuart Hall and Joseph Buttigieg, emphasizing Gramsci’s way of thinking or his method (Hall 1988:161-162; Buttigieg 1996:42-64), instead of the ‘‘gab bag’’ approach of lifting individual terms from his writings, such as ‘‘hegemony,’’ ‘‘organic intellectuals,’’ or ‘‘civil society.’’ I will conclude with a brief account of my own attempt to use Gramsci’s way of thinking, to analyze the advent of ((global English,’’ a phenomenon that arose well after Gramsci’s death.

Of course, we should never neglect the historical conditions and hardships of fascist prison under which Gramsci composed his Prison Notebooks. But there is little evidence for the often-repeated claim that Gramsci was using a ‘‘code’’ to avoid the censors (for example, Germain and Kenny 1998:8) in any more than a superficial sense. Even Quintin Hoare and Geoffrey Nowell Smith’s phrasing in their preface to the most influential English anthology that Gramsci’s key concepts are ((usually masked under innocuous sounding titles’’ (Hoare and Smith 1971:xii) exaggerates the point. Reconstructing the precise timing of particular notebooks, it is clear that there is no relationship between when Gramsci was or was not employing these supposed ‘‘codes’’ and the degree of surveillance that he was experiencing. On the contrary, there are many good interpretive reasons that explain his choices of terms (Thomas 2009:102-110; Green 2011:388-393).

As a political theorist engaged in texts and bodies of ideas as key objects of analysis, my starting point is that questions of the unfinished and unpublished nature of key thinkers’ texts consistently play an important part in larger questions of interpretation, continuity, and consistency. Gramsci is no exception here. The Prince was not published during Machiavelli’s lifetime, although it did ‘‘circulate’’ widely with at least some changes. But I have yet to see a discussion of Machiavelli and realism that even addresses such issues. Gramsci himself noted that we need to be cautious about interpreting any unfinished and unpublished works, specifically Marx’s (Gramsci 1971:384; Q16§2). Nevertheless, incompleteness has not prevented scholars from taking The German Ideology, Grundrisse, or The Economic and Philosophic Manuscripts as important sources of coherent and important positions. There are innumerable Marxs, the early humanist, the Marx of Kapital, the Marx of the more historical and political writings, and so forth. Moreover, the differences in interpretations of Gramsci would seem to pale in comparison with the radical gap between the ‘‘realist’’ Machiavelli (most often rooted in The Prince) and the republican and humanist Machiavelli (often rooted in The Discourses of Livy but deeply tied to arguments about the relations among various texts). There are radically opposing readings of Plato, Hobbes, and Rousseau. Thus, to single Gramsci out on this score is unconvincing to me. Likewise, once we consider the changes or trajectory of a given thinker, we are met with problems of interpretive coherence. Foucault presents an obvious example. Even restricting ourselves to published works does not mean we have a definitive Foucault without troubling with how Madness and Civilization is incompatible with The History of Sexuality or the later writings. Even Gramsci’s warnings about interpreting Marx’s unpublished works seem too heavily reliant on coherency within published books.

It is really the style of Gramsci’s writings, being thoroughly engaged in debates that the reader is most often unfamiliar with, which poses the most significant obstacle (Glasius’ contribution offers a nice example). Even more than Marx’s most historical writings, Gramsci uses dense details of debates of his context in a manner that may seem arcane and irrelevant. This may be exacerbated by the unfinished, fragmented quality of his writings, but it is more profoundly connected to his method of engagement. In his comparison between Machiavelli and Marx, Gramsci insists ‘‘that there is no abstract (human nature’，fixed and immutable (a concept that certainly derives from religious and transcendentalist thought), but that human nature is the totality of historically determined social relations, hence a historical fact which can, within certain limits, be ascertained with methods of philology and criticism’’ (Gramsci 1971:133; Q13§1). Elsewhere, Gramsci argues against any notion of ((philosophy in general’’ (Gramsci 1971:326; Q11§12) and of ((‘pure’ spontaneity’’ (Gramsci 1971:196; Q3§48). Thus, Gramsci is consistently engaged in historical referents, debates, and controversies. His conception of the ((philosophy of praxis’’ is an attempt to reformulate ((common sense’’ by acting upon it (see Green and Ives 2009). So, engaging in systematic definitions and theoretical models that abstractly generalize human experience is contrary to his entire approach, his understanding of knowledge production, and its relation to political action. For these reasons, we can speculate that even had he completed and published his prison research project, it would not have been stripped of references to the particular obscure Italian debates. Given Gramsci’s absolute historicism as an approach, there is no textual solution to the problem of the twenty-first-century reader having to re-immerse herself in nineteenth- and early twentieth-century literatures and debates. But this is not an impossible task; on the contrary, it is the recommended approach to all great texts of social and political philosophy. It should not lead to what Adam Morton has criticized as ((austere historicism,’’ whereby texts are relegated to their historical contexts with seemingly no relevance for future period (Morton 2007:24-36). I will give one example below of the type of benefit it can produce. Gramsci’s method adds to the complexity of interpretation, but certainly should not be seen as a detriment to the contemporary relevance of his writings.

Debates about the status of Gramsci’s writings often seem to me to be a red herring masking the myriad of underlying debates about ((globalization,’’ the nation-state, economic changes, and the like. Comparing analyses of the world as viewed from a Sardinian Italian sitting in a fascist prison in the early 1930s and our world today opens the huge can of worms about changes in global capitalism, the nation-state system, and how we are to define '(globalization’’一debates we are all too familiar with, but which remain a quagmire, a quagmire that actually has little to do with the specificities of Gramsci’s writings save for his insistence that historical context matters a great deal. But this is the case because Gramsci’s concerns are much closer to ours than what is most apparent in Hobbes or Machiavelli and perhaps even Foucault. For example, Gramsci asks whether ((Americanism and Fordism’’ would constitute a new historical ((epoch’’ (Gramsci 1971:279; Q22§1), questions Foucault, Machiavelli, and Hobbes never raised.

To provide one example, I will turn to my own attempts to grapple with a phenomenon that I claim is incredibly significant to global politics (perhaps even IR) and is inadequately addressed by political scientists: that is, the advent of ((global English.’’ By ((global English,’’ I mean the fourfold increase in the use of English since 1950, especially by non-native speakers, around the world in all language domains (Ives 2010). Gramsci certainly did not write anything about this. It is true that Gramsci was trained in linguistics at the University of Turin. His professor, Matteo Baroli, was polemicizing against the neo-grammarians, the school from which Ferdinand de Saussure arose (Ives 2004b:43-53). He penned a critique of Esperanto in 1918 and in prison analyzed the standardization process of the Italian language. But as for the massive spread of English, its causes and political ramifications, Gramsci has not a word. What I find invaluable in Gramsci’s prison writings is a refusal to root language in the human mind like Chomsky, some idealized notion of communicative reason like Habermas, or any other transcendental or non-political faculty or conception (Ives 2004a). What distinguishes Gramsci from the other major players in the various ((linguistic turns’’ is his connection between linguistics as a source of metaphors for cultural and political analysis and seeing language as a terrain upon which political struggle is defined and fought. Unraveling seemingly arcane Italian debates on Esperanto helped me understand and criticize Daniele Archibugi’s cosmopolitanism and the metaphorical role of Esperanto within it (Ives 2010). While many who critique ((global English’’ as imperialism make specific reference to Gramsci’s ((hegemony,’’ Gramsci’s rejection of a general ((human nature’’ and insistence on seeing languages as historical, human institutions leads us to more complex and nuanced terrains (Ives 2006, 2009). Had I found in Gramsci some clear pronouncement that I could extrapolate to determine whether ((global English’’ was a positive or negative development, his contribution would have been more limited. If I could have ((applied’’ a set of Gramscian concepts, the result would have been much less insightful. But from his approach to the inherently historical and political character of languages as human institutions, I have both been able to critique more narrowly sociolinguis-tic approaches (Ives 2006) and come to see how the increase in English usage by non-native speakers is inherently tied to global capitalism, inextricable from state education and language policy, but also a space of cooperative resistance and global struggle (Ives 2009). Indeed, if we look at how Gramsci uses metaphors from linguistics such as ((esperantism’’ to refer to positivistic mind-sets, or Franco Lo Piparo’s contention that the very conception of "hegemony’’ is rooted in a linguistic concept (Lo Piparo 1979; although I argue that Lo Piparo overstates the case, Ives 2004b:8n8), we can see the potential richness of the interactions between linguistics and political analysis.

Perhaps most useful in terms of methodological issues of the pertinence and applicability of his writings to our circumstances is Gramsci’s discussions of ((translation’’ and ((translatability.’’ Gramsci understood translation not as a mechanical action, as one would ((apply Gramsci’’ to our current conditions, but as a complex interaction, an active process (see Ives 2004b; Frosini 2010; Lacorte 2010).

References

Ahlquist, John S., and Margaret Levi. (2011) Leadership: What It Means, What It Does, and What We Want to Know About It. Annual Review of Political Science 14: 1-24.

Baker, Gideon. (2002) Civil Society and Democratic Theory: Alternative Voices. London: Routledge. Barkin, J. Samuel. (2003) Realist Constructivism. International Studies Review 5 (3): 325-342.

Benda, Vaclav, Milan Simecka, Ivan M. Jirous, Jiri Dienstbier, Vaclav Havel, Ladislav HejdAnek, Jan Simsa, and Paul Wilson Eds. (1988) Parallel Polis, or an Independent Society in Central and Eastern Europe: An Inquiry. Social Research 55: 1-2.

Bieler, Andreas, and Adam Morton. (2001) The Gordian Knot of Agency—Structure in International Relations: A Neo-Gramscian Perspective. European Journal of International Relations 7 (1): 5-35.

Block, Fred. (2003) Organizing versus Mobilizing. Perspective on Politics 1 (4): 733-735.

Bobbio, Norberto. (1988) Gramsci and the Concept of Civil Society. In Civil Society and the State, edited by John Keane. London: Verso.

Buttigieg, Joseph. (1996) Introduction. In Prison Notebooks, volume 1, edited by Antonio Gramsci and Joseph Buttigieg. New York: Columbia University Press: 1-64.

Chomsky, Noam, and Edward Herman. (1988) Manufacturing Consent: The Political Economy of the Mass Media. New York: Pantheon Books.

Cohen, Jean, and Andrew Arato. (1992) Civil Society and Political Theory. Boston: MIT Press.

Cox, Robert. (1981) Social Forces, States and World Orders: Beyond International Relations Theory. Millennium: Journal of International Studies 10 (2): 126-155.

Cox, Robert. (1983) Gramsci, Hegemony and International Relations: An Essay in Method. Millennium: Journal of International Studies 12 (2): 162-175.

Cox, Robert. (1999) Civil Society at the Turn of the Millennium: Prospects for an Alternative World Order. Review of International Studies 25 (1): 3-28.

Donaldson, Mike. (2007) ‘‘Gramsci and Class,’’ Research Online Papers, University of Wollongong.

Available at:    http://ro.uow.edu.au/cgi/viewcontent.cgi?article=1146&context=artspapers.

(Accessed November 23, 2012.).

Foucault, Michel. (1977) Discipline and Punish: The Birth of the Prison. New York: Pantheon Books.

Frosini, Fabio. (2010) On ‘‘Translatability'' in Gramsci’s Prison Notebooks. In Gramsci, Language and Translation, edited by Peter Ives and Rocco Lacorte. Lanham: Lexington.

Garin, Eugenio. (1997) Con Gramsci. Roma: Editori Riuniti.

Gates, Scott. (2002) Recruitment and allegiance: Microfoundation of Rebellion. Journal of Conflict Resolution, 46(1), 111-130.

Germain, Randall, and Michael Kenny. (1998) Engaging Gramsci: International Relations Theory and the New Gramscians. Review of International Studies 24: 3-21.

Gramsci, Antonio. (1971) Selections from the Prison Notebooks, trans. and edited by Quintin Hoare and Geoffrey Nowell Smith. London: Lawrence and Wishart.

Gramsci, Antonio. (2007) Quaderni dal Carcere. Torino: Giulio Einaudi.

Green, Marcus. (2011) Rethinking the Subaltern and the Question of Censorship in Gramsci's Prison Notebooks. Postcolonial Studies 14 (4): 387-404.

Green, Marcus, and Peter Ives. (2009) Subalternity and Language. Historical Materialism 17: 3-30.

Gruppi, Luigi. (1972) Il Concetto di Egemonia in Gramsci. Roma: Editori Riuniti.

Hall, Stuart. (1988) The Road to Renewal: Thatcherism and the Crisis of the Left. London: Verso.

Hanf, Theodor. (1993) Coexistence in Wartime Lebanon: Decline of a State and Rise of a Nation. London: Centre for Lebanese Studies in association with I.B. Tauris.

Hardt, Michael, and Antonio Negri. (2004) Multitude: War and Democracy in the Age of Empire. New York: Penguin Press.

Harvey, David. (2005) The New Imperialism. Oxford: Oxford University Press.

Havel, VAclav, John Keane, and Steven, Lukes. (1985) The Power of the Powerless: Citizens against the State in Central-Eastern Europe. London: Hutchinson.

Hirschman, Albert. (1982) Shifting Involvements: Private Interest and Public Action. Princeton, NJ: Princeton University Press.

Hoare, Quintin, and Geoffrey Nowell Smith. (1971). Preface. In Gramsci (1971).

Holman, Otto. (2012) Business as Usual? Informal EU Governance and Alternative Methods of Policy-Making. In International Handbook on Informal Governance, edited by Thomas Christiansen, and Christine Neuhold. Cheltenham: Edward Elgar: 314-332.

Howell, Jude, and Jenny Pearce. (2001) Civil Society and Development: A Critical Exploration. Boulder: Lynne Rienner.

Ives, Peter. (2004a) Gramsci’s Politics of Language. Toronto: University of Toronto Press.

Ives, Peter. (2004b) Language and Hegemony in Gramsci. London: Pluto Press.

Ives, Peter. (2006) ‘Global English': Linguistic Imperialism or Practical Lingua Franca. Studies in Language and Capitalism 1: 121-141.

Ives, Peter. (2009) Global English, Hegemony and Education: Lessons from Gramsci. Educational Philosophy and Theory 41 (6): 661-683.

Ives, Peter. (2010) Cosmopolitanism and Global English. Political Studies 58: 516-535.

Jackson, Patrick, and Daniel Nexon eds. (2004) Constructivist Realism or Realist-Constructivism? International Studies Review 6 (2): 337-341.

Kalyvas, Stathis, and Matthew M Kocher. (2007) How ‘‘Free’’ Is Free Riding in Civil Wars? World Politics 59: 177-216.

Katz, Hagai. (2006) Gramsci, Hegemony, and Global Civil Society Networks. Voluntas, 333-348.

Konrad, George. (1984) Antipolitics. London: Quartet Books.

Lacorte, Rocco. (2010) Translatability, Language and Freedom in Gramsci’s Prison Notebooks. In Gramsci, Language and Translation, edited by Peter Ives, and Rocco Lacorte. Lanham: Lexington.

Lichbach, Mark. (1995) The Rebel's Dilemma. Ann Arbor: Michigan University Press.

Lipschütz, Ronald. (2005) Globalization, Governmentality and Global Politics: Regulation for The Rest of Us? London: Routledge.

Lo Piparo, Franco. (1979) Lingua Intellettuali Egemonia in Gramsci. Bari: Laterza.

Mattern, Janice. (2004) Power in Realist-Constructivist Research. International Studies Review, 6 (2): 343-346.

Michnik, Adam. (1985) Letters from Prison and Other Essays. Berkeley: University of California Press.

Moore, William. (1995) Rational Rebels: Overcoming the Free-Rider Problem. Political Research Quarterly 48 (2): 417-454.

Morton, Adam. (2007) Unravelling Gramsci. London: Pluto.

Nepstad, Sharon, and Clifford Bob. (2006) When Do Leaders Matter? Hypotheses on Leadership Dynamics in Social Movements. Mobilization 11 (1): 21-42.

Olson, Mancur. (1965) The Logic of Collective Action. Cambridge: Harvard University Press.

Paterson, William E. (2011) The Reluctant Hegemon? Germany Moves Centre Stage in the European Union. Journal of Common Market Studies 49: 57-75.

Pavone, Claudio. (1991) Una Guerra Civile. Saggio Storico Sulla Moralita Nella Resistenza. Torino: Bollati Boringhieri.

Popkin, Samuel. (1988) Political Entrepreneurs and Peasant Movements in Vietnam. In Rationality and Revolution, edited by Michael Taylor. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.

Saurin, Julian. (2008) The Formation of Neo-Gramscians in International Relations and International Political Economy. In Gramsci, Political Economy, and International Relations Theory, edited by Alison Ayers. Basingstoke: Palgrave.

Schneider, Mark, and Paul Teske. (1992) Toward a Theory of the Political Entrepreneur: Evidence from Local Government. American Political Science Review 86: 737-747.

Scott, James. (1990) Hidden Transcripts: Domination and the Arts of Resistance. New Haven: Yale University Press.

Sterling-Folker, Jennifer. (2002) Realism and the Constructivist Challenge: Rejecting, Reconstructing, or Rereading. International Studies Review 4 (1): 73-97.

Taylor, Rupert, Ed. (2004) Creating a Better World: Interpreting Global Civil Society. Bloomfield: Kumar-ian Press.

Thomas, Peter. (2009) The Gramscian Moment. Leiden: Brill.

Van der Pjl, Kees. (2007) Nomads, Empires, States. London: Pluto Press.

Weffort, Francisco. (1983/1989) Why Democracy? In Democratizing Brazil: Problems of Transition and Consolidation, edited by Alfred Stepan. New York: Oxford University Press.

Weinstein, Jeremy. (2005) Resource and the Information Problem in Rebel Recruitment. Journal of Conflict Resolution 49 (4): 598-624.

Wright, Erik O. (1996) The Continuing Relevance of Class Analysis—Comments. Theory and Society 25: 693-716.

this distrust?

Finally, perhaps Brandenbergcr pushes his arguments about russocentrism too far. He acknowledges tensions, contradictions, and dualities among notions of internationalism and of russocentrism. Perhaps these contradictions and dualities would have made an interesting and revealing focus.

Still, the book is an ambitious and extensive study which provides a major contribution to the surprisingly understudied and insufficiently understood, yet crucial theme of ideology under Stalin, especially through the war years and beyond. His presentation of the controversy and scandal surrounding the History of the Kazakh SSR and of the Short Course on the History of the USSR are fascinating. Brandenbergcr is to be highly commended for wrestling through an enormous amount of extremely varied material and shaping it into a coherent and accessible argument and study,

Tracy McDonald

McMaster University

Peter Ives, Gramsci 's Politics of Language: Engaging the Bakhtin Circle and the Frankfurt School (Toronto: University of Toronto Press, 2004).

The last 30 years have seen an explosion of writings on Antonio Gramsci in almost all social science and humanities disciplines - so much so that short of fresh applications of a ’Gramscian' method to the study of specific contexts, one might conclude there is little new to say about GramscPs thought itself Yet a newly adapted theoretical reading of Gramsci's ideas is exactly what Peter Ives strives to present in Gramsci rs Politics of Language. What results is not just another book on Gramsci, but rather a unique reading of Gramsci's work through a wide-ranging interdisciplinary engagement with history, linguistics, and Marxist philosophies of language, culture, and social and political thought. Ives investigates the connection between Gramsci's linguistic and political concepts by simultaneously explaining the way they relate internally throughout Gramsci's thought, historically contextualizing the linguistic debates Gramsci had with his contemporaries, and bringing his particular reading of Gramscian political and linguistic philosophy into a theoretical dialogue with the works of other influential (but unknown to Gramsci) Marxist theorists of the era.

The book's overarching argument focuses on proving that the ideas Gramsci developed in his early training in linguistics and his engagements with Italian language politics, are comp 1 ementary to (and influenced) the cultivation of his better known contributions - hegemony, organic intellectuals, the war of manoeuvre/war of position, the philosophy of praxis - more commonly asso-ciated with Gramsci's later studies of history, culture, and politics. Ives develops three concepts central to Gramsci's philosophy of language 一'normative grammar/ * spontaneous * or ' immanent' grammar, and 'translation' - and explains their relevance to Gramsci's linguistic and political projects. This is a significant and well-argued contribution to an under-discussed area of Gramsci scholarship. However, Ives aspires to something much more ambitious than to prove the straightforward but important observation that Gramsci's theories of language and poiitics are interconnected. Complementing his basic argument is the development of a uniquely Gramscian theory of language that is unlike the implicit treatments of language by other Marxist thinkers and also subtly different than those theories of specifically Gramscian-influenced thinkers such as Raymond Williams and Stuart Halt On this front, Ives brilliantly coins the term 'vernacular materialism/ A play on 4vulgar Marxism' and a response to essentialist and economistic readings of Gramsci, this nuanced and versatile phrase emphasizes the important elements of the Gramscian theory of language for which Ives argues. This includes the observation that language is more than a set of isolated, formal linguistic elements and consequently the science of language should practice contextual 'living' philology; an emphasis on the role of 'filith' and the "vernacular* in political praxis; and, most importantly, the argument that there is a direct connection between discourse and Marxist concerns, leading to the claim that any investigation of language must be bound up with issues of power and social control. What develops is a theory that has more positive implications for theorizing spaces of resistance than those offered by the Frankfurt school.

Underpinning Ives's main argument is a complex attempt to translate Gramsci's fragmentary theories into a productive dialogue with theories of language and politics of other neo-Marxist thinkers including Milhail Bakhtin, Valentin Voloshinov, Pavel Medvedev, A^lter Benjamin, Theodor Adorno, Max Horkheimer, and Jürgen Habermas. What is notable about this project is that it does not merely systematically compare Gramsci with these thinkers but uses them “to cast Gramsci 's particular emphases in greater relief... [and] connect his perspective to contemporary issues in social thought" (100). Thus the book is not just another reading of Gramsci, but also a collection of insights into the other theoretical works with which it engages; these insights are linked by penetrating questions pinpointing issues that continue to be relevant to us today. For example, in chapter one Ives presents the problem of the formation of a 'collective popular will' and reads Gramsci fbr an answer to how t4homo-geneity and multiplicity [are] transformed into a collective unity" (36). In chapter two Ives addresses this question by tracing the similarities between Gramsci and Valoshinov in order to better substantiate and understand the implications of Gramsci's theory of language as it connects interactions between individual and cotlective agency. Engaging Bakhtin, the problem is intelligently reframed and asked as "can Gramsci\ hegemony be dialogical in Bakhtin's sense?" (54). What follows is less an explication of Gramsci through Bhaktin and more a unique elucidation of Bhaktin's own theories through Gramsci. These types of engagements occur throughout the latter half of the book and readers looking for a traditional analysis of Gramsci, or for a basic political-linguistic explication of his work, will likely complain that these theoretical ventures distract from the original argument. Such readers» however, should not abandon the book but focus their attention on the first half which is more than capable of answering their questions. However, the latter half remains a well-organized demonstration of the implications of Ives *s basic argument, and theorists from a wide range of academic disciplines will appreciate the insightful readings and theoretical connections it makes.

One should note that the book is based on Ives' doctoral dissertation and inevitably inherits some of the stylistic problems that are typical of the genre. Being very scholarly, as well as designed to meet the requirements of a dissertation, it can sometimes be technically dense. The potentially more serious varieties of this problem are counteracted by the fact that, for the most part, Ives perceptively demonstrates what is at stake in the debates he presents and clearly situates his observations in the context of past studies. But, conversely, some complex arguments, such as Benjamin's idea of allegory as a structuring principle of language and history, are explained but oversimplified. These seemingly contradictory criticisms result from the ambitious layering of Ives' argument, which is both a strength and a weakness. For example, the theoretical conversations in the chapter on Gramsci and Benjamin are tricky to follow. This is not due to lack of clear explanation but because Ives introduces so many interconnected ideas that some important observations remain underdeveloped. Each of his chapters not only tackles thinkers upon which many full-length books have been written, but also develops intriguing readings and applications for the study at hand, introducing many arguments that are worth expanding into larger works. Inevitably the book thus raises unanswered questions, but the fact that Ives gestures toward unexplored possibilities and prudently leaves them in play means that readers are stimulated to think further about the current relevance of his claims without losing sight of his main arguments.

Lastly, Ives makes an important observation about translation that also applies to his own work: ^translation aims at changing the languages involved, both the source language and the target language”(133). Dialogically reading Gramsci against other works is a process of translation that transforms both works in question. Academics might wonder if Gramsci's work has been too favorably translated in support of Ives' ai^ument However, given the unorganized and fragmentary state of Gramsci's prison notebooks, anyone seriously considering this claim can easily be accused of begging the question. It is more interesting to consider how the translator is implicated in, and what he or

she contributes to, the translation« What does this work say of Ives himself? Acting a$ translator, IvesT own thoughts and opinions inevitably influence the material with which he has worked. The clarity of his arguments, the insight with which they are accompanied, and the connections he makes between theories indicate he has the potential to produce promising theoretical works. In the future, it will be particularly interesting to see if Ives attempts to 'translate' or operationalise his theories for the site-specific contexts of contemporary social movements.

Jana Lee Chcmeski

Wolfson College, Oxford University

Carl Freedman, The Incomplete Projects: Marxism, Modernity, and the Politics of Culture (Middletown, CT: Wesleyan University Press, 2002).

Today, cultural domains are at the forefront of political debate. In the United States, right-wing commentators claim great liberal conspiracies in Hollywood and in the media while on the left, critics have felt it necessary to launch a radio station co counter right-wing talk radio. In Canada we see these issues play out over opinions about the CBC and regarding funding to university programmes in the arts. In The Incomplete Projects, the Marxist literary critic Carl Freedman argues that in light of the current unprecedented economic and political dominance of capitalism, culture ts a domain that offers an opportunity fbr Marxists to think politically again. It is here, drawing on Marx, that Freedman offers the study of culture as a strategy to destabilize right-wing dominance.

The book is separated into two parts. The first is more theoretical, serving to situate the rest of the essays as part of three u'Incomplete Projects." The first of Freedman's incomplete projects is capitalism. Capitalism is incomplete because it has not “hit the wall" of environmental destruction or revolution which Marxists have long predicted. Because capitalism continues to exist, Marxism continues to be essential for understanding the world today and thus represents the second incomplete and ongoing project The final incomplete project is modernity. Freedman asserts that while modernity can most easily be defined as the era dominated by the capitalist mode of production, capitalism is an economic category, and as such, Marxism can, at best, problematize the economic dimension of modernity. Thus Freedman legitimizes using Jiirgen Habermas and other theorists outside of the Marxist canon to explore questions of culture.

The second part of the book is an empirical demonstration of the theoretical directions of the first. Collected here are seven previously published essays

Italian philosophy of language
Felice Cimatti
Università della Calabria

fèlice.cimatti@gmail.com

A language doesn’t have to be definitely poetic, but one that is definitely mathematical cannot help being ugly and lifeless. The best of all languages is the one that can be both poetic and mathematical, and contain indeed all the degrees that range between the two extremes (Leopardi, Zibaldone, 2013, p, 332).

Abstract In this paper the distinctive characteristics of the Italian philosophy of language (IPL) are delineated. It is not only Italian philosophers who have constructed such a philosophical tradition. The Italian philosophy of language has a long history (a tradition which probably began with Dante); it is based on a very broad and comprehensive concept regarding the nature of human language. In respect to other traditions of philosophy of language (mainly Anglo-American analytic philosophy, hermeneutics and semiotics, and critical theory), the Italian tradition considers language to be at the same time a natural and a social phenomenon. From this point of view, the basic theoretical source of IPL is an 'anthropological stance'. But it is worth stressing that in the IPL, the conception of human biology includes ideas from anthropology, sociology, psychology (and perhaps psychoanalysis as well). Therefore when an IPL philosopher speaks of 'language' s/he refers to this broad and stratified field of phenomena. Exactly in this sense, IPL connects itself to the very peculiar Italian political and intellectual history. Following Wittgenstein, the IPL slogan could be this one: to study a language means to study a form of life, that is, at the same time a biological entity (a life) and a socio-historical one (a form).

Keywords: Italian philosophy, language and languages, biological stance, society, human body, immanence

1. A peculiar Italian tradition
Despite some important differences between them, for a long time the primary contemporary philosophical traditions - Anglo-American analytic philosophy, hermeneutics and critical theory - shared a common presupposition: the absolute centrality of language. All these traditions considered language as the most important philosophical category, both as an object of analysis and as a theoretical tool of analysis. In the Anglo-American analytic tradition, for example, a description of the human mind was impossible without taking into account language: in a certain sense mind and language were considered synonymous (Davidson 1982; Rorty 1981; 1992; Dummett 2014). Hermeneutics tried to describe the whole of human experience through the linguistic notion of 'interpretation' (RICOEUR 1981; GADAMER 1989). In critical theory and deconstructionism, the main object of analysis is language and writing (Derrida 1974; Culler 1982). What is less acknowledged is that a very similar presupposition was held by the first 'wave' of cognitive science: Jerry Fodor’s The Language of Thought, for example, considered the human mind literally to be made of a peculiar language, what he called 'mentalese' (Fodor 1975). These ways of thinking of language have recently changed (Martin, Heil 1999; Ferraris 2012; Gabriel 2014); actually it seems that the philosophical epoch in which language was the predominant notion it has been simply reverted to the previous situation, where it was only considered as a means of communication. Take the case of 'speculative realism' (Meillassoux 2008), which purports that human thinking can access reality as it is, independently of any act of subjectivity. That is, an absolute - i.e., a reality absolutely separate from the subject - can be thought by the subject. The problem immediately arises of how to successfully put the role of language in brackets while categorizing reality. Such a consideration does not at all imply that language is the main or unique agent of human categorization; it simply stresses that to speak of 'reality' as if we could have access to it without any mediation, seems hardly possible. The problem is that if the 'linguistic turn' largely 'overestimated' the role of language in human experience, now the 'ontological turn' equally 'underestimates' its role.

In fact, according to ESPOSITO (2010), in respect to this 'dominant role' assigned to language, italian philosophy always has considered language from a broader anthropological perspective. in the italian philosophical tradition - which is influenced at least by Dante (Lo Piparo 1983), Machiavelli, Vico, Leopardi (Gensini 1984), Manzoni, and Gramsci (Lo Piparo 1979, 2014) - language is not considered as a self-sufficient phenomenon63. italian philosophers always have placed language into human empirical praxis and life. While in the previously mentioned three philosophical traditions, language is a more basic category, that is, a theoretical category which explains the whole of the human experience, this is not the case in the Italian philosophical tradition. That means that the characteristic IPL tradition did not properly pass through the 'linguistic turn' (Agamben 1982; Eco 1984; Vecchio 1996; De Carolis 1989; Cimatti 2014); exactly for this historiographical reason the Italian tradition is free from any 'sense of guilt' with respect to nonlinguistic reality; therefore, it has no theoretical sin to be forgiven. From this point of view, any project involving the naturalization of language (e.g. Locke 2009) for IPL is not at all new or surprising. At the same time, any language naturalization project based on the idea that 'nature' is a synonymous with 'material reality' is considered by IPL to be extremely reductive (and fundamentally mistaken) (e. g. MILLIKAN 2004). A project to naturalize language literally means to attach linguistic meaning to some material (neurological) entity; the main problem with such a process is that the notion of causality is simply unfit to account for the richness and variety of language phenomena (Cimatti 2004). Therefore, according to IPL one cannot describe language reality without taking into account its social and institutional reality.

As I have just explained, In this paper I will not simply concentrate on Italian philosophers of language (because there are many important Italian philosophers of language who do not recognize themselves in this specific Italian tradition, e. g. Marconi 1997; Violi 1997; Fabbrichesi 200664; Leonardi 2007; Picardi 2009; RAYNAUD 2010; SINI 2012; at the same time there have been not Italian philosophers who equally adhered to IPL; for example Prieto 1976; Danesi 1993; Trabant 2004). in this paper i will concentrate on the italian philosophers of language who inscribe themselves in this ancient and still vital tradition. Therefore, from this point of view iPL is only partially analogous to such a tradition which has been recently defined as 'Italian theory' (Gentili 2012), that is mainly concerned with political theory.

2. Anthropological stance
The basic idea of iPL is that language has to be considered from a broader socio-anthropological perspective. The first and most important consequence of this theoretical presupposition is that to study human language firstly means to study human biology because there would be no language if the human body did not have the physiological and neurological features it actually has (Liuzza et al. 2010; Ferretti 2012). But in order to delineate the specific characteristics of human language, it is also necessary to compare them with nonhuman animal languages (Cimatti 2002; Gensini, Fusco 2009; Bucchi, Gensini 2014). That is, the first feature of the tradition we are delineating here is a 'biological stance' with respect to language. in the Anglo-American analytic tradition (as well as the other two traditions), this fundamental aspect of language has long been completely neglected; it is worth noticing that when this original defect was recognized, this tradition adopted a very narrow and impoverished view of what effectively constitutes human biology.

Take the exemplary case of cognitive scientist Steven Pinker’s crude account of human language: «language is not a cultural artifact that we learn the way we learn to tell time or how the federal government works. Instead, it is a distinct piece of the biological makeup of our brains» (Pinker 1994: 18). What does it really mean to say that language is not a cultural artifact? Does it make any difference if someone is born in Italy or England? Pinker speaks of language without any other specification, but actual human beings do not speak the language, they speak Italian or English. Pinker places language in the brain, as if we do not articulate linguistic sounds with the lungs and the tongue (and the feet that sustain our body). But it is the whole body which makes use of language, a body which uses language in order to do something, an action that in turn depends on what society deems worth doing and thinking, and so on. According to IPL all these elements are pertinent and necessary in order to construe a comprehensive (and adequate) theory of human language65. On the contrary, Pinker’s idea of language (and of biology of language) is extremely limited: speaking of a language instinct «conveys the idea that people know how to talk in more or less the sense that spiders know how to spin webs» (ibid). The problem here is not the zoological analogy (typically IPL involves discussions of language and different animal species: cf. Cimatti 2002; Lo Piparo 2003; Gambarara 2006; De MAURO, 2008); the problem is that such an analogy is simply mistaken. Spiders spin webs for specific and precise biological causes: their survival depends on such webs. This is not the case with human languages. Human beings use languages for a (probably infinite) variety of reasons. Here a brief list of language uses taken from Wittgenstein’s Philosophical Investigations:

Consider the variety of language-games in the following examples, and in others:

Giving orders, and acting on them

Describing an object by its appearance, or by its measurements

Constructing an object from a description (a drawing)

Reporting an event a speculating about the event

Forming and testing a hypothesis

Presenting the results of an experiment in tables and diagrams a Making up a story; and reading one Acting in a play singing rounds Guessing riddles

Cracking a joke; telling one

Solving a problem in applied arithmetic

Translating from one language into another -

Requesting, thanking, cursing, greeting, praying

(Wittgenstein 2009： I, § 23).

It is misleading to assert that each one of these language uses responds to some precise biological function. A biological approach to human language, as is the case with IPL, implies taking into account the idea that human biology has characteristics different from other species. If an alleged naturalistic study of human language requires that human linguistic behavior be considered the same as spider web behavior, then it is not naturalistic at all. On the contrary, the IPL biological stance implies a consideration of all human activities that are more or less explicitly connected to language. Perhaps this is IPL’s main distinctive character: a separate entity——'language'——doesn’t exist in isolation from the whole of human social and political life. Take the case of praying. This is a linguistic activity, obviously, but if one really wants to understand its anthropological value, one cannot consider prayer simply as a particular kind of utterance. A philosophical analysis of praying which limits itself only to the question of the truth or falsity of these kind of utterances is mean and meaningless (cf. Aristotle De Interpretatione: 16b33). To understand a prayer, or a joke, or an insult (Piazza 2012), one has to consider the function it assumes within the “language game” it is part of.

The IPL biological stance means that the object of analysis is never language on its own. IPL looks for the various and complicated ways human bodies interact with language and with themselves and nature. The anthropological thesis is that there is not a human being that is completely outside language (VIRNO, 2003). Such a thesis doesn’t mean that language is the ultimate ground of human life; on the contrary, it asserts that language cannot exist without human bodies; it asserts that language is made of our flesh and blood. For a long time Anglo-American analytic philosophy concentrated on a single aspect of this broad field of biological activities: the connection between language and reality, that is, the question of truth or falsity of linguistic expressions (Devitt, Sterelny 1999). In fact, Wittgenstein’s list of examples clearly shows that only in a fraction of the 'language games' the question of truth (or falsity) poses itself; for the vast majority of the games —— those implicated in the most important and significant human activities: religion, art, literature, ethics, play and so on —— such a question cannot be posed, or at least has to be posed with the question of the success or failure of a linguistic move, a question which is much broader than the classical truth/falsity dichotomy (e. g. Austin 1955; Piazza 2005; Lo Piparo 2007)66. Therefore, according to IPL, following its biological stance, the question of truth or falsity of language is not the unique question that philosophy of language has to tackle. More specifically, such a quiet IPL attitude in respect to the question of truth and falsity derives from a more general presupposition: it is never the case that language can stand in isolation from human reality and nature (PRODI 1977). That is, the concern about the relationships between language and reality can pose itself only if one believes that language is an isolated entity. But such a belief is exactly what characterizes classical Anglo-American analytic philosophy. The IPL biological stance always has avoided such an unnatural conception. Language is part of nature, in particular, of human nature, with the specification that human biology is inseparable from its social and material life.

More generally, a truly biological stance means to take into account the vary basic and apparent fact that human beings do not speak the language; on the contrary, human beings speak an enormous variety of languages (De Mauro 1982; Formigari 2007). This is what Darwin stressed, in the famous last lines of The origin of species, when he wrote of the life’s 'endless forms'. According to IPL, a naturalistic account of human language implies the same Darwinian stance which means paying particular attention to different languages and language games, because a single abstract entity called 'language' doesn’t exist in nature67.

3. Language and society
«The mistake,» wrote De Mauro in one of the founding IPL books, «consists in affirming and believing that words and sentences mean something by themselves: on the contrary, the meaning—through words and sentences—stays in human beings» (De Mauro 1965: 31-32). Language is not an autonomous entity; there is not semantics without human beings and all their interests, drives and needs. The main goal of this book is to criticize any theory of language which somewhat presupposes the separateness of language—or of a singular component of language, like syntax (Chomsky 1957)—from the rest of the human body and human practices. In respect to Noam Chomsky, for example, De Mauro’s criticism is exactly (and solely) about the autonomous status of grammar in Chomsky’s linguistic (and philosophical) theory. Chomsky recently has denominated this internal and innate component of language I-Language, in respect to the E-Language, the external one (Chomsky 2000).

The theoretical problem that such a language model implies is explicit in this passage from Steven Pinker: «knowing a language, then, is knowing how to translate mentalese into strings of words and vice versa» (Pinker 1994: 82). Pinker’s model is simple and direct: first there is a string in mentalese (which corresponds to Chomsky I-Language); then such a string is translated into a string in E-Language, an auditory string that anyone can listen to; finally such a string is newly translated into the listener’s mentalese (mentalese — external language — mentalese). It really seems very simple. But: what ensures the speaker’s intention is understood by the listener? Take the case that a speaker says the sentence p to a listener. The scheme now is: mentalese_S (speaker) — external language — mentalese_L (listener). The problem now is apparent: there is no correspondence between what the speaker intended to say with what the listener actually understood. The problem is that mentalese_S , mentalese_L. According to Pinker, linguistic meaning de facto is a private entity. Therefore, if the meaning of a linguistic sentence is private, then no one can understand it, simply because it is private (that is, it is not public). some might say that according to Pinker the mentalese is innate: maybe it is, but innate does not mean equal (all living human beings have in their own skull a brain: but every brain is profoundly different from any other human brain: SPORNS et. al. 2005). On the contrary, mutual linguistic comprehension requires that speaker and listener speak the same language: a situation where any speaker speaks only his/her own language makes mutual linguistic comprehension impossible. This is by no means a novelty: one of the founders (nowadays almost completely forgotten) of analytic philosophy, Ludwig Wittgenstein, presented such a problem as the 'private language argument':

Let’s imagine the following case. I want to keep a diary about the recurrence of a certain sensation. To this end I associate it with the sign "S” and write this sign in a calendar for every day on which I have the sensation.---I first want to observe

that a definition of the sign cannot be formulated. But all the same, I can give one to myself as a kind of ostensive definition! How? Can I point to the sensation? Not in the ordinary sense. But I speak, or write the sign down, and at the same time I concentrate my attention on the sensation and so, as it were, point to it inwardly. But what is this ceremony for? For that is all it seems to be! A definition serves to lay down the meaning of a sign, doesn’t it? Well, that is done precisely by concentrating my attention; for in this way I commit to memory the connection between the sign and the sensation. But “I commit it to memory” can only mean: this process brings it about that I remember the connection correctly in the future. But in the present case, I have no criterion of correctness. One would like to say: whatever is going to seem correct to me is correct. And that only means that here we can’t talk about ‘correct’ (WITTGENSTEIN 2009: § 258).

The internal sign 'S' is a mentalese sign. Take the case that today I fixed the reference of such a sign. The day after I want to use such a sign again. How can I be sure that I’m correctly using the sign 'S'? How can avoid using it incorrectly? I cannot find help in a dictionary, because my own mentalese is a private language, therefore no dictionary can exist (if a dictionary could exist, the mentalese would be a normal public language). The main consequence of this paradoxical situation is that no one can understand a private language. Therefore no communication is possible using a private language. Language is public68. This is one of the major theses of IPL: «an idea of the faculty of language as a social praxis and of a language as both an instrument and a product of such a praxis» (De Mauro 1965: 179).

It is important to note a terminological distinction which English lacks: in Italian (and in other Romance languages) there is an important difference between linguaggio and lingua, a distinction which is somewhat lost in English, because in both cases the word language' is used. Linguaggio is the biological component of language, the faculty of language; lingue are the various and changing languages spoken each one in a given community for a certain time span. There cannot be linguaggio without lingue and vice versa (Formigari 2007; Carapezza 2008). This is not a terminological point only: in this distinction one can find the peculiar IPL sensibility for the social and historical differences (De Mauro 1963), frequently absent in Anglo-American analytic philosophy of language. At the same time this very distinction—which allows IPL to pay attention to both the biological socio-historical sides of language—marks the deep difference of IPL in respect to hermeneutics, which frequently neglected the natural, that is, the non-historical aspect of language. As an example of this double blindness, take the case of the famous 1971 debate between Chomsky and Foucault (Davidson 1997; Chomsky, Foucault 2006). In this debate Foucault stressed the historical side of language and human nature, completely neglecting the biological; on the other side, Chomsky exactly did the opposite, completely neglecting the social/historical side. Both Chomsky and Foucault missed an opportunity. Instead, in the IPL tradition both sides of language are taken into account (Lo Piparo 2003; Mazzeo 2003; Liuzza et al. 2010; Virno 2013).

It is important to note that there is no contradiction between the IPL attention to the social dimension of language along with a similar attention to the biological dimension. Here it is important to remember the peculiar Italian history: from Dante to Pasolini, one of the main political, literary and philosophical question has been the so-called questione della lingua, that is, the political problem of how to give Italian people one common language and one government. In such a question is mixed together history and geography, anthropology and religion, economics and politics. Such a tradition transmits to IPL an absolutely unique sensibility for the multiple aspects of language, which is still quite unusual in actual times. For this reason it is not uncommon in the IPL tradition to find scholars with a significant linguistic background, such as Tullio De Mauro, or to find philosophers who write technical linguistic works (for example, Lo Piparo 1984; Gambarara 1990; Simone 1995; Pennisi 1996; Vecchio 2001).

From this point of view another effective distinction between IPL and in particular the recent Anglo-American philosophy of language that is always closer to cognitive sciences than it is to linguistics, is regarding what constitutes the 'new' scientific field of biolinguistics (Jenkins 2000; Boeckx, Piattelli-Palmarini 2005). In effect in the cognitive tradition, biolinguistics means more and more biology (and frequently, genetics) of language. From this perspective, all the non-biological characteristics of language are increasingly neglected. This comes back to Chomsky’s basic distinction between 'i-Language' and 'E-Language', where the 'essence' of language is the first one (Hauser et al. 2002). Such an approach implies coming back to the idea of language as a separate entity (consequently, according to the Chomskyan School the origin of language is a mystery; cf. Hauser et al. 2014). But if language and linguistic meaning returns to the brain from society and human practices Wittgenstein’s 'private language argument' becomes meaninful again. This is a recurrent problem of any theory of language that postulates the priority of any presumed internal language—it is impossible to take into account the very possibility of mutual communication between human bodies (Stehr Nielsen 2008).

The peculiar attitude of iPL towards the social dimension of language and biology clearly shows itself in the way it faces the very intricate and somewhat ambiguous notion of biopolitics (Foucault 2010). Foucault’s distrust of biology and naturalism lead to current interpretations that risk a dangerous biologization of politics and human life. The underlying idea is that politics and language have nothing to do with biology and nature. on the contrary, the relationship of human biology and language is at the very center of IPL (Cimatti 2000; Lo Piparo 2003; Virno 2003); the roots of language lie in the rock of biology. The peculiarity of iPL is that such a biological stance includes anthropology and sociology. The basic idea is that a human being is 'naturally artificial' (Agamben 2002; Cimatti 2004; De Carolis 2008; Virno 2013), that is, a human is an animal who needs to construe its own habitat, therefore, an animal whose survival is not guaranteed by its instincts (the peculiar human instincts are what sigmund Freud called 'drives', that is, instincts impregnated with language; cf. Piazza 2004: Cimatti 2012; Mazzeo 2012).

From this point of view iPL can at the same time sustain the naturalness and the artificiality of language. starting from this awareness, recently some iPL philosophers tried to imagine a way to think of politics from a biolinguistic (in the larger sense just presented) point of view. The basic idea is that in human nature a balance exists between biology and culture, a balance that in recent times has been compromised, economically and ecologically (Cimatti 2011), a compromised balance that in the future could represent a major risk to the whole humanity (Pennisi, Falzone 2011; Pennisi 2014). What is worth emphasizing is that such 'political' applications of the IPL biological stance follow an ancient Italian literary and philosophical tradition of considering linguistic questions as political questions and vice versa69. According to IPL, a separation of philosophy of language from politics and anthropology is not only de facto impracticable, because there is no separation between the human being who speaks from the one who acts politically, but it is also theoretically wrong. This is probably the major difference among IPL and actual Anglo-American philosophies of language, which is based on quite rigid disciplinary separations between different aspects of the unitary field of language. From an IPL point of view, for example, considering pragmatics as a separate field of inquiry, as if a study of language were possible where pragmatics doesn’t occupy a central position, is hardly conceivable.

4. Langue and form of life
Obviously IPL authors of reference are not only philosophers (in particular not only Italian philosophers), but also scientists (Darwin), linguists (Benveniste, Jakobson, Hjemslev), anthropologists (Durkheim, Mead, Lévy-Strauss, De Martino), psychologists and psychoanalysts (Vygotskij, Freud, Lacan). However, there are two figures of modern thought that occupy a special role in the IPL tradition (a third one is Aristotle; however his presence in IPL is less widespread; cf. LO PIPARO 2003): the linguist Ferdinand de Saussure and the philosopher Ludwig Wittgenstein. Saussure5 Cours de linguistique générale (1916)70 is based on a fundamental tripartition: faculté de langage, langue and parole. The faculty of language is the biological background which makes the acquisition of a particular language possible. In particular, this is a species-specific Homo sapiens neuroanatomical capacity (Minett, Wang 2005). But such a biological foundation is not at all sufficient to account for language competence as a whole. Here is the basic difference in respect to Chomsky distinction between 'competence' and 'performance' (Chomsky 1965). Chomsky’s competence is logically and theoretically independent from performance, that is, one 'knows' (pay attention to this verb: language is a matter of knowledge, not of actual 'use，the language even if s/he doesn’t actually use it. Performance is simply language put in use: a car is always a car even if it remains in a garage. On the contrary, according to Saussure, the faculty of language alone is not language. In order to be a speaking body, a human being needs two other factors beyond the faculté de langage: a particular language (langue), such as Italian or English, and an actual act of speaking (parole). A language is a social and historical entity which is spoken in a particular space and in a particular time (therefore, the famous Saussurian distinction between synchrony and diachrony derives from the biological distinction between an innate potentiality and the actual realization of such a potentiality; this is a situation very similar to what one can finds in biology: there is no such a thing as 'life', there is 'this' living being right now; Page 2010; Minelli, Bonato 2012; Cleland 2012).

A language is greater than the total sum of all its speakers: this means that a language is an 'institution', a special object that is in some sense autonomous and independent in respect to the human bodies which make use of it (a brief parenthesis: social ontology is born with Durkheim and Saussure). If a language didn’t have an 'autonomous' existence, the communication would be impossible. In such a case every speaker would speaks her/his own language, that is, her/his own private language. As a consequence no one would understand each other. The connection between language and society is therefore intrinsic: a language is by necessity a social entity. The third element of this term is the actual act of speaking, what Saussure called parole. This is the actual human body, who uses the language into the real world for a specific purpose, in a determinate social and cultural context. These three elements constitute the whole of language: the biological component, the social component, and the bodily component. A description of language which excludes one of these three elements is not realistic or biologically adequate.

The interconnection between the biological, the social, and the bodily linguistic dimensions makes explicit the reason why IPL pays so much attention to the socio-biological fact of the diversity of languages. There is an important linguistic tradition (the reference tradition in Anglo-American analytic philosophy of language) that maintains that despite the apparent enormous diversity of languages, in fact they are basically the same (Baker 2001). That is, diversity of languages is only mere appearance. In fact, there is 'one' language, deeply rooted in our brain; therefore, Italian, French and all other languages of the world (including all the extinct ones) do not properly exist. In fact Charles Darwin considered 'diversity' of life forms the most astonishing biological fact (from this point of view, one could consider the actual insistence to uniformity like residue of a religious perspective). But the point is even more relevant. According to IPL, the diversity of languages and cultures is the basic characteristic of Homo sapiens life (Fitch 2001; Lo Piparo 2010; Sidnell, Enfield 2012), like the starting point of an effectively Darwinian biology is the diversity of life forms. Diversity of languages is not a problem to solve (as it seems the case with Chomsky’s principles and parameters theory; CHOMSKY, Lasnick 1993), on the contrary, is a very fact of human life. This is not something from which a good scientific theory has to be freed, it is the unavoidable starting point of every plausible theory of human nature (Lo Piparo 1999).

Saussure’s theory of sign is very famous, but very rarely correctly understood. According to Saussure a sign is a bifacial entity, as a coin or a sheet of paper; one side is called signifier (signifiant), the other side signification (signifié). What is crucially worth stressing is that both entities are linguistic entities. Such a specification should be uncontroversial for the signifier, on the contrary the signification is frequently considered a psychological entity (as if 'signification' were simply a synonymous of 'thought' or 'idea'). The common and trivial translation of Saussure signijfié is 'meaning'. But meaning is a psychological entity, it is a thought. This is a simplistic translation because it would be completely uninteresting to maintain that a sign connects a thought to an expression: this is the common sense conception of language. On the contrary, Saussure shows that a sign connects linguistic entities (for this reason he rejected his previous idea that a sign connects a concept and an image acoustique, because he wanted to avoid the risk of a psychological theory of language). A linguistic sign is made of language entities. That is, the signifier is not a meaning (a psychological and nonlinguistic entity). Such an unusual conception helps Saussure to explain the puzzling fact that different languages categorize the 'same' entity in different ways. An English 'child' occupies a semantic field that in Italian is articulated by a 'bambino' or a 'bambina': but the object remains the same71. Saussure observed not only that different languages use different signifiers for the 'same' object; what is much more important is that different languages categorize the world in different ways. What is an object in one language is an event in another; what is a unitary entity in one language is a composed one in another language. Languages are arbitrary; that means that every language contains a peculiar 'ontology' (that means that the way one thinks of ontology is influenced by the language s/he thinks in). Such a conception of language doesn't mean that when an English man watches a child he is 'seeing' something different from what an Italian man is seeing when he is watching a 'bambino'; at the same time it is scientifically proven that speaking a certain language influences the automatic associations we use to categorize our experience (Tan et al. 2008; Thierry et al. 2009; Lupyan et al. 2010). Saussure's arbitraire du language is the main consequence of the difference he poses between signifié and concept, that is, between the plane of language and the plane of nonlinguistic thought. Language arbitrariness is very different from the trivial idea according to which the same object receives different names in different languages (this is the conventionality of language). Therefore, Saussure's idea is that language deeply influences the way human bodies think. From this point of view language is much more a cognitive device than a means of communication, it is thinking/acting more than mainly communication.

Ludwig Wittgenstein is the other main IpL reference. Nowadays, the effective reception of Wittgenstein's philosophy is somewhat puzzling (Tripodi 2011). Even if he is still frequently quoted in places such as Usa and Great Britain's philosophy departments, it seems that Wittgenstein is no longer really considered as a philosopher who has something relevant to say about the problems our current philosophers discuss. The enormous body of Wittgenstein literature seems somewhat analogous to Shakespeare's or Tasso's literature; Wittgenstein seems to have become a philosopher that only historians of philosophy study. Take the previous mentioned case of 'mentalese' in cognitive science. From a Wittgenstein point of view, this is a perfect example of private language (Marconi 1996); therefore, a theory of language and cognition based on such a theoretical mistake would be impossible. What saddens more is not that psychologists do not understand the seriousness of such a problem (remember Wittgenstein’s definition of psychology: «experimental methods and conceptual confusion» Wittgenstein 2009: XIV, § 371), but that a philosopher does not even realize it. That means that Wittgenstein is no more considered a philosopher to work with every day. This is a peculiarity of Anglo-American analytic philosophy, which is probably explicated by the spell of science that such a philosophy has been under.

On the contrary IPL has shown a strong relationship with Wittgenstein’s thought from its very beginning (De Mauro, 1965), a link which has grown over the years (Lo Piparo 2003; Cimatti 2007; Virno 2010; Mazzeo 2013). Wittgenstein is the modern philosopher who more than any other tried to consider language as a 'natural' phenomenon. Wittgenstein doesn’t speak of language in general, he always speaks of language in actual use, what he defined as a “language-game” in order “to emphasize the fact that the speaking of language is part of an activity, or of a form of life” (Philosophical Investigations, § 23). Even if Wittgenstein never explicitly dealt with politics (Robinson 2009), the close connection he poses between language and human life makes him quite near to Italian philosophical tradition (ESPOSITO 2010). The kind of implicit politics IPL finds in Wittgenstein is humble and natural; it is human life made of power relations and language-games, bodies and practices. What is worth stressing is that such a natural politics comes first before any explicit form of government. Therefore, what IPL finds in Wittgenstein is a conception which includes in human nature language and praxis, politics and bodies, life and history. This is the reason why IPL does not consider biopolitics as an innovation of the last century: human nature is intrinsically bio-political.

5. Body and immanence
In the last few years a new topic is assuming a growing importance in IPL (Agamben 1982; Esposito 2014)72. While at first the central IPL theme was the relationship between language and society (De Mauro 1965), lately the problem has been how language directly affects and transforms the human body. The general IPL setting is unchanged, what is turned is the vantage point from which the relationship between language and body is taken into consideration (from this perspective it is worth remembering the peculiar attention the IPL tradition always has dedicated to the language of signs —— e.g., the gesture language of deaf people: cf. Russo Cardona, Volterra 2007). The recent technological and scientific global transformations always make it more difficult for a single body to resist the power of economics and politics (Esposito 2002; Foucault 2010). What all these forms of power have in common is precisely language: from the total pervasiveness of communication in modern life and politics to the eminently linguistic character of financial capitalism (Bryan, Rafferty 2006; Heller 2010; Shankar, Cavanaugh 2012), language is the primary impersonal agent a human body seeking freedom has to fight. This is not a paradigm change in IPL; it is more a switch in the focus of attention: from society to the actual living body (Cimatti 2013; 2014). A similar movement of thought occurred in French psychoanalyst Jacques Lacan (such a similarity is not at all casual, since Lacan shares with IPL a structuralist origin), whose theory during the years passed from the predominance of what he called the 'Symbolic Order' - that is, language (Lacan 2002) - toward a final emphasis on the Real, that is the actual body (Lacan 2005; Cimatti 2015).

The theoretical premise of such a final switch lies in Saussure’s idea of language. A langue is made of negative relations between words; each word’s semantic value is the total sum of the differences between it and all the other words in the langue. It is the power of negation and difference which literally holds together it:

on ne se pénétrera jamais assez de l’essence purement negative, purement dijférentielle, de chacun des éléments du langage auxquels nous accordons précipitamment une existence: il n’y en a aucun, dans aucun ordre, qui possède cette existence supposée — quioque peut-etre, je l’admets, nous soyons appelés à reconnaitre que, sans cette fiction, l’esprit se trouverait littéralement incapable de maitriser une pareille somme de differences, où il n’y nulle part à aucun moment un point de repère positif et ferme (SAUSSURE 2002: 64-65).

IPL conceives the langue quite differently; the langue is an institution which cannot exist if it is not connected to human lives and actual practices (De Mauro 1965, 1982). But in our time it is apparent that the linguistic dimension is increasingly assuming an almost independent reality. Take the case of financial capitalism: an entity like a 'derivative' is literally made of expectations and expectations of expectations, that is, it is made of 'numbers' and 'discourses': actually they all are linguistic entities (Pettit 2001; Maurer 2002; Searle 2005). In such a case language becomes an entity on its own, an autonomous entity which “makes decisions” about our very lives. While it "has” an effective power on human bodies (if the value of a derivative goes down, the risk of unemployment goes up), the contrary is not admitted (the derivative is an independent variable of the economic cycle, the human job is a dependent one). From this point of view Saussure’s quotation today is literally true (it is a paradox that a 'new realism' is appearing just in the time when financial - that is, 'linguistic' - capitalism is emerging all over the world; Marazzi 2008). Therefore, such a renewed centrality that the question of human body is assuming is coherent with IPL tradition that always has considered language problems political problems too, and vice versa.

As a consequence the question of body and immanence is now returning to the fore (Agamben 1999; 2014)73. The theoretical and anthropological question IPL poses itself is: how can an actual human body resist the overwhelming force of language? The basic idea is that language introduces transcendence into human life (Agamben 1982; Severino 1992; Cimatti 2013; 2015), that is, a separation between actual bodily lives on the one side and an abstract and theological world filled up by entities like 'mind' and 'thoughts', 'State' and 'private property', 'derivatives' and 'PIL' and so forth on the other. Take the case of the separation between mind and body, which is the origin of all other separations. It is a separation that nonlinguistic creatures do not know: a mouse is a living being that always lives where it actually lives. A mouse does not hope or regret something: its life is completely tied to what actually is happening to its own body. A mouse lives in the here and now. There is no logical space for a separation in a mouse body and a mouse mind. There is always one and just one body, the actual body of the mouse which lives in this actual world. On the contrary, a human being is separated in two very different entities: the mind and the body. A mind is nothing else than an entity who names itself as an 'I' (Dennett 1991; Cimatti 2000), while the body is what the 'I' names as 'my own body'. The very existence of "mind” implies that what once upon a time was a unitary organism that has been split into two parts: «in the very same moment a thing is named, it loses its own content, because it moves into the depthless space of sign. In such a way the moment language takes possess of the thing, it is the moment it is annihilated too» (ESPOSITO 2014: 54). Therefore when a thing enters into the space of language «it is transposed into a different dimension from reality» (ibid). If the 'I' is the scar that transcendence leaves on the human body, now the question poses itself of how imagining a way out of such a situation.

According to ESPOSITO (2014), for example, the first theoretical task is to deconstruct the very ancient metaphysical distinction between 'persons' and 'things'. This is the first distinction language introduces in human world, and into the very same human body. What Esposito aims to do is to define a new status of the body, where it is no longer «classifiable neither as a person nor as a thing» (ESPOSITO 2014: 76). Such a body would place itself beyond transcendent entities; therefore, it could live in a more inclusive way with the nature and the other bodies. According to Cimatti (2013) the movement beyond language aims toward a 'new' human body, which is no longer afraid of animality; a body which gave up to the 'I' because it no longer would be signed by transcendence. Finally, in his last book Giorgio Agamben tries to define the ancient/new concept of uso (use). Agamben’s attempt is to imagine a relationship between human beings and nature which is not based on destruction and consumption. Such a relationship is exactly the kind an 'I' cannot help to impose on nature, just as it is in charge over 'its' own body. The basic idea is that in a relationship of use, neither the user nor the used should be separated one from the other; at the very same time the user makes use of itself during the use, as the used makes use of the user while being used: «in the use man and world are in a relationship of absolute and reciprocal immanence; therefore, «subject and object are deactivated and make inoperative [inoperosi], and, in the place of them, it is use which takes over as a new figure of human praxis» (Agamben 2014: 55).

6. Concluding remarks
While the 'linguistic turn' largely 'overestimated' the role of language in human experience and in philosophy, nowadays we are seeing an 'ontological turn' that widely 'underestimates' its role. In this paper a different philosophical tradition is presented, Italian philosophy of language, which is deeply rooted in Italian history and culture. The basic assumption of such a tradition is that one cannot understand human language without taking into account the inextricable connections it entertains with the 'whole' set of characters of species-specific human form-of-life. According to IPL a separate object like 'language' does not exist in isolation from human society and history. A typical Italian philosopher of language does not describe a single aspect of language - semantics, for example - without also considering (explicitly or implicitly) at least its pragmatic and socio-political aspects. According to IPL tradition there is not such a thing like 'philosophy of language' as a separate object of inquiry. IPL promotes a non ‘specialist5 view of human language: «Thus we realize ever more clearly that our optimum goal is the observation of language in all its complexity. To paraphrase Terence’s saying, Linguista sum; linguistici nihil a me alienum puto» (JAKOBSON 1971: 555).

References
AGAMBEN, Giorgio (1982), Il linguaggio e la morte. Un seminario sul luogo della negatività, Einaudi, Torino.

AGAMBEN, Giorgio (1999), Potentialities. Collected Essays in Philosophy, Stanford University Press, Redwood City, CA.

AGAMBEN, Giorgio (2001), Infanzia e Storia. Distruzione e origine dell'esperienza e origine della storia, Einaudi, Torino.

AGAMBEN, Giorgio (2002), L'aperto. L'uomo e l'animale, Bollati Boringhieri, Torino.

AGAMBEN, Giorgio (2014), L'uso dei corpi, Neri Pozza, Vicenza.

ARISTOTLE (2002), Categories and De Interpretatione, J. L. Ackrill (ed.), Clarendon Press, Oxford.

AUSTIN, John (1955), How to do things with words, Clarendon Press, Oxford.

BAKER, Mark C. (2001), The Atoms of Language: The Mind's Hidden Rules of Grammar, Basic Books, New York.

BOECKX, Cedric, PIATTELLI-PALMARINI, Massimo (2005), «Language as a natural object, linguistics as a natural science», in Linguistic Review, n. 22, pp. 447-466.

BORGHI, Anna M, CIMATTI, Felice (2010), «Embodied cognition and beyond: acting and sensing the body», in Neuropsychologia, n. 48(3), pp. 763-773.

BRYAN, Dick, RAFFERTY, Michael (2006), «Money in capitalism or capitalist money?», in Historical Materialism, n. 14, pp. 1-75.

BUCCHI, Sergio, GENSINI, Stefano, (2014), eds., Darwiniana. Evoluzione e comunicazione, ETS, Pisa.

CAPAREZZA, Marco (2008), La distinzione tra lingua e linguaggio e la riflessione wittgensteiniana su Sprache, in BARNI, M., GIULIANA, F. (eds.), Il logos della polis, Aracne, Roma, pp. 193-208.

CHOMSKY, Noam (1957), Syntactic structures, Mouton, The Hague.

CHOMSKY, Noam (1965), Aspects of the Theory of Syntax, The MIT Press, Boston.

CHOMSKY, Noam (2000), New horizons in the study of language and mind, Cambridge University Press, Cambridge.

CHOMSKY, Noam, LASNIK, Howard (1993), Principles and Parameters in Comparative Grammar, in JACOBS, J., VON STECHOW, A., STERNEFELD, W. (eds.), Syntax an International Handbook of Contemporary Research, vol. 1, de Gruyter, Berlin, pp. 506-569.

CHOMSKY, Noam, FOUCAULT, Michel (2006), The Chomsky-Foucault debate, The New Press, New York.

CIMATTI, Felice (2000), La scimmia che si parla. Linguaggio, autocoscienza e libertà nell "animale umano, Bollati Boringhieri, Torino.

CIMATTI, Felice (2002), Mente e linguaggio negli animali. Introduzione alla zoosemiotica cognitiva, Carocci, Roma.

CIMATTI, Felice (2004), Il senso della mente. Per una critica del cognitivismo, Bollati Boringhieri, Torino.

CIMATTI, Felice (2007), Il volto e la parola. Psicologia dell'apparenza, Quoflibet, Roma-Macerata.

CIMATTI, Felice (2011), La vita che verrà. Biopolitica per Homo sapiens, Ombre Corte, Verona.

CIMATTI, Felice (2012), «Psicoanalisi e natura umana», in Rivista di psicoanalisi, n. 2, pp. 477-490.

CIMATTI, Felice (2013), Filosofia dell'animalità, Laterza, Roma-Bari.

CIMATTI, Felice (2014), «Dal linguaggio al corpo», in Lo sguardo - Rivista di filosofia, n. 15(2), La differenza italiana, pp. 149-164.

CIMATTI, Felice (2015), Il taglio. Linguaggio e pulsione di morte, Quodlibet, Roma-Macerata. CLELAND, Carol (2012), «Philosophical problems about life», in Synthese, n.185(1), pp. 125-144.

CULLER, Jonathan (1982), On deconstruction: Theory and criticism after structuralism, Cornell University Press, New York.

DANESI, Marcel (1993), Vico, Metaphor, and the Origin of Language, Indiana University Press, Bloomington.

DARWIN, Charles (2009), The origin of species. By Means of Natural Selection, or the Preservation of Favoured Races in the Struggle for Life, Cambridge University Press, Cambridge, Ist. ed. 1859.

DAVIDSON, Arnold, (1997), ed., Foucault and his Interlocutors, University of Chicago Press, Chicago.

DAVIDSON, Donald (1982), «Rational animals», in Dialectica, n. 36(4), pp. 317-327.

DE CAROLIS, Massimo (1989), Diffidare del linguaggio. Verità e limiti del linguaggio nella tradizione filosofica, Edizioni Scientifiche Italiane, Napoli.

DE CAROLIS, Massimo (2008), Il paradosso antropologico, Quodlibet, Roma-Macerata.

DENNETT, Daniel (1991), Consciousness Explained, Little, Brown, Boston MA.

DE MAURO, Tullio (1963), Storia linguistica dell ,Italia unita, Laterza, Roma-Bari.

DE MAURO, Tullio (1965), Introduzione alla semantica, Laterza, Roma-Bari.

DE MAURO, Tullio (1982), Minisemantica de~i linguaggi non verbali e delle lingue, RomaBari, Laterza.

DE MAURO, Tullio (2008), Il linguaggio fra natura e stroria, Mondadori Università, Milano.

DERRIDA, Jacques (1974), Of grammatology, John Hopkins Uuniversity Press, Baltimore.

DEVITT, Michael, STERELNY, Kim (1999), Language and reality: An introduction to the philosophy of language, The MIT Press, Boston.

DUMMETT, Michael (2014), Origins of analytical philosophy, Bloomsbury Acedemic, London, Ist. ed. 1993

ECO, Umberto (1984), Semiotica e filosofia del linguaggio, Bompiani, Milano.

ECO, Umberto (1997), Kant e l'ornitorinco, Bompiani, Milano.

ESPOSITO, Roberto (2002), Immunitas. Protezione e negazione della vita, Einaudi, Torino.

ESPOSITO, Roberto (2010), Pensiero vivente. Origine e attualità della filosofia italiana, Einaudi, Torino.

ESPOSITO, Roberto (2014), Le persone e le cose, Einaudi, Torino.

FABBRICHESI, Rossella (2006), Costruzione del significato e orbita delle passioni. Alla ricerca della semantica, CUEM, Milano.

FABBRICHESI, Rossella (2012), In comune. Dal corpo proprio al corpo comunitario, Mimesis, Milano.

FERRARIS, Maurizio (2012), Bentornata realtà, Laterza, Roma-Bari.

FERRETTI, Francesco (2012), Alle origini del linguaggio umano. Il punto di vista evoluzionistico, Laterza, Roma-Bari.

FITCH, Tecumseh (2011), «Genes, Language, Cognition, and Culture: Towards Productive Inquiry», in Human Biology, n. 83(2), pp. 323-329.

FODOR, Jerry (1975), The language of thought, Crowell, New York.

FORMIGARI, Lia (2007), Introduzione alla filosofia delle lingue, Laterza, Roma-Bari.

FOUCAULT, Michel (2010), The Birth Of Biopolitics: Lectures At The Collège De France, 1978—1979, Palgrave Macmillan, New York

GABRIEL , Markus (2014), Fields of Sense: A New Realist Ontology, Oxford University Press, Oxford.

GADAMER, Hans-Georg (1989), Truth and Method, Sheed and Ward, London.

GAMBARARA, Daniele (1990), L'origine des noms et du langage dans la Grèce ancienne, in AUROUX, Sylvain (ed.) Histoire des idées linguistiques, vol. 1, Mardaga, Paris, pp. 79-97.

GAMBARARA, Daniele (2006), Come bipede implume. Corpi e ment del segno, Bonanno, Catania.

GENSINI, Stefano (1984), Leopardi linguista, Il Mulino, Bologna.

GENSINI, Stefano, FUSCO, Maria (2009), eds., Animal loquens. Linguaggio e conoscenza negli animali non umani da Aristotele a Chomsky, Carocci, Roma.

GENTILI, Dario (2012), Italian Theory. Dall'operaismo alla biopolitica, Il Mulino, Bologna.

HAUSER, Marc D., CHOMSKY, Noam, FITCH, Tecumseh (2002), «The Faculty of Language: What Is It, Who Has It, and How Did It Evolve?», in Science, n. 298, pp. 1569-1579.

HAUSER, Marc D., YANG, Charles , BERWICK, Robert, TATTERSALL, Ian, RYAN, Michael, WATUMULL, Jeffrey, CHOMSKY, Noam, LEWONTIN, Richard C. (2014), «The mystery of language evolution», in Frontiers in Psychology. Language Sciences, n. 5, pp. 1-12.

HELLER, Monica (2010), «The Commodification of Language», in Annual Review of Anthropology, n. 39, pp. 101-114.

JAKOBSON, Roman (1971), Selected Writings II. Word and Language, The Hague, Mouton.

JENKINS, Lylie (2000), Biolinguistics. Structure, development and evolution of language, Cambridge University Press, Boston.

LACAN, Jacques (2002), Écrits, Norton, New York.

LACAN, Jacques (2005), Le séminaire de Jacques Lacan : Livre 23, Le sinthome, Seuil, Paris.

LEONARDI, Paolo (2007), «Meaning and Context», in Lingue e linguaggio, n. 6, pp. 9-24.

LEOPARDI, Giacomo (2013), Zibaldone, Farrar, Straus and Giroux, New York.

LIUZZA, Marco T., CIMATTI, Felice, BORGHI, Anna M. (2010), Lingue, corpo, pensiero: le ricerche contemporanee, Carocci, Roma.

LOCKE, John (2009), «Evolutionary developmental linguistics: Naturalization of the faculty of language», in Language Sciences, n. 31(1), pp. 33-59.

LO PIPARO, Franco (1979), Lingua, intellettuali egemonia in Gramsci, Laterza, Roma-Bari.

LO PIPARO, Franco (1983), Dante linguista anti-modista, in LO PIPARO, F., ALBANO LEONI, F., GAMBARARA, D., SIMONE; R. (eds.), Italia linguistica: idee, storia, strutture, Il Mulino, Bologna, pp. 9-30.

LO PIPARO, Franco (1984), “La nazione, la campagna, la scienza e la lingua. Note sulla politica linguistica nella Sicilia del secondo Settecento”，in FORMIGARI, Lia (ed.), Teorie e pratiche linguistiche nell'Italia del Settecento, Il Mulino, Bologna, pp. 303-331.

LO PIPARO, Franco (1999), Il Mondo, le specie animali e il linguaggio. La teoria zoocognitiva del Tractatus, in CARENINI, M., MATTEUZZI, M. (eds.), Percezione linguaggio coscienza. Saggi di filosofia della mente, Quodlibet, Macerata, pp. 183-202.

LO PIPARO, Franco (2003), Aristotele e il linguaggio. Cosa fa di una lingua una lingua, Roma-Bari, Laterza.

LO PIPARO, Franco (2007), La proposizione come gnomone linguistico, in PETRILLI, R., FEMIA, D. (eds.), Il filo del discorso. Intrecci testuali, articolazioni linguistiche, composizioni logiche (Atti del XIII congresso nazionale della Società di filosofìa del linguaggio, Viterbo, 14-16 set. 2006), Aracne, Roma, pp. 47-63.

LO PIPARO, Franco (2010), Aristotele e Dante, filosofi della variabilità linguistica, in FORTUNA S., GRAGNOLATI, M., TRABANT J. (eds), Dante s Plurilinguism. Authority, Knowledge, Subjectivity, Legenda, Great Britain, pp. 83-95.

LO PIPARO, Franco (2014), Il professor Gramsci e Wittgenstein, Donzelli, Roma.

LUPYAN, G., THOMPSON SCHILL, Sharon L., SWINGLEY, D. (2010), «Conceptual Penetration of Visual Processing», in Psychological Science, n. 21(5), pp. 682-691.

MARAZZI, Christian (2008), Capital and language, The MIT Press, Boston.

MARCONI, Diego (1996), “Fodor, Wittgenstein e il linguaggio privato”，in EGIDI, R. (ed.), Wittgenstein e il novecento. Tra filosofia e psicologia, Donzelli, Roma pp. 199-208.

MARCONI, Diego (1997), Lexical Competence, The MIT Press, Boston.

MARTIN, Charles, HEIL, John (1999), «The Ontological Turn», in Midwest Studies In Philosophy, n. 23, pp. 34-60.

MAURER, Bill (2002), «Repressed futures: financial derivatives5 theological unconscious», in Economy and Society, n. 31(1) pp. 15-36.

MAZZEO, Marco (2003), Tatto e linguaggio. Il corpo delle parole, Editori Riuniti, Roma.

MAZZEO, Marco (2012), Melanconia e rivoluzione: antropologia di una passione perduta, Editori Riuniti Internazionali, Roma.

MAZZEO, Marco (2013), Le onde del linguaggio. Una guida alle “Ricerche filosofiche” Carocci, Roma.

MEILLASSOUX, Quentin (2008), After Finitude: An Essay On The Necessity Of Contingency, Continuum, London.

MILLIKAN, Ruth (1984), Language, Thought and Other Biological Categories, Boston, The MIT Press.

MINNETT, James, WANG, William S.-Y., (2005), eds., Language acquisition, change and emergence, Hong Kong University Press, Hong Kong.

MINELLI, Alessandro, BONATO, Lucio (2012), Diversity of Life, DOI: 10.1002/9780470015902.a0001518.pub3.

PAGE, Scott (2010), Diversity and Complexity, Princeton University Press, New York.

PULVERMÜLLER, Friedemann (2013), «How neurons make meaning: brain mechanisms for embodied and abstract-symbolic semantics», in Trends in Cognitive Sciences, in 17(9), pp. 458-470.

PENNISI, Antonino (1996), L "informatizzazione della cartografìa sociolinguistica. Italiano e dialetto nella Sicilia orientale, Latessa, Catania.

PENNISI, Antonino (2014), L'errore di Platone. Biopolitica, linguaggio e diritti civili in tempo di crisi, Il Mulino, Bologna.

PENNISI, Antonino, FALZONE, Alessandra (2011), Il prezzo del linguaggio: Evoluzione ed estinzione nelle scienze cognitive, Il Mulino, Bologna.

PETTIT, Noel (2001), The virtual reality of Homo 庆conomicus, in MÀKI, Uskali (ed.) The Economic Worldview, Cambridge University Press, Cambridge, pp. 75-97.

PIAZZA, Francesca (2004), Linguaggio, persuasione e verità. La retorica del Novecento, Carocci, Roma.

PIAZZA, Francesca (2005), «Vero e verosimile nel discorso retorico», in Segno, pp. 101-112.

PIAZZA, Francesca (2012), «Il conflitto verbale tra membri di uno stesso gruppo: il caso dell'Iliade», in Rivista Italiana di Filosofia del Linguaggio, n. 6(3), pp. 66-79.

PICARDI, Eva (2009), Le teorie del significato, Laterza, Roma-Bari.

PINKER, Steven (1994), The language instinct. How the mind creates language, Harper Perennial, New York.

PONZIO, Augusto (1970), Linguaggio e relazioni sociali, Adriatica Editrice, Bari.

PRIETO, Luis (1976), Pertinenza e pratica, Feltrinelli Bocca, Milano.

PRODI, Giorgio (1977), Le basi materiali della significazione,]! Mulino, Bologna.

RAYNAUD, Savina (2010), «La philosophie du langage en Italie face aux sciences du langage et aux études textuelles», in Histoire Epìstémologìe Langage, n. 10, pp. 1-10.

RICOEUR, Paul (1981), Hermeneutics and the human sciences: Essays on language, action and interpretation, Cambridge University Press, Cambridge UK.

ROBINSON, Christopher (2009), Wittgenstein and political theory, Edinburgh University Press, Edinburgh.

RORTY, Richard (1979), Philosophy and the Mirror of Nature, Princeton University Press, Princeton.

RORTY, Richard (1981), “Nineteenth-Century Idealism and Twentieth-Century Textualism”， in The Monist, n. 64 (2), pp. 155-174.

RORTY, Richard (1992), ed., The linguistic turn: Essays in philosophical method, University of Chicago Press, Chicago.

ROSSI- LANDI, Ferruccio (1968), Il linguaggio come lavoro e come mercato, Bompiani, Milano.

RUSSO CARDONA, Tommaso, VOLTERRA, Virginia (2007), Le lingue dei segni. Storia e semiotica, Carocci, Roma.

SAUSSURE Ferdinand de (1916), Cours de linguistique générale, Payot, Paris (Corso di linguistica generale, De Mauro, T. (ed.), Laterza, Roma- Bari, 1967).

SAUSSURE Ferdinand de (2002), Écrits de linguistique générale, Gallimard, Paris.

SEARLE, John (2005), «What is an Institution?», in Journal of Institutional Economics, n. 1(1), pp. 1-22.

SEVERINO, Emanuele (1992), Oltre il linguaggio, Adelphi, Milano.

SHANKAR, Shalini, CAVANAUGH, Jillian R. (2012), «Language and Materiality in Global Capitalism», in Annual Review of Anthropology, n. 41, pp. 355-369.

SIDNELL, Jack, ENFIELD, Nicholas (2012), «Language Diversity and Social Action: A Third Locus of Linguistic Relativity», in Current Anthropology, n. 53(3), pp. 302-333.

SIMONE, Rafele (1995), ed., Iconicity in Language, Benjamins, Amsterdam-Filadelfia.

SINI, Carlo (2012), Il sapere dei segni. Filosofia e semiotica, Jaca Book, Milano.

SPORNS, O., TONONI, G., KÖTTER, R. (2005), «The human connectome: A structural description of the human brain», in PLoS Computational Biology 1, e42 doi:10.1371/ j ournal.pcbi.0010042

STEHR, Nielsen K. (2008), The Evolution of the Private Language Argument, Ashgate, Aldershot, UK.

TAN Li H., CHAN Alice H. D., KAY Paul, KHONG Pek-L., YIP Lawrance K. C., LUKE Kang-K. (2008), «Language Affects Patterns of Brain Activation Associated with Perceptual Decision», in Proceedings of the National Academy of Sciences of the United States of America, in 105(10), pp. 4004-4009.

THIERRY, Guillaume, ATHANASOPOULOS, Panos, WIGGETT, Alison, DERING, Benjamin, KUIPERS, Jan- R., UNGERLEIDER, Leslie G. (2009), «Unconscious Effects of Language-Specific Terminology on Preattentive Color Perception», in Proceedings of the National Academy of Sciences of the United States of America, n. 106(11), pp. 4567-4570.

TRABANT, Jürgen (2004), Vco's New Science of Ancient Signs: A Study of Sematology, Routledge, London.

TRIPODI, Paolo (2011), Dimenticare Wittgenstein: Una vicenda della filosofia analitica, Il Mulino, Bologna.

VECCHIO, Sebastiano (ed.) 1996, Linguistica impura, Novecento, Palermo.

VECCHIO, Sebastiano (2001), La vera filosofia delle lingue. Manzoni linguista e semiologo, Sciascia Editore, Caltanissetta.

VIOLI, Patrizia (1997), Significato ed esperienza, Bompiani, Milano.

VIRNO, Paolo (2003), Quando il verbo si fa carne. Linguaggio e natura umana, Bollati Boringhieri, Torino.

VIRNO, Paolo (2005), Motto di spirito e azione innovativa, Bollati Boringhieri, Torino.

VIRNO, Paolo (2010), E così via all'infinito. Logica e antropologia, Bollati Boringhieri, Torino.

VIRNO, Paolo (2013), Saggio sulla negazione. Per un'antropologia linguistica, Bollati Boringhieri, Torino.

WITTGENSTEIN, Ludwig (1953) (2009), Philosophical Investigations, ANSCOMBE, G. E. M., RHEES, R. (eds.), ANSCOMBE G. E. M., HACKER P. M. S., SCHULTE, J. (trans.), Blackwell, Oxford.

Language, Inheritance, and Praxis in the Work of Antonio Gramsci
Michael Peterson

This essay is an attempt to explore how two moments in Gramsci’s thought inform one another to allow us to say something about not only praxis in general, but, specifically, about fUtural, intergenerational, or inherited praxis in particular. The need for such an account is, I think, evident to those of us living in the times we have inherited. As wealth continues to concentrate in the hands of fewer and fewer individuals the world over and as our global climate and environment becomes ever more strained and vulnerable due to the actions of economic and political actors, ourselves included, it is clear that however these crises are addressed in the present, the effects of both action and inaction must be taken up as relating to future generations. We presently existing individuals, communities, and organizations, can see that with a degree of remarkable consistency, there has been in our history an explicit lack of concern with the ways in which potential futures are constrained, determined, or limited by the actions of the present. Fukuyama’s famously myopic pronouncement of the ‘end of history,’ has been raised again in 2022 as the claim that the future no longer needs to be considered in its possible divergences from the present. Arch-capitalist and technological solutions to the issues of the present abound at every level. Indeed, and I have argued this elsewhere, intergenerational responsibility, when it is considered, is articulated almost without exception as only possible on the condition of a presumed continuity between the present and our futures.

I say almost without exception because there are a handful of figures in the tradition of Western philosophy that have explicitly aimed to take up intergenerational questions fully cognizant of the unpredictability of the future. Best known to many of us would be the work on futurity coming out of readings of Jacques Derrida. But—and this is my argument today— Antonio Gramsci also represents a significant figure in this tradition. From his earliest texts,

Gramsci’s distaste for positivist and deterministic reading of Marx all but required him to think the future in its vicissitudes. Today, I want to take up two such moments in Gramsci’s thought: first, Gramsci’s pre-carcel critique of utopianism by way of an articulation of a sort of logic of inheritance and universality, and second, Gramsci’s later elaboration of a theory of language and social action, tied to his critique of Esperanto and other invented languages. As the title of my paper suggests, I argue that what links these moments is a consistent appeal to a conception of the role of inheritance that opens the future to new developments.

Action, Inheritance, and Universality
To begin, let us look at Gramsci’s pre-prison critique of utopian thinkers. This occurs in the text “Three Principles and Three Kinds of Political Order,” from the single-issue journal La citta futura, published in February 1917. There, Gramsci articulates his critique of utopian thinkers on the basis that they have only been able to conceive of the future as particular settled collections of concrete details. These utopians have been unable to ground political action by way of appealing to these imaginary futures because as soon as one of these details fails to hold or becomes impossible, the action that that future was meant to inspire becomes pointless.

Gramsci’s argument works as follows: Every action requires a goal, a scopo, to direct action. He writes: “in order to act, man needs to be able to predict things, at least in part. It is impossible to conceive of the will as directed at something other than a concrete aim.”1 However, this scopo or aim cannot be a “single factual detail or a series of details” since “the concrete details of a system depend on so many causes that they finish up having no cause at all, and being entirely unpredictable.”74 75 In other words, when the future is imagined as a set of concrete details, action becomes impossible because these details are too contingent. Imagining a future as a given particular state of affairs cannot ground action because it is itself an appeal to mere contingency.

But Gramsci nonetheless insists that actions require an aim. So, what kind of aim can this be? Gramsci again: “It can only be an idea, or a moral principle. The inherent defect of utopias is this: believing that a vision of the future can be a vision of factual details, whereas it can only be a vision of principles, or of juridical maxims. Legal axioms (law and judgment are morality in action) are creations of the human will. If you want to give direction to men’s wills, you must give them as their aim the only thing that can be their aim; otherwise, after a first rush of enthusiasm, you will see them start drooping and fading away.”76

He rearticulates this critique of utopianism one year later, in II Grido del Popolo, writing: “Utopianism consists. in fact. in not being able to conceive of history as a free development, in seeing the future as a pre-fashioned commodity, in believing in pre-established plans.”77

Gramsci helpfully provides us with an example of what he means by political action undertaken with a principle as its aim by turning, as he often does, to the French Revolution and the political inheritance of Jacobinism. Here, the concrete political order that resulted from the bourgeois French Revolution is to be rejected utterly by the twentieth century proletariat insofar as it does not represent equality but a highly striated social hierarchy which laid the ground for the highly exploitative 19th and 20th century capitalist social forms that followed the Revolution. That is, if we attempt to evaluate the French Revolution on whether or not it established concrete states of affairs that allow for freedom and equality of all human beings, it is a failure. And, moreover, the legacy of the French Revolution could then be taken to be that such actions must result in failure and so it would be best not to try again.

However, Gramsci continues, insofar as the French Revolution is taken to have established principles of freedom and equality, it, as moment in history, can be inherited by future agents of political change even in its inadequacy, as it was during the Russian Revolution.

Hence Gramsci can write that the tenets of Jacobin liberalism “may be universal for the bourgeoisie, but they are not universal enough for the proletariat. For the bourgeoisie, they were ideals to be aimed at, while for the proletariat they are a starting-point for further developments.”78 The French Revolution really did instantiate a universal, but this universal was not fixed. What had been an end point becomes a starting-point. Let us then note two things about the version of this logic the young Gramsci provides for us in the context of a critique of utopian thinking. First, principles function as universal conditions for action insofar as they can be taken up and transformed across contexts. Their survival, we could say, is not a function of their being fixed, but, rather, a function of their being reinterpretable and transformable. Inheritance, then, does not refer to the mimetic repetition of the same, but rather a condition for new developments. In this sense, all principles are anachronistic. They are out of their proper time at the very moment that their universalism is concretely instantiated.

Second, this logic of survival or inheritance by way of transformation is opposed to a logic of self-same identity that would, by virtue of insisting on the identity of its contents, its ‘factual details,78 find itself both too fixed and so too contingent. In order for this particular set of details to hold, an infinite of contingencies would need to hold as well. The Russian Revolution could only inherit the principles of the French Revolution by taking them up and transforming them. It would be impossible for the Russian Revolution to merely fight the French Revolution again. And Gramsci will say the same of the Russian Revolution's inheritance of Marx’s texts.

Marx could not have predicted the factual details of the condition in Russia, and so inheriting Marx requires transforming Marx. On this point, the young Gramsci is consistent.

In order to see the sense in which Gramsci may retain this position into his later writings, we will now turn to his later work on language. The reason to emphasize language here is precisely because it is in the context of language that Gramsci articulates this almost contradictory logic of inheritance most strikingly.

Language, Metaphor, and Anachronism
In a long section in the Prison Notebooks on Nikolai Bukharin’s Theory of Historical Materialism: A Popular Manual of Marxist Sociology, Gramsci delivers one of his most straightforward presentations of his views on language. In Bukharin’s Popular Manual, the point is made that, in the works grouped under the heading of ‘historical materialism,5 the words ‘immanence5 and ‘immanent’ are used, but, Bukharin claims, this use is purely metaphorical.

Gramsci’s reply to this claim begins a rich discussion of language in general and metaphor in particular. Gramsci writes:

Fine. But is it explained what immanence and immanent ‘metaphorically5 mean? Why have these terms continued to be used and not replaced? Is it just through a revulsion against creating new words? Usually, when a new conception replaces a previous one, the previous language continues to be used but is, precisely, used metaphorically. The whole of language is a continuous process of metaphor, and the history of semantics is an aspect of the history of culture; language is at the same time a living thing and a museum of fossils of life and civilisations.79

This passage is striking for a number of reasons, but for our purposes let us notice that Gramsci’s description of language is initially seemingly contradictory, or, at least, asserts seemingly opposite characteristics. Language is at the same time a living thing and a museum of fossils. And, further, he has prefaced this claim by insisting that “The whole of language is a continuous process of metaphor.” We might think at first glance that formulations like these would be more at home in late-century deconstruction rather than in 1930s historical materialism.

In Notebook 7, Gramsci, again writing on Bukharin’s claim that the words “immanence” and “immanent” appear in Marx’s own writing only as a metaphor, writes: “All language is metaphor, and it is metaphorical in two senses: it is a metaphor of the ‘thing’ or ‘material and sensible object5 referred to, and it is a metaphor of the ideological meanings attached to words in the preceding periods of civilization” and goes on to approvingly cite Michel Bréal as a possible resource for semantic mutations of different words across time.80 The first sense Gramsci describes here is familiar to us as a work since at least Plato’s Phaedreus. Language imitates without becoming that thing it refers to. Unlike Plato, however, Gramsci does not here distinguish between speech and writing, collapsing both into the broad term ‘language,5 which we can take here to refer to the totality of representational articulations of things other than themselves.

Gramsci argues that forgetting this metaphorical and historical basis for language leads to a variety of errors. Chief among these is the assertion that language could, ideally, if not today, be purified of metaphor. Gramsci refers to this as the “error of regarding languages as fixed or universal.”81 In the context of Bukharin, this would amount to the error of thinking that “immanence”，for instance, really does mean one thing but that Marx is using it metaphorically to refer to something else. Insofar as Gramsci asserts the irreducible metaphoricity of language, he can also argue that Marx’s use of the word “immanence” is as metaphorical as any other use, rather than a second order metaphor deployed contra a former, fixed, and established meaning. Hence Gramsci’s question and response in the same passage: “But is it possible to strip language of its metaphorical meaning? It is impossible. Language is transformed with the transformation of the whole of civilisations, and it absorbs the words of previous civilizations and cultures as, precisely, metaphors.”82 His famous example here is the term ‘dis-aster,’ which no one today confuses for an astrological diagnosis. Not only is language metaphoric in character, then, but it is also anachronistic. Its metaphors are constructed out of previous uses of words which were themselves metaphors. Complete novelty is, in its most extreme formulation, impossible, to the consternation of those who might seek to establish a new language free from what they see as obfuscatory metaphoric baggage. Gramsci reminds us that “no new historical situation, however radical the change that has brought it about, completely transforms language, at least in its external formal aspect. But the content of language must be changed, even if it is difficult to have an exact consciousness of the change in immediate terms.”83

So, we see that one of the errors that might follow from an understanding of language that relegates metaphor to a special rather than general category would be the conviction that a language could be created that would not succumb to the historical baggage of referent relationships that no longer apply. This is to say, one might think that some languages are overly reliant on past constellations of meaning and so desire a language constructed for the purposes of ease of communication. At the turn of the twentieth century, this desire was well-represented among certain circles of left Internationalists who wished to engender solidarity among the working classes of various nations by standardising one international language, in this case, Esperanto. Gramsci consistently takes those advocates of artificial linguistic unity in the name of ease of communication to task, and for reasons consistent with what we have already seen. This need for frictionless communication is, Gramsci reports, more a “cosmopolitan” than “international” anxiety, in that it is the anxiety of the bourgeoisie that travels for business and pleasure. He writes: “They would like artificially to create a definitively inflexible language which will not admit changes in space and time.”11 Gramsci compares the argument for the use of Esperanto to 17th and 18th century pushes in Italy to unify the nation through the adoption of a “pure,” singular, and singularly beautiful Italian that would be definitive.

Esperanto, on Gramsci’s account, remains an “auxiliary language” whose successes are to be found at international conferences where it allows its users to dispense with translators and interpreters and to work quickly. In this context and in this sort of activity, Esperanto would be appropriate. But such a context has its limits. Gramsci writes: “In a congress where one had to communicate concepts and arguments which have a long history, which are the present moment of a process of historical becoming that has been going on for centuries, Esperanto would fetter thought, it would force one into distortions and generalizations, into the strangest and most dangerous imprecisions.”84 85 In this sense, Gramsci judges Esperanto to be “nothing but a vain idea, an illusion of cosmopolitan, humanitarian, democratic mentalities which have not yet been made fertile and been shaken by historical critical thinking.”86 Insofar as an international language might develop, it would do so as a result of and not as a condition for international collectivism such as that aimed at by Socialist movements. Hence Gramsci5s judgment that the Esperantists would “like artificially to create consequences which as yet lack the necessary conditions, and since their activity is merely arbitrary, all they manage to do is waste the time and energy of those who would take them seriously.”87

In both the case of language and politically expedient visions of the future, the issue is fundamentally one of prediction and inheritance. The question here comes down to which kinds of acts are inheritable. For Gramsci, it is the conditions of these actions that ought to occupy our thoughts at this juncture. An action that takes as its condition the positing of a particular end will fail to instantiate itself. And, similarly, a language that takes itself to be fixed and purified of its own history for ease of direct communication cannot but fail. It would fail to be communicative and almost immediately would fail to maintain its desired ametaphoric quality. And, for both of these instances, this failure is similarly construed: they suffer from an overreliance on fixing meaning, on fixing possibilities, and taking certainty as a condition for action. Those languages that survive or that really could serve as conditions for, say, international and intergenerational collective action are those languages that are most translatable, not the languages that do away with the need for translation altogether. These articulations become universal at just the moment that they are received across contexts and so transformed. Otherwise, as with action in the younger text, they find themselves embroiled in infinite layers of contingency and ultimately, then, inadequacy to ground action. What the instances of language and principled inheritance allow us to think, then, is that a future envisioned in its indeterminacy allows our actions to be taken up as inheritable and so transformable. And that this indeterminacy is not a paralyzing ambiguity in the face of a future impossible to predict, but, rather, is the very condition for acting today, in our present, at all.

Works Cited
Gramsci, Antonio. 1994. Pre-Prison Writings, ed. Richard Bellamy, trans Virginia Cox. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.

----------.1977. Selections from Political Writings (1910-1920). Ed. Quintin Hoare. Trans. John Matthews. London: Lawrence and Wishart.

----------.1971, Selections from the Prison Notebooks. Ed. And Trans. Quintin Hoare and Geoffery Nowell Smith. New York: International Publishers.

----------.1985. Selections from Cultural Writings. Ed. David Forgacs and Geoffrey NowellSmith. Trans. William Boelhower. London: Lawrence and Wishart.

Lingua intellettuali egemonia in Gramsci. By Franco Lo Piparo. With a Preface by Tullio De Mauro. (= Biblioteca di Cultura Moderna, 819.) Bari: Giulio Laterza, 1979. Pp. XVIII, 292.

Reviewed by PAOLO RAM AT, Università di Pavia

I have maintained elsewhere (Ramat 1978) that a linguistic theory inspired by the principles of Marxism does not exist and never has, in spite of claims to the contrary by various 'official' representatives of Marxism. Language, being a social phenomenon, was considered by Marx in as much as it could be intimately related to other social facts which are the expression of a historically determined society. In spite of the many profound observations about language scattered throughout Marx's many writings it cannot be said that he ever came close to elaborating a theory of language in the same sense as he could be said to have developed a consistent theory of history or of economics. The same holds true for Engels too, though he devoted greater attention to linguistic phenomenology and in fact carried out empirical research on linguistic problems (cf. Ramat 1975,for an appraisal).

Antonio Gramsci (b. at Ghìlarza, Nuoro, in 1891, d. in Rome in 1936) may have been the Marxist who paid the greatest attention to linguistics and incorporated langu^e most organically in a broader theory of human society. A keen interest in linguistic questions could be traced back to studies at the University of Turin under the direction of Matteo BàrtoE (1873-1946) during the years 1911-15. The author of the book under review is right in asserting the existence of an intimate link between Gr?s linguistic experience and his later political and philosophical views.

It could at first appear exaggerated to trace some basic concepts like 'hegemony1 or 'idealism' back to the reflections on language in the years 1911-15; and Lo Piparo himself is conscious of the risk of overemphasizing this aspect over the many other cultural experiences of the communist leader (p.l 1). On the other hand, it is Gr. himself who, so to speak, legitimates this tenet when he underlines the fundamental unity of all the social and historical manifestations of human activity as follows：

Persuaso che tutto ciò che è attività storica deU'uomo sia una unità, che il pensiero sia una unità, vedo nella risoluzione di uno qualsiasi dei problemi di cultura la riso* luzione potenziale di tutti gli altri, e credo utile abituare le intelligenze a cogliere questa unità nel molteplice aspetto della vita [....] ad applicare i principi fondamentali di una dottrina a tutte le contingenze (Gramsci 1918:174-75).

The linguistic theory which inspired Gr. was indeed that most suitable to develop these cultural interests. Neolinguistics, especially Bartoli's kind of

l/isioriographia Linguistica 6:3 (1979)、3&5-390. DOI 10.1075/111.6.3.13rtini ISSN 0302-5160 / C-ISSN 1569-978] V' John Beniamins Publishing Company neolinguistics, was — as it is well known — a reaction against the mechanical consideration of language as shown by late, mostly Italian, Neo grammarians (Salvionì, Merlo, Goidànich) who “professed adherence to the Neo-Grammanans, principles in an unimaginative and doctrinaire fashion” (Hall 1974:242). Along with the idealistic consideration of language that Neolinguists derived more or less directly from Croce, we find in Bartoli considerable attention being devoted to the historic and social dimensions of language: "Per me la linguistica è sopra tutto storia, ed è molto affine alla storia del costume(Bartoli 1925:66). And:

I neogrammaticì sono linguisti in abstracto, cioè 'sans adhérancc au sol et sans respect du temp矿[...]invece i neolinguisti cercano di porre tutti quanti ì fatti linguistici *dans leur vrai cadre: celui du temps et de l'cspacc'. Cosicché ciò che ì neolinguisti hanno aggiunto al metodo dei neogrammatici è un maggior rispetto delle esigenze del tempo e dello spazio nella storia dei linguaggi', (Bartali, 99; cf. LoP., 88).

In his lessons in Turin Bartoli often referred not only to A scoli but also to Gillieron, Dauzat and especially to Meillet (see Lo P.» 101). It appears therefore legitimate to associate Barto If s linguistic position more closely with the sociological than with the idealistic approach (Lo P・，89).

Franco Lo Piparo, a young scholar teaching general linguistics at the Univer sity of Palermo, shows with philological accuracy based on direct and extended quotes from Gr. (and from Ascoli, Manzoni, Meillet, Bartoli and many others as well) the basic impact of Gr.'s linguistic training on his political and sociological views. Of course, it would be completely untenable to say that Gr.'s Marxism developed from Bartoli's neolinguistics, but I think that Lo P. is right when he maintains that the originality of Gr?s Marxism does not derive from Marx or Lenin (p.3)「This is true especially with regard to Gr.'s conception of language: here, as I said above, Marxism is but a general frame of reference for socially oriented linguistics, and direct influences must be sought elsewhere.

We must refer at this point to the lengthy Italian tradition of embedding the 'language question' (the 'quistione della lingua') in the broader question of the society as a whole in its historical development. One has but to think of Dante, Machiavelli, Vico, Leopardi, to mention but a few, Gr, is heir to this tradition, with the additional advantage of a definite linguistic training and a political awareness certainly not shared by all his predecessors:

Ogni volta che affiora, in un modo o nell' altro, la quìstione della lingua» significa che si sta imponendo una serie di altri problemi: la formazione e PaDarganiento della classe dirigente, la necessità di stabilire rapporti più intimi e sicuri tra i gruppi dirigenti e la massa popolare-nazionale, cioè di riorganizzare l'egemonia culturale (Gramsci 1975:2346).

As Lo P, rightly points out (p.155), four major topics are involved in the previous quotation from the Quaderni dal carcere: 1) a theoretical and methodological study of comparative linguistics to explain linguistic change as a consequence of the influence of a center or class of prestige; 2) the role of the intellectuals ('gli intellettuali,) in the diffusion of that prestige; 3) the definition of the State, and finally 4) the 'quistione della lingua'.

j The central place occupied by language is evident; it must be noted that a large part of the Quaderni written by Gr. during the prison years under Fascism and published only after the World War II is dedicated to the discussion of linguistic problems. Quaderno 29 — the last one (1935) — is entirely dedicated to the problem of national language vs. local dialect and to the definition of grammar. This was intended as a sketchy preparation to a larger study "Lingua nazionale e grammatica” which Gr. would never write. Thus ^linguistica e scienza del folklore, in Gramsci, sono una parte della teoria della nazione-popolo-Stato e degli intellettuali55 (Lo P” 209): “La grammatica normativa scritta è [...] sempre una 'scelta', un indirizzo culturale, è cioè sempre un atto di politica culturale-nazionale^ writes Gr. (1975:2344) answering the question posed by Benedetto Croce 'What is a grammar?' (Croce 1910). If we wanted to summarize Gramsci's reflections we could say that he has given practical application to the general and predominantly abstract statements of Marx and Engels about the social nature of langu昭e — statements which had probably remained unknown to him.

The solution advocated by Gr. for the sociolinguistic problem (standard language and dialects) is along the line of Carlo Cattaneo, Graziadio I. Ascoli and Francesco D'Ovidio:

chi parla solo dialetto o comprende la lingua nazionale in gradi diversi, partecipa necessariamente di una visione del mondo più o meno ristretta e provinciale, fossilizzata, anacronistica in confronto delle grandi correnti di pensiero che dominano la storia mondiale (Gramsci 1975:1377)

Una grande cultura può tradursi nella lingua di un'altra grande cultura, cioè una grande lingua nazionale} storicamente ricca c complessa, può tradurre qualsiasi altra grande cultura, cioè essere espressione mondiale. Ma un dialetto non può fare la stessa cosa (ibid,).

To arrive at this 'great national language' it is necessary to establish a consensus among those who must renounce their dialect, as did the Jacobins of the French Revolution. This is the task of the intellectuals. All interventions imposed by the force of the State, as requested by Alessandro Manzoni (Manzoni 1972 [1868]:' 183-209), are doomed to fail since there is no cultural hegemony which can be imposed by a governmental decree if it is not supported by a real, i.e., historic, need (cf, AscoWs [1873:XVI] reference to the "process。di consenso creativo, onde pur surge e si assoda e si trasforma un vernacolo qualunque") It is for the same reason that Gr. wrote an article in 1918 against Esperanto, an artificial language without any historical base brought into being through the establishment of an abstract and rigid grammatical procedure put forward by educated laymen.

It would have been a worth-while undertaking to analyse why Gr, expressed himself so definitely against dialects — a position which completely contrasts with the most wide-spread views of present-day sociolinguistics, including Italy. To understand Gt.'s position we have to refer to the sociolinguistic and cultural situation of Italy before World War II? At that time the problem was not how to preserve dialects from their decay under the pressure of the standard language, nor how to prevent linguistic alienation induced by stereotyped and stereotyping mass media. The problem was to enable the large majority of the population, which almost exclusively spoke in dialect, to speak the official Italian language. Only in this way would it be possible, says Gr.,to give to the working class and to the peasants the opportunity of a larger, stronger, and richer communication — which would mean the opportunity of having more power from the social and political point of view. Compare the above quotation from Gramsci (1975:1377), with the following citation from one of the most important writers of the years 194OÓ0, Cesare Pavese, who, coming like Gr, from a dialectal tradition, had personally experienced and suffered the struggle with the standard language, a basically alien linguistic tradition for him:

L'ideale dialettale è lo stesso in tutti i tempi. Il dialetto è sottostoria. Bisogna invece correre il rischio e scrivere in lingua, cioè entrare nella storia (...) Nel dialetto non si sceglie, si è immediati, si paria d'istinto. In lingua si crea (Pavese 1952:372 [ll.ni.1949]).

To sum up: the book under review has the merit of highlighting an important component of the Marxist thought in Gr. that has up to now been neglected by scholars of Marxism and of Gr. This philologically wellndocumented book is intended for non-linguists and consequently is written in a non-technical language, with large explanatory excurses, e.g,, the explanation of the concept of 'substrate' (68ff,)?

At times it could seem that the matter dealt with by the author has little to do with the main topic of the book, Le., the linguistic thought of Gr. (for example when dealing with the concept of 'linguistic prestige' in Ascoli, Gil-liéron, Meillet, and Bartoli (85ff.)). But such an objection would demonstrate that the reader has simply not understood the core of Gr.'s reflections — that is the basic social nature of language 一 and hence has overlooked his consequential effort to apply, already as a student in Turin, the critical methods of historical materialism to linguistic research as well. On the contrary, Lo P. has convincingly shown (103fC) that the typical Gramscian concept of cultural and sociopolitical 'hegemony' owes much to that of linguistic 'prestige1. For the professional linguist this 'tout se tienf of language, society, and history as consistently shown by one of the most original thinkers of the Marxist tradition will certainly be of the greatest interest, particularly at a time when sociolinguistics plays such an important role in the general theory。门anguage.

Reviewer 's address:

Paolo Ramat

Istituto di Glottologia

Università di Pavia

1-27100 PAVIA, ITALY

NOTES

1) At some points, however, it would have been useful to show if not the dependence of Gt. on Marx and Engels at least the common historical-materialistic basis, e.g., when Gr+ insists on the fundamental unity of all the social manifestations to which I have akeady alluded; cf. Marx (1953:390,394); "Ein isoliertes Individuum könnte sowenig Eigentum haben am Grund und Boden, wie sprechen Die Sprache selbst ist ebenso das Produkt eines Gemeinwesens, wie sie, in andrer Hinsicht selbst das Dasein des Gemeinwesens, und das selbstredende Dasein desselben".

2) Also, the critical appraisal of the linguistic policy of the Jacobins has now changed, at a time when local autonomies and the preservation of the cultural identities of ethnic and linguistic minorities are aspired everywhere in Europe. See De Certeau, Julia & Revel 1975,Furet&.Ozouf 1977,

3) A few repetitions, especially the author's quoting two or three times the same lengthy passage could have been avoided: what is said, e,g., on p.245, regarding the 'quistione della lingua1 as being isomorphic with the political problem had already been said on pp. 154-55, and supported by the same quote (cf, also pp.114,128 and 209, etc.).

REFERENCES

Ascoli, Graziadio Isaia. 1873. "Proemio''. AGI l.V-XLL (Repr. in G. I. Ascoli, Scritti sulla questione della lingua. A cura di Corrado Grassi. Nuova ediz. riveduta e corretta. Torino: Giappichelli 1968.)

Bartoli, Matteo, 1925. Introduzione alla neolinguistica. Genève-Firenze： Olschki,

Croce, Benedetto. 1910. “Questa tavola rotonda è quadrata" [1905], in B. Croce, Problemi di Estetica e contributi alla storia dell "Estetica italiana, 172-76. Bari: Laterza.

De Certeau, Michel, Dominique Julia, and Jacques Revel. 1975. Une politique de la langue: La Revolution fran^aise et les patois. Paris: Gallimard.

Furet, Frangois, and Jacques Ozouf. 1977. Lire et écrìre: LAlphabetisation des Francis de Calvin à Jules Ferry. Paris: Minuit.

Gramsci, Antonio, 1918. “La lingua unica e「Esperanto”，Il Grido del popolo, 16 febbr. 1918 (Repr. in A. Gramsci, Scritti giovanili, 19144918, 174-78. Torino: Einaudi 1972).

…一-♦ 1975. Quaderni dal carcere. Ediz, critica dell'istituto Gramsci. A cura di Valentino Gerratana, Torino: Einaudi.

Hall, Robert A., Jr.. 1974. External History of the Romance Languages. New York-London-Amsterdam: Elsevier.

Manzoni, Alessandro. 1972. Scritti linguistici, A cura di F. M onte rosso. Milano: Ediz. Paoline, (Pp. 183-209: "DeU7 unità della lingua e dei mezzi di diffonderla. Relazione al Ministro della Pubblica Istruzione, proposta da A. M. agli amici colleghi Bonghi e Carcano,ed accettata da loro** [1868]),

Marx, Karl. 1953 [1857/58], Grundrisse der Kritik der politischen Ökonomie. Berlin: Dietz.

Pavese .Cesare. 1952.〃 mestiere di vivere. Torino: Einaudi.

Ramat, Paolo. 1975. "Friedrich Engels zwischen Anthropologie und Sprach-wissenschaft,,.//Z 2:335-51,

-----.1978. Review of Theoretische Probleme der Sprachwissenschaft (Berlin: Akademie Verlag, 1976). Linguistics, special issue 333-39.

Review Essay & Interview: Peter Ives on Gramsci's Politics of Language
https://cjc.utpjournals.press/doi/pdf/10.22230/cjc.2008v33n2a2025 - Sunday, July 17, 2022 2:34:44 AM - IP Address:3.84.98.170


Boulou Ebanda de B’béri University of Ottawa

GRAM S C rs POLI TICS

F LANG UA G E

Gramsci’s Politics of Language: Engaging the Bakhtin Circle and the Frankfurt School. By Peter Ives. Toronto, ON: University of Toronto Press, 2004. 259 pp. ISBN 0802037569.

Introduction

In the first section of this review essay, I present my sequential but crisscross-referential reading of Ives’ book setting aside a critical lens. In the second section, I report a dialogic exchange I had with


Peter Ives. This exchange, which took place via several emails, could qualify as a real dialogue because Ives was not only willing to clarify some of the points I considered to be problematic in his book, but also willing to share with me other, less obvious issues that would have been relevant for his overall analysis.

Four main chapters constitute the body of this book. At the book’s centre, Ives suggests that the study of Gramsci’s politics of language could allow us to question, for example, the signification of English as a global language in our contemporary world. Throughout this book, Ives attempts to make the point that Gramsci’s work continuously brings back language as a social issue and that we could use the same application to understand the impact of linguistic realities on national constituent collectivities, which can articulate and mobilize language as social weapons. This reminds me of the political use of language in Québec, where the topic of language is always related to that of self-determination. Nontheless, Ives’ book makes the case that language is a central topic in Gramsci’s writings. He restates Gramsci’s claims that language is formed historically, comparing language with the economy and the state, which are human communication, rather than a political site of struggle in which ideology and hegemonic practices are deployed.

Reading Gramsci's Politics of Language

The title of this book sets its central argument, as well as Ives’ position, vis-à-vis Gramsci’s work. Indeed, the book is really about the politics of language and not an exploration of the complexity of Gramsci’s political engagement per se. The route leading to Gramsci’s linguistic politics, however, cannot be dissociated totally from his political engagement. This direction is indeed made up of multi-

Boulou Ebanda de B’béri is the Founding-Director of the Audiovisual Media Lab for the studies of Cultures and Societies (AMLAC&S) and Assistant Professor of Film, Communication, and Cultural Studies at the University of Ottawa, Department of Communication. University of Ottawa, 554 King Edward, ON K1N 6N5. Email: b. debberi @uottawa.ca.

Canadian Journal of Communication, Vol 33 (2008) 319-337

©2008 Canadian Journal of Communication Corporation

https://cjc.utpjournals.press/doi/pdf/10.22230/cjc.2008v33n2a2025 - Sunday, July 17, 2022 2:34:44 AM - IP Address:3.84.98.170


ple interventions by actors—mostly theorists of language Gramsci met during his life—that shaped the interjunction between his understanding of language as a political weapon and his subsequent overall political engagement.

In the first chapter, Ives introduces us to the foundation of Gramsci’s approach to language. He uses the work of Lo Piparo as a basis to demonstrate “how Gramsci’s linguistic theory can elucidate his political theory and to provide the basis for a Marxist theory of language” (p. 17). In addition, Ives shows “how Gramsci’s linguistics should be seen as part of his more general reaction against positivism and mechanistic social theory on one hand, and Crocean idealism on the other” (p. 19), and he argues that “since, for Gramsci, language is based on a metaphor, the philosophy of praxis can use linguistic terms and models metaphorically in other realms of social inquiry and action” (p. 19).

Throughout this analysis, we learn that Gramsci considered the lack of a unitary, national language in Italy to be problematic. In other words, Gramsci believed that a unifying language is necessary for the nation of Italy because “the non-existence of a national language creates friction among the popular masses” (p. 47). This friction is brought on by hegemony; Gramsci characterized it as “the relationship between spontaneous grammar and the prevailing normative grammar” (p. 50). Later on in the book, Ives makes some clear distinctions between Gramsci and the Bakhtin Circle, first drawing on Gramsci’s dedication “to the possibility of a unified national-popular force and language that has not yet existed in history and that could oppose bourgeois and fascist hegemonies that rely on the fragmentation wrought by capitalism” (p. 73).

This is somewhat paradoxical, because other works focusing on Gramsci seem to paint an individual fully against any sort of national common sense, especially when there is a risk of hegemonic domination. For example, in discussing Gramsci’s and Marx’s views of faith, Ives shows that Gramsci does not reject the importance of faith but is concerned with the Roman Catholic Church as an institution that creates world views. For Gramsci, Ives notes, “rational arguments do not exist in a vacuum” (p. 121) and are not (or should not be) sufficient to change one’s opinion, “convictions, criteria of discrimination and standard of conduct”; he calls those shifting minds irrational and schizophrenic, because “faith is an integral component of any progressive hegemony” (p. 121). At another level, Gramsci would criticize Croce’s, Adorno’s, and Horkheimer’s approaches to “thought in general,” “which for them means bourgeois thought developed by Enlightenment philosophers”( p. 161), for leaving out vernacular thought and thus “obliterating historically grounded places from which to challenge the dynamics of bourgeois reason” ( p. 161). In other words, through the reading of this book, we have a very selective picture of Gramsci, ideologically speaking, because he is always positioning himself against both the religious ideology and certain central articulations of the Enlightenment philosophers, as well as preaching for national unity, a concept subjected to both religion and Enlightenment.

Ives shows the presence of a strong nationalistic feeling in Gramsci’s work, especially when it comes to language; Gramsci believed strongly in common sense as a weapon to fight social classes. We need to take some steps back at the beginning of this book to appreciate this nationalistic feeling in Gramsci’s work.

https://cjc.utpjournals.press/doi/pdf/10.22230/cjc.2008v33n2a2025 - Sunday, July 17, 2022 2:34:44 AM - IP Address:3.84.98.170


Indeed, Ives’ book begins by locating “the tenets of a historical materialist approach to language and a linguistically concerned theory of politics and society^ in Gramsci’s writings (p. 3). Ives uses a vernacular approach, or vernacular materialism, to explain the hegemonic conflict between high and low classes. In this context, the vernacular is related to the vulgar or “the common or everyday language of a region or country” (p. 4). This understanding of the vernacular allows Ives to “emphasize Gramsci’s attention to the historical shift in Europe” (p. 8) from Latin to vernacular; to draw on religious overtones as well as to identify tension between vernacular models and linguistic models and, finally, to demonstrate how “language consists of more than formal elements” (p. 9) under which, nonetheless, complex philologic and linguistic operations take place (p. 10). For example, Gramsci’s political understanding of “coercion” and “consent^ is tied to his views of language. For him, “consent does not mean individually based agreements, as portrayed by naive and much simplified liberalism. On the contrary, consent like coercion” is a human construction, “and the processes of its production cannot be characterized by any absence of coercion and consent” (p. 11). He contends that one cannot be found free of the other and that “our experience of both depends on meanings and practices that are produced with languages” (p. 12). In characterizing this Gramscian view of language, Ives argues that Gramsci rejects the idea of language as nomenclature or as a medium of representation. He sees language as “culture and philosophy [that] is very much a substantial part of social reality” (p. 13), because there is “no concept of a meta-language or a universal grammar of all languages” found in Gramsci’s work (p. 12). Ives claims that Gramsci “understands meaning as constructed by relationships within language” and that he “views language as system whereby meaning is constructed through signs” (p. 13).

This is fully understandable because, in part at least, grammatical studies are still today the study of classes of words and their inflections and functional relationships in language. Ives notes that Gramsci studied under Bartoli, who was opposed to the Neogrammarians (a group of German linguists in Leipzig) before developing Neolinguistics, a field of the study of parts of language, nonetheless claiming to study “only a collection of words and not language itself” (p. 21). Bartoli’s Neolinguistics opposed the idea that “phonetic laws were exceptionless. Instead, it emphasized the importance of culture to changes in language” (p. 21).

Another key player in this intellectual genealogy is Croce, who became opposed to Bartoli. Croce “argues that there is no division between language and the aesthetic and that the science of art and the science of language are not two distinct things but one single science” (p. 22). Here, we can see Gramsci’s interest in the practices of expression emerging, or in the impact that individual speech acts can have on language.

Ives places Gramsci at “the nexus between Crocean idealist linguistics and positivist linguistics as represented by the Neogrammarians” (p. 22) because Gramsci attempted to “dialectically overcome the opposite trends of positivism and idealism [by developing] the concepts of 'normative' grammar and ‘spontaneous5 or 'immanent’ grammar." In doing so, he was able “to appropriate the advantages of understanding the structural and institutional aspects of language

https://cjc.utpjournals.press/doi/pdf/10.22230/cjc.2008v33n2a2025 - Sunday, July 17, 2022 2:34:44 AM - IP Address:3.84.98.170


provided by the positivism [side] of the Neogrammarians” (p. 23)1. Therefore, Ives notes, “Gramsci’s overcoming of the errors of both the idealist and positivist approaches to language yields a theory of language as a historical institution that changes continuously” (p. 23). We learn that the relationship between Gramsci and Ascoli’s theory was somehow ambivalent because Gramsci did not embrace Ascoli’s biological theory; Ives agrues that “language is rooted in the materiality of the production of the words” (p. 34), “because language is always historically metaphorical [while] words and linguistic structures are always related to meanings from their past” (p. 35).

At this point, the link between language and power emerges, as well as perhaps, as I suggested above, following Gramsci’s interest in using the grammatical relationship between classes of words in language to develop his philosophy of social classes. Indeed, Ives shows that Gramsci uses normative grammar not only to criticize Croce’s notion of language, which he views as an “expressive act requiring an entirely different, philosophic, method of analysis than what here he calls 'grammar'” (p. 37), but also to suggest that such an application of language cannot represent normative grammar because this “is constituted by reciprocal control, by reciprocal teaching, and by reciprocal “censorship” (p. 43), whereas spontaneous grammar is “created throughout the molecular processes of learning a language from birth throughout one’s entire life,” a process by which “sedimentation is affected by religion, class, gender, and geographic location” (p. 44).

The second chapter of Ives’ book tackles the notion of unity and looks at the relationship within unified languages, moving from the work of Benjamin, Bakhtin, and Volosinov to draw on Gramsci's overall writings on a unified national language. Indeed, it becomes understandable at this point that Gramsci’s desire for a national revolution underscores his focus on the concepts of unity. Here as well, Ives compares the beginnings of the Bakhtin Circle, which “emerged from a fundamentally neo-Kantian setting” and Gramsci's interest in language, shaped by “Croce's Hegelianism” (p. 59). Ives points out that “Volosinov's important insight is that Croce, Vossler, and Humboldt all see language as the movement from something expressible that initiates in the inner depth of the psyche and is expressed on the outer surface of perceptible sound that is language” (p. 70). Here we can see that one of the basic conceptions of language shared by both Volosinov and Gramsci is the connection between language and ideology. In addition, Gramsci’s concept of grammar and the historical connection between language, ideology, and “meaning incorporates structuralist and post-structuralist views of language as a system of signs” (p. 72).

Ives then moves on to show that Gramsci is a “political theorist and activist” and that Bakhtin is a “literary critic and philosopher” (p. 73). Finally, he claims that “Gramsci’s advocacy of a national unified language is guided by political issues that are beyond Bakhtin’s explicit purview” (p. 73). Ives emphasizes Bakhtin’s notion of “dialogue,” claiming that “Bakhtin relies heavily on dialogue as a metaphor for ethical behaviour, as an epistemological premise, and ultimately as human ontology” (p. 74). But as he rightly asks, “[D]ialogue is inherently linguistic, but is language inherently dialogical? What does it mean to say that language is inherently dialogic?” These two questions lead Ives to introduce

https://cjc.utpjournals.press/doi/pdf/10.22230/cjc.2008v33n2a2025 - Sunday, July 17, 2022 2:34:44 AM - IP Address:3.84.98.170


the notion of heteroglossia, defined as “the principle that meaning is” contextually bounded “but that context is boundless”(p. 75). Its opposite, monoglossia, as defined by Bakhtin, “is the resistance of language’s ‘natural’ and ‘inherent’ dialogic essence” (p. 76). Bakhtin argues that “social diversity and heteroglossia are manifested in languages but are not inherently a part of language” (p. 78).

This claim regarding heteroglossia has two implications: “First, without divorcing language from everyday life, it makes the issue of whether language is heteroglotic irrelevant by focusing on the strong connections between languages and social activity. Second, it avoids the reduction that heteroglossia is necessarily good and democratic whereas monoglossia is inherently bad and antidemocratic” (p. 79). Using Volosinov’s discussion of the reflection and refraction of all ideological products, Ives notes that for Volosinov, “within every sign there is a diversity of its own materiality that also reflect[s] and refract[s] other realities” (p. 80). Ives links this idea with Gramsci’s understanding of class struggles because, he argues, the multiple accents of signs are always “resisted by the ruling class, which strives to impact a supraclass, eternal character to the ideological sign, to extinguish or drive inward the struggle between social value judgements which occur in it, to make the sign uniaccentual” (p. 81).

Gramsci and Bakhtin have many similar views and interests, first regarding the shift from Latin to vernacular languages——they both agree that it is “intricately linked to larger ideological and social changes” (p. 90)一and second on the traditional definition of translation. On the first point, Gramsci believes that “the medieval ages were marked by the crystallization of literary Latin into ‘middle-Latin’，a language used by scholars and intellectuals in everyday life” (p. 90). For Ives, the common ground for Gramsci and Bakhtin is that the “unity does not mean homogeneity, monoglossia, or uniaccentuality. Rather it includes uniqueness and differences that are not ‘transcended,’ ‘overcome,’ or merged” (p. 93). According to Ives,

the most significant difference between Gramsci and Bakhtin is that Gramsci believes in the possibility of an actual, ‘prosaic,’ progressive unified language in which differences are held intact and not obliterated, in which voices exist. For Bakhtin, this type of unity and organization is certainly found in the field of literature with the unity of the novel. But it is an open question whether Bakhtin thinks we should place our faith in constructing such an open unity in a nation or community of people. (p. 95)

The third chapter of Ives’ book focuses on the relationships among different languages and thoroughly compares the notion of translation developed by Gramsci and by one particular Frankfurt Schüler: Benjamin. Although it focuses on Benjamin, this chapter does not deal with the Frankfurt School linguistic theory, but rather opens up to it because, as Ives notes, language is “the highest level of mimetic behaviour and the most complete archive of nonsensuous similarity” for Benjamin (p. 125). But this appropriation of language does not allow Benjamin to overcome “the subject/object dichotomy at the heart of bourgeois philosophy in a manner that provides a critique or a way forward,” as his work “consistently presumes that the subject, the word, is separate from the object, the world” (p. 127).

https://cjc.utpjournals.press/doi/pdf/10.22230/cjc.2008v33n2a2025 - Sunday, July 17, 2022 2:34:44 AM - IP Address:3.84.98.170


It is at this point of contention that we can locate the political split between the Marxist side of Benjamin’s view of language—and perhaps the common cited-heritage of Benjamin’s work in the playing field of FrankfUrt School discourses—and Gramsci’s view on the subject/object relationship. As noted in the earlier stages of this review, one of the main paradoxes, and conceivably the most interesting one is to find in Gramsci very strong agency. For example, at the same time as he expresses his faith in nationalism and a search for unity, he also opposes the other kind of unitarianism he considered being hegemony, e.g., religion and bourgeoisie. Indeed, for Gramsci, “the dichotomization of science and reason from faith, religion and belief is spurious, and reinforces common sense world views of bourgeois hegemony”(p. 127). He then argues that “both the ideology of science and most religions are based on the same unexamined presumption that there is a dichotomy between humans and nature. This dichotomy is the same as the separation between subjects and objects of the world” (p. 129). For Gramsci, the division between subject and object is due to “bourgeois modernity, a symptom growing stronger and stronger as new strata of traditional intellectuals attempt to secularize religious world views,” and for Gramsci, unlike Benjamin, “neither a proletarian revolution nor a radical epistemological break can erase the dichotomy between subjectivity and objectivity” (p. 133).

Based on this reading, the difference between Gramsci and the Frankfurt School’s scholarship seems to be located within subject/object relationships, as we will also see in my review of the last chapter of this book, especially when Ives brings up some Frankfurt School positions on the dominant, hegemonic subject, constructing false consciousness with objective reality. This difference lies within the traditional definition of the notions of science, objectivity, and prediction. For Gramsci, objective means “this and only this: that one asserts to be objective, to be objective reality, that reality which is ascertained by all, which is independent of any merely particular group standpoint” (p. 131). He then defines science as “the collection of methods for distinguishing that which is transitory... from that which is true only for certain portions of society from that which is ‘essential’ ” (p. 131). Much like language, Gramsci believes that science is “conceived historically, and it constantly affects how we perceive the world, all the while correcting and reinforcing our sensory organs” (p. 132).

But Ives’ book articulates many similarities between Benjamin and Gramsci. At the centre of the third chapter, Ives insists that for Gramsci, translation is not only a political act, but also a philosophical concept. Translation consists of “two fundamentally similar structures [which] have “equivalent” superstructures that are mutually translatable, whatever the particular national language” (p. 106). This definition makes some events, concepts, and thoughts translatable and others not. For example, for Gramsci, a qualified translator “should be able not only to translate literally but also to translate conceptual terms of a specific national culture into the terms of another national culture, that is, such a translator should have critical knowledge of two civilizations and be able to acquaint one with the other” (p. 108), which bring into play the concepts of individual innovation as art and social innovation as language. Ives draws a clear distinction between these two levels of intervention and argues that this distinction reinforces Benjamin’s

https://cjc.utpjournals.press/doi/pdf/10.22230/cjc.2008v33n2a2025 - Sunday, July 17, 2022 2:34:44 AM - IP Address:3.84.98.170


and Gramsci’s concepts of translation, especially because “unlike artistic works or poetry, translation is directed at the target language as a whole” (p. 109).

Thus, the concept of “translation” points to one of the first converging politics between Benjamin and Gramsci because both of them reject the traditional definition of translation. In this chapter, Ives seeks to illustrate how translation and translatability are seen through Gramsci’s writings. He then suggests that “translation enables [Gramsci] to explain how the presentation of our experience—that of revolution—requires translation and not the mere transmission from one context to another” (p. 101). Gramsci explored the notion of translation to find a way to “translate” the Russian Revolution and make an Italian revolution possible. The context of an event therefore has a significant role in how it will be translated because translation cannot be a “technical activity; instead it requires normative judgment that makes the translation a historical act” (p. 103). For example, for Benjamin, “linguistic diversity provides the space for translation that he sees as revelation,” whereas for Gramsci, language is “non-partho-genetic” and thus “enables translation as revolution.” In other words, through the notion of translation, Gramsci envisions “how this non-ethnocentric, non-teleo-logical, communal creativity is related to revolution” (p. 105).

Ives makes the point that Gramsci’s “extensive use of ‘translation5 was partly a response to Croce’s drastic position that translation is impossible” (p. 113). Although Gramsci and Benjamin look at Croce in similar ways, “Benjamin argues that idealist historicism ends up with the same problem as positivistic versions of history: it depicts history as what he calls ‘empty time’” (p. 114), which Gramsci never does. However, “unlike Croce’s historicism, Benjamin's 'history' recognizes the ‘flow' or ‘stream' within which origins and eddies are contained” (p. 116).

Another point of converging politics between Benjamin and Gramsci is that both of them reject “idealist versions of historicism” (p. 118). Indeed, they consider history to be related to time and context. Benjamin introduces “the concept of Jetztzeit (now-time) to expand history beyond the simple positivistic limits of the linear chronological succession of minutes, days and years of what he calls ‘empty time’” (p. 118). Croce, who makes no distinction between chronicle and history (“other than the spirit by which they are approached”), is highly criticized by Gramsci, who considers Benjamin’s notion of history as “a series of progressive leaps” against Croce’s notion of progressive events (p. 118).

As Ives notes, Benjamin’s philosophy of language “reinforces the split between subject and object because his task of translation is directed at revelation” (p. 122). This split between subject and object is rooted in language, more specifically “in the difference between historical language on the one hand, and on the other, the originary Adamic language of the Garden of Eden” (p. 123). Benjamin’s reading of Genesis is based on his three levels of language: “language of things, language of human knowledge, and the creative world of God” (p. 123). He makes a distinction between divine knowledge, which belongs to God, and knowledge of judgment, which came after the fall and is thus “knowledge of the sinner” (p. 124). He claims that “with the knowledge of judgment, subjective names become less and less related to their objects as language becomes increasingly instrumental and concerned with evaluation of good and

https://cjc.utpjournals.press/doi/pdf/10.22230/cjc.2008v33n2a2025 - Sunday, July 17, 2022 2:34:44 AM - IP Address:3.84.98.170


evil rather than names” (p. 124). Benjamin believes that “language is a gift from God” and that “in man God set language” so that “man is the knower in the same language in which God is the creator” (p. 124). Even after the fall, Benjamin believes that “language still has a connection to the divine world” (p. 124).

In the fourth and final chapter, Ives creates clear linkages between Gramsci and some Frankfurt Schülers in bringing up the importance of several personages linked to that line of thought: Habermas, Horkheimer, and Adorno. The chapter makes an implicit statement about diverging positions within the Frankfurt School scholars. For example, Ives notes that Gramsci is in concordance with Habermas “about the need to thoroughly overcome the subject/object problematic in the philosophy of language found in Benjamin, Adorno, and Horkheimer” (p. 162), while Habermas “contends that the original mode of language use is directed toward two or more speakers reaching an understanding.” Ives characterizes this as the main flaw in Habermas’ work, because he is incapable of “[theorizing] relations of power” (p. 162) and simply sees language—with Adorno and Horkheimer一as an instrument, a “communicative action,” which is “the possibility of freedom and democratically reasoned decision making” (p. 163).

Ives further suggests that Horkheimer was interested in “the potential of rooting reason in language for Critical Theory” (p. 158); while both Adorno and Horkheimer’s works “describe the regressive dialectical movement of reason as understood by traditional philosophy,” they “also illustrate how these concepts affected society at large by playing into the dynamics of the rise of fascism and the logic of capitalist culture industry” (p. 159). Here, we see the points of contention with some views held by Gramsci, who together with Bakhtin and Volosinov considers “language as a site of political struggle and conflict” (p. 163). Ives’ analysis would suggest that language, as “a vehicle for subjective pronouncement on the world is presumed to be at odds with the world on which it lays its dictates” (p. 153). Gramsci claims language to be “an instrumentaliza-tion resulting from human activity” (p. 154), while Horkheimer and Adorno “connect this process to capitalism and [to] the dialectic of reason and domination” (p. 154). They see it as “all pervasive, and as a transformation that is distancing language farther and farther from its origins in mimetic reflection between words and the reality they represent” (p. 155).

The overall strategy taken by Ives in this chapter is thus to approach these linkages with the topics of language and reason and to illustrate not only the points of discrepancy (that of subject/object, as I noted above), but also certain points of convergence. For example, by arguing that Habermas’ conception of rationality “is directly aimed at showing how the Enlightenment tradition continues to hold the promise of moving us beyond a world governed by coercive nation-states and institutions (or steering media)” (p. 135), Ives is also grounding Gramsci’s work in the domain of ideology. Another example of this is that the Frankfurt School sought to better understand the rise of fascism through different methods, one of which was an analysis of the psyche, an articulation also found in Gramsci’s work. Indeed, Gramsci and the Frankfurt School believed that “fascism developed out of nineteenth-century liberal bourgeois capitalist society” (p. 141). While for Habermas reason “is that which legitimates democracy”

https://cjc.utpjournals.press/doi/pdf/10.22230/cjc.2008v33n2a2025 - Sunday, July 17, 2022 2:34:44 AM - IP Address:3.84.98.170


(p. 134), “Gramsci’s notions of language and reason, in contradistinction to Habermas’，show how the concept of bourgeois hegemony is useful and entails capitalist economic structures as well as bourgeois cultural and political mechanisms of legitimation” (p. 138). On the same level, Horkheimer and Adorno demonstrate how “Western philosophy defines ‘nature’ as distinct from the reasoning subject. Nature [being] the object of knowledge; this refers to both nonhuman objects and the nature of human behaviour” (p. 141).

Therefore, it could be said that both Gramsci’s and Horkheimer’s distinction between traditional and critical theory depends significantly on the social location of the subject—r the theorist—because both of them “compare traditional intellectuals^ who often present themselves “as neutral and unconnected to any specific class or political interest” to organic individuals, who Gramsci describes as “organiser[s] of the confidence of investors in his business” (p. 148). Gramsci saw Machiavelli’s work The Prince as a “live work in which political ideology and political science are fused in the dramatic form of a ‘myth’” (p. 145). According to Ives, Gramsci defends Machiavelli, claiming that his “moral and political aim was to educate the uneducated. To empower those disempowered by lack of knowledge” (p. 145). This reading of Machiavelli allows Gramsci to admit “that the basic innovation of praxis for political science is that there is no such thing as ‘human nature,’ which can only be seen as the totality of historically determined social relations, which can, within certain limits, be ascertained with the methods of philology and criticism” (p. 145).

For Horkheimer, however, Machiavelli’s work brings about the relationship between the notion of myth and that of reason; “myth” as “the anthropomorphic projection of human traits onto the non-human world” (p. 142) and reason as “[having] its roots in self-preservation as opposed to Enlightenment claims of universality” (p. 143). Indeed, Horkheimer would extend the Vichian concepts of myth and nature to social analysis through his interpretation of Machiavelli, a position that Gramsci disagrees with. We can find several other contentions between the Enlightenment philosophers of the Frankfurt School and Gramsci’s work. For example, one of the last topics Ives covers in his book is Gramsci’s position with respect to the concept of mimesis, a position contrasted with that of Habermas and Adorno. Ives notes that Habermas opposes mimesis “with the claim that his own theory is able to ‘capture’ what instrumental reason destroys in Adorno’s work” (p. 167). For Habermas, the nature of “mimesis can be laid open if we give up the paradigm of the philosophy of consciousness ... in favour of the paradigm of linguistic philosophy . . . and put the cognitive-instrumental aspect of reason in its proper place as part of a move encompassing communicative rationality” (p. 167). Ives concludes by accrediting Gramsci as a significant contributor to British cultural studies, stating that he “accepts some fundamental points of Adorno and Horkheimer’s dialect of Enlightenment reason, but he rejects the idea that it is all pervasive and that modern society is totally administered” (p. 171).

https://cjc.utpjournals.press/doi/pdf/10.22230/cjc.2008v33n2a2025 - Sunday, July 17, 2022 2:34:44 AM - IP Address:3.84.98.170


Interview with Peter Ives

Ottawa, Ontario/London, England, November/December 2007

Boulou Ebanda de B’béri (BB): First of all, let me thank you for accepting to play this game of virtual interview with me.

Peter Ives (PI): I am very pleased that you’ve invited me to “play this game.” There are some aspects of the format that seem quite suitable for opening new areas of dialogue. Although I’m also aware, sitting alone in front of this computer, here in England, how such email interviews cut short some types of interaction, body-language, and sociability only possible in face-to-face meetings, which I hope we can have sometime. For now, I thank you, the Journal, and our readers for this opportunity.

BB: Indeed, you’re right about the face-to-face aspect missing in this interview; nonetheless this medium allows us to exchange and perhaps communicate, knowing its limits.

I want to start with the notion of vernacular materialism, which I believe, it’d be fair enough to say that this notion helps you illustrate both philological and linguistic articulations of language in Gramsci’s work. Therefore, my first question is to ask you to elaborate a bit on this notion of vernacular materialism which, throughout your exploration of Gramsci’s work, seems to be like an un-named, common sense ideology and even hegemony, partly because on the one hand, as you showed (pp. 3-13), or as you suggested later on, a vernacular tone or any sort of vernacular practice is for Gramsci similar to a vulgarised, naturalised practice.

PI: I first came up with or stumbled on the term “vernacular materialism” in the mid-1990s while writing my doctoral dissertation at York University in the Programme of Social & Political Thought. It hit me at first as a funny combination of terms not only because it played on notions of “vulgar materialism” but because it seemed to capture my frustrations with what I saw at the time as futile debates between Marxism and post-structuralism, where language played a central role and was always pitted against either “reality” (by Marxists) or the economy in the form of economic determinism (in straw arguments made against Marxism’s focus on economic inequalities and capitalism). This was before Will Kymlicka started using the term “vernacular” to describe his attempt to save liberalism by incorporating minority group rights into liberalism. But the potentials are similar, in that like much social theory that focuses on language or the vernacular, the material power relationships especially as framed by global capitalism are often ignored. I think this is very true of Kymlicka’s work, although I greatly admire what it does contribute.

On the other hand, those focusing on so-called “material” and economic inequalities often conceptualize these issues as separate from (and more real than) issues of language and culture. “Vernacular materialism” is a concept that tries to bring these areas together, a focus on language from the perspective of people who use

https://cjc.utpjournals.press/doi/pdf/10.22230/cjc.2008v33n2a2025 - Sunday, July 17, 2022 2:34:44 AM - IP Address:3.84.98.170


it daily (and face discrimination and oppression through linguistic power relations) and a focus on an analysis of society from a historical materialist perspective.

BB: In addition to this bridging capacity that you’ve just described, a vernacular seems as well not to be different from hegemony, because, as you noted for Gramsci, “hegemony can also be understood as the progressive creation of a popular collective spirit” (p. 30) or as Bakhtin and Gramsci both agree, seemingly having similar views, the shift from Latin to vernacular languages is “intricately linked to larger ideological and social changes” (p. 90). Could you explain what is for you the difference between a vernacular articulation with a purely Gramscian articulation of ideology and hegemony?

PI: Obviously, many are interested in Gramsci precisely because his critique of “ideology” includes an analysis of institutions and practices and not just “ideas.” But I’m pleased that you see “vernacular materialism” as a larger issue that pervades my book. In a certain sense it does resonate with a “history from below” type dynamic where what we are concerned about is language as it is used and experienced by masses of people, rather than rarefied, abstracted and codified. But this codification and standardization of language by elites has an important and complex impact on how language is used by us all.

Marx addressed some of these issues, especially with Engels, in The German Ideology where they discuss how the ideas of the ruling class in every epoch are the ruling ideas. But Gramsci takes that much further specifically looking at shifts like that during the Reformation when the ruling ideas are changed profoundly but there is not necessarily a political revolution. One way in which Gramsci goes much further than Marx and Engels is that “hegemony” includes more than “ruling ideas” and “ideas” that challenge them; it extends to the institutions that disseminate ideas, the complexity and contradictory nature of “ideas” as they make their way into “common sense” and conflict with the lived experiences of those who come to accept the “ruling ideas.” Certainly, Marx did not see “ideology” as purely negative, as totally disingenuous distortions that just need to be debunked and shown to simply be false. But Gramsci goes further in looking at the institutions and the relations among various social groups in societies that support various ideologies which come together in “hegemonic” forces.

I am not sure what you mean by “purely” Gramscian, in that I don’t think Gramsci ever aimed at purity and I would agree. Actually, that raises a key point about what Stuart Hall calls the “Gramscian way of thinking” in that so often concepts like “hegemony” or “passive revolution” are attributed to him when he is explicitly taking the concepts of others and transforming them. So, for example, “passive revolution” was a term Gramsci took from the conservative historian, Vincenzo Cuoco, who used it more like a “bloodless” revolution in a positive sense. Gramsci turned it on its head to see it as a negative process whereby nothing that is causing the structural problems in the society is actually addressed, but changes in the way the dominant classes rule makes it seem as if previous problems have been worked out. Anne Showstack Sassoon has a great article about

https://cjc.utpjournals.press/doi/pdf/10.22230/cjc.2008v33n2a2025 - Sunday, July 17, 2022 2:34:44 AM - IP Address:3.84.98.170


how Gramsci uses the concepts of others in ways like this (see Gramsci’s Subversion of Language in Rethinking Marxism from 1990).

But to try and answer your question, Gramsci is not trying to dispel the illusions (an approach that many take, for example, Noam Chomsky, which I think makes his work much less effective than it might otherwise be). Rather, he is trying to figure out why and how it came to be that particular ideologies garnered so much purchase, and not solely through coercion, but through the organization of consent. But hegemony includes not only why whole groups of people accept the ideas of the small groups who hold power, but how the institutions of society foster this, and how the various social groupings, including economic groupings but also gender, ethnic and other identities, are organized. Of course, this varies tremendously from society to society, historical period to historical period. But certainly in Gramsci’s Italy, the language question was crucial to this, as it is today.

For example, just in May 2006 the US Senate proclaimed English as the national language of the United States, well over 200 years after the founding of the country. The media barely mentioned it, but it clearly signals crucial political shifts occurring in the U.S. in terms of the growing Spanish speaking population, the limits of US “tolerance” and "pluralism” and how the governing classes are attempting to cope with it. This attempt to use the “power” (or at least resources) of the state to effect language usage could be a small example of the type of hegemonic manoeuvre of which Gramsci would be critical.

BB: You may then be anticipating my next question, which is in fact what would have been the difference had you started your analysis of Gramsci with what has been the recognized, and perhaps the most acclaimed nature of his work, e.g., ideology and not language? Do you believe that the results of your analysis would have been different and if so, why and how?

PI: I guess I have two answers: one is that it is not an either/or issue, that my work on Gramsci has focused on his studies in linguistics does not rule out or even deemphasize questions of ideology. But also, my argument in terms of intellectual history is that Gramsci, as a Sardinian university student, went through a political transformation from favouring some sort of Sardinian nationalism whereby the Italians were the oppressors, to realizing that the Sardinian ruling class was complicit in the relationship, and Sardinian subaltern classes had much in common with, and should work with, both Italian peasants and the Italian urban working classes. My argument is that Gramsci found linguistics and language politics particularly related to these political issues and thought about them in terms of language and linguistics more thoroughly than he did with the term “ideology.” I discuss this a little in my second book, Language and Hegemony in Gramsci, in terms of the many and various so-called "linguistic turns” in the 20th Century. In the Prison Notebooks, Gramsci uses the term “ideology” in a relatively restricted and technical sense of the perspective in terms of a system of ideas. He does not expand it as a concept as he does with most of those ideas associated with his name such as “hegemony,” “passive revolution,” “common sense,” “intellectu-

https://cjc.utpjournals.press/doi/pdf/10.22230/cjc.2008v33n2a2025 - Sunday, July 17, 2022 2:34:44 AM - IP Address:3.84.98.170


als,” and “subalternity." These are the concepts that seem to be generating significant interest amongst a host of recent studies of Gramsci’s writings.

BB: From this departure from language instead of ideology, do you believe you would have been able to break with the practices of ideology Gramsci himself and many of his followers defined to be inescapable frameworks as long as consent and coercion are at play; and, if so, could you elaborate a bit on your own strategy to get rid of this framework?

PI: Well, yes and no. On one hand, I don’t think you can break free of ideology any more than you can break free of the need for language and a degree of linguistic conformism, or of organizing the world and making commitments to certain values and ideals over other ones. Sure, using more consent and less coercion is morally superior, but Gramsci was keen to note that tacit consent can be readily mobilized to legitimate oppressive government policies. Thus, Gramsci was trying to struggle and fight to change ideology, “common sense," and language, not get rid of them一and I agree with how he conceptualizes that.

On the other hand, my work on Gramsci’s understanding of language provides a lot of support to a theme that many others have appreciated in Gramsci, what early on was labelled his “open” Marxism and his insistence that at least in contexts like his Italy, to change society for the better you cannot impose an “ideology" or a strategy on all the subaltern social groups. Effective politics cannot be conducted by revelation of a “true” analysis or perspective that debunks or replaces the status quo.

The framework that Gramsci was trying to get rid of was that notion of creating consent with a heavy presence of the threat of coercion behind it. He was also trying to get rid of the organization of passive consent that relied on people blaming their predicament on other subaltern social groups. This was typified by the Fascists, who did garner considerable consent in Italy.

But Gramsci was also critical of the Socialists and other Communists, for example, for wanting the urban working classes to be the leaders of the movement, and not engaging with the peasantry or just assuming that the peasants would follow the northern based proletariat. Where Lenin used the term “hegemony" really to describe an alliance between the urban workers and the rural peasants, Gramsci insisted that this relationship would have to be more than a mere “alliance," but that both groups would have to see how their positions necessarily included each other. The very way of conceptualizing the identities of peasant and worker would have to change. This is why he quickly broadened these questions out to being about more than economic class questions and including issues like those of rural Catholic women and the control over the moral and sexual lives of workers under new Fordist conditions. This is why he was so concerned with theatre, popular novellas and the like. So Gramsci uses “hegemony" to describe the types of political force that he is highly critical of, as well as what he wants to construct by using the Italian Communist Party.

I try to capture the essential difference between the two with the metaphor of lan-

https://cjc.utpjournals.press/doi/pdf/10.22230/cjc.2008v33n2a2025 - Sunday, July 17, 2022 2:34:44 AM - IP Address:3.84.98.170


guage. Where Gramsci was in favour of a “common” Italian language (one could substitute “hegemony” here), he did not want that language to be one that was imposed upon all of Italy (even with only minimal levels of coercion). Instead, he desired a new language to be created by a more profound interaction of the myriad of dialects that existed throughout the country. He knew that this would be a long and gradual process based on greater interaction geographically and across different communities.

BB: Tell me a bit more about the paradox I found in your illustration of Gramsci’s nationalism. For example, in your book, Gramsci seems to be someone looking for national constituent common sense, e.g., he would regret the lack of a strong, unitarian national language in Italy, and your analysis somehow indicates that he considered grammar to be a sort of common sense weapon, helping to fight the right of entry of multiplicity of signs into the dominant language; yet I understood from your book that for Gramsci the notion of unity does not mean homogeneity (p. 93); however, how is this search for unity different and perhaps conflicting with his work on class divisions in Italy?

PI: The question of “the nation” is quite a tricky one for us as well as Gramsci. I’ve been thinking about it a lot since I wrote the book. Writing it, I tacitly accepted common readings of Gramsci as being embedded in his historical time and place, to the extent that he was not particularly conscious or concerned with his focus on the national level of politics, which he understood, along classical Marxist lines, as then leading to an international revolution. But several Gramsci scholars have challenged me on this, Ursula Apitsch who is a scholar of immigration as well as Adam Morton, especially his recent book, Unravelling Gramsci. They both emphasize the extent to which Gramsci does discuss “international” issues and does not create stark contrasts between the national and international levels. Rather, his attention to “the nation” as a impoverished conception during his lifetime, but as having progressive potential, comes from the role of the state, which exercised power on a national population and territory.

Morton in particular emphasizes Gramsci’s analysis of historical formation of the nation-state system, and Gramsci’s notion that he could not understand his Italy without looking to its European history. He does not then assume that “Italians” have anything that necessarily unites them at the essential level, but sees them historically as being under the sovereign rule of the Italian state. To deny that or work against it, for example to be a Sardinian nationalist, could actually strengthen the negative aspects of state power, and for it to be a Sardinian state would matter little. Gramsci was also critical of “cosmopolitanism” because at his time it was a position of the elites and businessmen who had international contacts due to their position within capitalism, which has always been “international.” Certainly, Gramsci was explicitly critical of biological determinism and other essentialisms that many forms of “nationalism” are based on. So his “nationalism,” I think, is a very particular and strategic position based on the power of the nation-state. For us, this is significantly different, although I do not agree with those globalization theorists who proclaim the death of the nation-state.

https://cjc.utpjournals.press/doi/pdf/10.22230/cjc.2008v33n2a2025 - Sunday, July 17, 2022 2:34:44 AM - IP Address:3.84.98.170


BB: To continue with the same idea, you note in your book that Marx placed a lot of importance on religious critique and that Gramsci does not reject the importance of faith but was concerned with the Roman Catholic Church as an institution that creates world views and thus, constitutes a powerful institution. You even push the idea that for Gramsci, “rational arguments do not exist in a vacuum” (p. 121) and are not (or should not be) sufficient to change one’s opinion, “convictions, criteria of discrimination and standard of conduct”； because Gramsci called those shifting minds irrational and schizophrenic.

As I noted in my previous question, one of the main paradoxes and perhaps the most interesting one is the very strong agency found in the personage of Gramsci. For example, at the same time as he expresses his strong belief of nationalism and/or search of unity, he also positions himself against other kinds of unitarianism he considers to be hegemonic, e.g., religious in the example above, but I might also add his opposition to certain positions of Enlightenment philosophers such as their view of an invincible subject-of-power that are institutions.

Don’t you find that to be paradoxical and perhaps contradictory, because this is the “propre” of individual agency?

PI: I guess I would start by noting that Gramsci seemed much more concerned with what we may call collective agency, although this did not mean a devaluation of individual responsibility. I think you are right that there is certainly a tension there, whether a paradox or contradiction, I’m not sure. I suppose it is a contradiction in that capitalism in particular, but also most systems of exploitation, create contradictory consciousness and this works itself out in capitalist society through an ideology of individualism. So Gramsci’s search for unity (which for obvious reasons I like better than the contention that he believed in nationalism as I addressed above) was a reaction against how the ineffective liberalism and democratic socialism in Italy so easily turned into and capitulated to a strong nationalist, authoritarianism of Fascism. I think Gramsci takes individuals’ and groups’ acceptance of ideas, however horrendous and objectionable, more seriously than most do. So, of course, he would hold individuals responsible and I think he was quite hard on himself for his own failure to carry through the wave of socialism of 1919-1920 into something progressive, but it lead to the rise of Fascism.

One of the reasons I like Gramsci’s writings on language so much is that they enable a complex understanding of this tension you raise between individual agency and social institutions that make agency possible. As Noam Chomsky, following Wilhelm von Humboldt, emphasizes, the amazing thing about language is that from a finite set of rules an individual can generate an infinite set of sentences (that are grammatically correct). Gramsci shows much greater awareness of the power relations within the distinctions between what is a “correct” sentence and how effective it might be in a given situation. We can see this as running along a continuum with overt coercion at one end and the organization of

https://cjc.utpjournals.press/doi/pdf/10.22230/cjc.2008v33n2a2025 - Sunday, July 17, 2022 2:34:44 AM - IP Address:3.84.98.170


consent at the other; for example, aboriginal children in residential schools in Canada being physically punished for not speaking English to people being ignored and denied jobs, et cetera, because they have “accents” or are “difficult to understand.”

I think about this when people complain to me about “the immigrants,” and are taken aback when I respond by telling them that I am an immigrant, to at least try to make evident their racism, which they show me because of their assumptions about the colour of my skin as well as my accent. But in such situations, it is usually very difficult for individual speakers to use their own “agency” effectively. They must both conform to “standards” to an extent, as well as create institutions and spaces, so that their own creativity, history, and identity can flourish. Gramsci sees collective agency as that part of the process whereby the “standards” that used to be imposed, are then rejected by large portions of the population as being somehow “correct” and “true” without falling into the liberal individualist notion that we can all speak our own language.

BB: In the second chapter of your book, you suggested that both Bakhtin and Volosinov rejected monologic and as suppressing heteroglossia of language, to legitimate the idea that Gramsci was for a national unity of language. However, if we take Todorov’s suggestion of the “heterology” or “heteroglossia” nature of language, what would then be the difference between monologic and unity and between multiplicity and unity, since from whatever angle we approach language, we would end up knocking on the wall of the punctured nature of language, bared by specific societal parameters, values, and power?

Put differently, if as you suggested, “unity does not mean homogeneity, monoglossia, or uniaccentuality” but rather “includes uniqueness and differences that are not 'transcended,' 'overcome,' or merged” (p. 93), how do you see Gramsci’s view of unity in terms of nation and community building, especially if we consider the multicultural aspect and multiple social classes in Italy back then.

PI: There seem to me two issues here, a relatively straight forward one, and a very difficult one. I'll start with the first. Todorov's point here is in agreement with Gramsci, but contrary to many interpretations of Bakhtin and Volosinov. That is that language is not by its own nature “heterogloss,” because this would lead to the problematic contention that monologic language is somehow less linguistic or true to some ontological status of language, or perhaps some idealised abstraction of two or more speakers conversing all their differences with no claim of different evaluations or attempt at reconciliation. This would yield some version of Habermas' “ideal speech situation”一a utopia that even Habermas has to retreat from when pressed. Todorov argued that “heterology” is the result of social not linguistic diversity. It is a question of political values not a technical aspect of language, which leads us to evaluation heteroglossia.

In the book, I grapple with a similar question with what Gramsci means by stating that language is not parthenogenetic. Just as with heteroglossia being some

https://cjc.utpjournals.press/doi/pdf/10.22230/cjc.2008v33n2a2025 - Sunday, July 17, 2022 2:34:44 AM - IP Address:3.84.98.170


how part of the nature of language, at first it would seem that Gramsci is saying that languages cannot grow and change in isolation from other languages by their own nature. I argue, hopefully sufficiently, that Gramsci does not mean to define an underlying ontological essence that all language is basedon, since for him, language is a human institution and its “nature” is not defined outside of humanity. Thus, I conclude that he must be making a judgement, like Todorov is about society, about growth and change within language. Languages change and “generate^ through contact with other languages and social diversity. Put this way, it sounds as if there is a stark contradiction and paradox with Gramsci’s “search for unity” (or even “nationalism” although I’m hesitant of that label for him). This leads us to the much more complex issue.

My first response to this “paradox” is perhaps too easy, but I think there is a certain weight to it. That is that language provides a great metaphor for politics here, precisely because the “conformity” required to make a language a language that many people can understand does not prevent an individual from expressing their unique perspectives, arguments, feelings, et cetera. But unless individual expressions alter a language itself, we would not say that language has changed just because people are using it, even using it to express new things, even introducing a new word like the verb “to google." I can still talk about “searching for information about Gramsci on the internet” even though you might express that by saying you “googled Gramsci." But when, for example, English acquires a new word from a different language like “Inuit” (from Inuktatuk), which replaces “Eskimo” (apparently derived from Algonquian), Gramsci would consider this significant language change because it is connected to a more profound change in the entire conceptualization of an identity and how communities get to label themselves. Such changes cannot take place without individuals making the arguments, changing their language, et cetera, but individuals alone cannot make the change, it must become accepted.

Unlike the above “google” example, if you talk about “Eskimos” I will ask whether you really intend such a derogatory meaning and I will tell you that I think it is unacceptable. This is obviously a political and moral point that goes well beyond the question of whether or nort I understand who you are referring to. (I supppose I should also add that when talking to people from the US or Britain, depending on the context, I do not always go through the explanation, or least do so differently than I would with Canadians.)

The more complex aspect to this question focuses on the context in which Gramsci was searching for a “unity” and the character of that “unity,” which is not a dogmatic “same-ness” or “homogeneity” but a recognition of the harm done by the way capitalism in particular and exploitation and oppression more generally lead to fragmentation and separation of various ideals and values and especially from our lived experiences and labour (defined very broadly, as Gramsci does). Thus, in terms of nation and community building, as you asked, Gramsci is critical of whenever “difference” is used to increase, legitimate, or create conditions of exploitation, or prevent people from creating the solidarities that enable them to struggle against oppression and exploitation.

https://cjc.utpjournals.press/doi/pdf/10.22230/cjc.2008v33n2a2025 - Sunday, July 17, 2022 2:34:44 AM - IP Address:3.84.98.170


Thus, for him, it was really a “unity” within the world views of rural peasants and urban workers, which were being pitted against one another, where it was literally army brigades made up of southern peasants sent in to smash the strikes in cities like Turin in the north. The type of “common language” or hegemonic force was clearly required to be “unified” and even national given the role of the state in creating the army, creating economic policies fostering industrialization in the north at the expense of trade in the south, and the like. But I think the metaphor of language works well here in that such a political force is far from “centralized” and “totalitarian” even if it is pervasive and involved in every aspect of life including the entertainment one enjoys and how we identify ourselves.

BB: What could we learn more from Gramsci’s politics of language? In other words what did you learn in analyzing Gramsci’s work, and how could you apply it to, let’s say, the bilingual system in Canada?

PI: This is obviously a huge question, and one of my current research projects concerns so-called “global English” where I try to use Gramsci to make some headway in such debates. The first line of which is equally applicable to bilingualism in Canada, which is to insist that language questions cannot be divorced from political questions. My own failure to learn French, even though I’ve lived in Canada now for 16 years, is a political failure as well as an educational one. I cannot just hide behind the fact that I’ve had a lot of other things to do and also had to learn Italian in those years. But I also haven’t learned Cree or Hindi.

The second basic point that I think Gramsci drives home very well is that language is about so much more than communication and those other dimensions cannot be separated out from how it functions to allow us to communicate. I wrote an article last year for a new journal called Studies in Language and Capitalism where I tried to show how many scholars divorce the function of language as a vehicle of communication from its role “symbolically” to identity or culture. And I try to use Gramsci to show that this is not feasible. This is probably the most obvious way that the media deals with political language issues. Getting back to Canada and especially bilingualism, while I applaud the federal government’s bilingualism in many ways, and am very thankful I can send my daughter to French immersion, it is important to realize that this is hardly a “solution^ to the French/English language question, especially as many Québécois make clear, since their aim is not to foster the use of French across ‘Englishspeaking’ Canada. Gramsci’s concepts are useful here especially his notion of the formation of different types of intellectuals. His attention to class and the economics of culture would also lead to the point, familiar to many Canadians and Québécois, that language can easily become just a gate-keeping function that reinforces disparities in wealth and resources.

Ironically, though, more and more sociolinguists and people involved in education policy are decrying monolingualism of any sort. David Graddol, a prominent researcher for the British Council, has just issued a dire warning to the UK that knowing English will not be sufficient as it has been in the past. He urges the UK to bolster all its language learning education. I think we need to get beyond the

https://cjc.utpjournals.press/doi/pdf/10.22230/cjc.2008v33n2a2025 - Sunday, July 17, 2022 2:34:44 AM - IP Address:3.84.98.170


official bilingualism of the federal government and look to Iqualuit to start thinking about how we can try to redeem the atrocious history Canada has with regards to aboriginal languages. We also need to look at the linguistic realities of our multicultural urban centres and perhaps look to many in Europe who are being more explicit about linguistic diversity itself being a value. This may sound like a repeat of what you called a “paradox” or “contradiction” in my book concerning “unity” and “diversity,” but Gramsci was never against multilingualism per se. He pleaded that his niece and nephews be encouraged to speak Sardinian. But he also realized that political solidarity also has a linguistic component. Thus, if it is primarily only the elite in Canada who speak English and French, we are in trouble. As is also the case, if it is the elite in the Chinese, Indian, and African communities who are capable of communicating effectively to broad sections of the Canadian population.

BB: I’d have loved to continue this interesting and enlightening discussion; however, we do have to stop for now. Again, many thanks for your time and wonderful contribution in helping me and CJC readers better understand Gramsci’s complexity.

PI: Well, thank you so much for the opportunity and interest.

Notes

1. Ives introduces Bartoli with his starting point, which is “derived from Ascoli’s contention that where two languages come into contact, there is always conflict between them, just as there is between the cultures of which they form a part. Thus Bartoli (like Ascoli) finds that linguistics innovations are not solely parthenogeneti c or ‘spontaneous’： rather, they are the result of the relationships between different languages and different ,phases’ of the same language” (p. 25). However, a conflict arises as “Ascoli also maintained that the ,oral habits’ of a community are not simply the result of past acquisition and the history of that community; they also have a more permanent character, one that is connected to the anatomical structure of the glottis of different races” (p. 26).

The cultural and linguistic dimensions of hegemony: aspects of Gramsci’s debt to early Soviet cultural policy
Craig Brandist

Abstract

Gramsci spent almost two years living in Moscow in 1923—24 and 1925, where he was closely involved in the work of the Comintern as representative of the Italian Communist Party. While information on Gramsci’s time in Russia is still sketchy, we know that in addition to attending official events, he travelled to several Russian cities, including Petrograd, where he gave lectures. A trained linguist, Gramsci achieved a significant level of competence in Russian and was exposed to a wide range of political and intellectual debates where the cultural and linguistic dimensions of hegemony were central concerns. This pertained to questions of mass literacy, the standardization of languages and public discourse, the national question and questions of agitation and propaganda. The traces these debates left on Gramsci's Prison Notebooks have not been subjected to adequate scrutiny. This article will discuss these points of contact and correspondence, delineating how Gramsci was able to preserve and develop some of the most important critical thinking on the question of hegemony in the 1930s, when in Russia this had been severely stifled by Stalinism.

Keywords: Gramsci; Comintern; language; USSR; proletarian culture; national question

The cultural dimensions of Gramsci's political thought have attracted the attention of scholars for some decades now, but it is only relatively recently that the importance of Gramsci's training in historical linguistics under the tutelage of Matteo Bartoli has begun to receive the attention it deserves. Some excellent scholarship has opened up the linguistic dimensions of Gramsci's thought to scrutiny (Lo Piparo 1979; Ives 2003, 2004), undermining the facile attempts to absorb Gramsci's ideas about hegemony into a ‘culturalist' politics based on a post-structuralist theory of language that were all too common in the 1980s. Recognition of the importance of the question of the language in post-unification Italy and the theoretical debates that followed in its wake, such as Ascoli's discussion of the idea of linguistic substratum and Bartoli's linguistic geography, have emerged as especially significant in furthering our understanding of Gramsci's central concepts. An appreciation of the understanding of hegemony in Italian linguistics has served to supplement Perry Anderson's (1976) still valuable discussion of the history of the term in the Russian revolutionary movement, concentrating on the way in which the numerically small Russian proletariat could achieve leadership of the peasantry and the oppressed in the struggle against the autocracy. What has emerged is, however, a kind of stereoscopic vision in

Journal of Romance Studies doi：10.3167/jrs.2012.120303


Volume 12 Number 3, Winter 2012: 24—43 ISSN 1473-3536 (Print), ISSN 1752-2331 (Online) which the specificity of Gramsci’s political thought is to be explained by a fusion of Italian linguistics and cultural politics on the one hand and Russian Marxism on the other. In his frequently excellent work on Language and Hegemony in Gramsci Peter Ives (1984: 100) goes so far as to argue that, in his 29th notebook, Gramsci suggests that structures of language, especially different types of grammar, are metaphors for hegemony, but I think it would be more accurate to say that the debates to which Gramsci was exposed in Russia alerted him to the fact that linguistic and cultural questions were crucial dimensions of hegemony; that they were integrated at a molecular level, as it were.

Anderson usefully began an attempt to historicize Gramsci’s theory of hegemony by placing it within the debates of the Comintern in the early 1920s, when the concept was applied to the struggle in the West. However, we still have no adequate study of the integration of Gramsci’s ideas into the debates in Russia in the mid-1920s, which were more wide ranging than is generally supposed. This article is an attempt to open one aspect of this integration to further consideration. Gramsci spent the periods from June 1922 to November 1923 and March to April 1925 in Moscow. He attended, as representative of the Italian Communist Party (PCI), the Second Plenum of the Comintern in June 1922, the Fourth Congress of the Comintern in November and December 1922 and the Fifth Plenum in March 1925.1 During his first visit Gramsci also attended the Twelfth All-Russia Party Conference as a Comintern delegate in August 1922 (Carlucci and Balistreri 2011), and the crucial Twelfth Party Congress took place in April 1923, which he undoubtedly followed closely. We also now know that despite illness, Gramsci developed wider contacts in Russia; he evidently made significant progress in learning Russian, had sustained discussions with Bukharin, Zinoviev, Radek, Commissar of Enlightenment Lunacharskii and Trotskii. He travelled to several cities, including Petrograd on more than one occasion, moving in literary and publishing circles and giving lectures at Party schools. While details are still very sketchy, it is clear that Gramsci did not limit his attention to the narrow business of the Italian delegation to the Comintern.

One reason for the stereoscopic vision noted above was Anderson’s (1976: 17) contention that after the October Revolution, the term hegemony fell into ‘relative disuse in the Bolshevik Party’ since it had been forged to theorize the role of the working class in the bourgeois revolution and was ‘rendered inoperative5 by the advent of a socialist revolution. This led many to assume Gramsci’s later development of the concept was due to purely Italian sources. This was not accurate, however. Peter Thomas (2009: 232—34) shows that Gramsci’s use of the term was significantly influenced by the way the problematic of hegemony was reformulated at the Eighth and Tenth congresses of the Bolshevik Party in 1919 and 1921, respectively. The latter marked the Party’s shift to the new situation of the New Economic Policy (NEP). Thomas rightly notes that the new orientation combined a retreat to guarantee survival of the revolutionary state and a political form that would support and nourish an international struggle just as the revolutionary wave was subsiding. This found its expression in a strategy that coupled the maintenance of proletarian hegemony over subaltern classes and dictatorship over the bourgeoisie. This required the proletariat to make ‘economico-political’ sacrifices to the subaltern masses to help them to move towards socialism. The contemporary importance of the concept of hegemony was stressed while Gramsci was in Russia in a speech by Grigorii Zinoviev, then (with Stalin and Kamenev) a member of the ruling triumvirate and head of the Comintern, speaking at the Twelfth Party Congress in April 1923:

One has to know how to understand the hegemony of the proletariat. In 1895 it led to the formation of the ‘Union for the Liberation of the Working Class'. In 1903 it led us to create an organization of professional revolutionaries. In 1912 it led us to maintain the Bolshevik centre at a time of counter-revolution [...] In 1917 it led to an uprising. In 1918—1919 it led us to organize the Red Army and learn to wage war. In 1920—1921 the hegemony of the proletariat consisted in helping to improve the situation of the peasantry and enter into contacts with them, to revive the agricultural economy. In 1923 hegemony demands we organize the export of bread. And in 1930 hegemony may be expressed in Russian communards fighting side by side with foreign workers on the streets of European capitals. (RKP(b) 1968 [1923]： 28)

Bukharin also used the term on numerous occasions, stressing the need to maintain the smychka [union] between the proletariat and peasantry, and this undoubtedly helped to shape Gramsci's conception of hegemony in the 1920s (Boothman 2008; McNally 2009, 2011). Even though many commentators since Anderson (1976: 21) have commented on the ‘powerful cultural emphasis that the idea of hegemony acquired in Gramsci's work', this has not been connected to the way in which the term ‘hegemony’ became a vital concept in discussions about the cultural sphere in conditions of the NEP. Indeed, the term was most commonly used in debates over the cultural dimensions of policy when Gramsci was in Russia.

Cultural hegemony

The cultural dimensions of the struggle for hegemony had been present in the programme of the Vpered [Forward] group within the Bolsheviks before the revolution, which included Aleksandr Bogdanov and Lunacharskii among its leaders. Responding to the defeat of the 1905 revolution, the group combined an abstentionist position over participation in the Duma, and a syndicalist belief that the proletariat needed a collectivist myth to unite in the face of bourgeois individualism, with a pedagogical conception of politics that ultimately matured into the idea of roletarian culture. Bogdanov was the intellectual driving force of the Vpered group, basing his ideas on a monistic positivism that presented the world as pure experience, with the experience of the proletariat, organized collectively in its labour activity and developing comradely relations, seen as providing the decisive force for revolutionary change. He argued it was possible and necessary for the proletariat to create its own culture within the current society that would be more vibrant and free than the declining culture of the bourgeoisie, which should be approached and utilized with considerable caution. The hegemony of bourgeois ideology beyond the immediate workplace rendered workers unable to act as a revolutionary collective because it prevented them from perceiving their actual position and role in society. The Party must therefore establish proletarian universities in advance of the seizure of power to counter this influence and systematize the lived experience of the proletariat. Proletarian culture would organize human perception and action, overcome mere spontaneity and so move society towards the classless culture of the future. The Party should thus foster a collectivist psychology among the proletariat and recognize that the ‘general cultural hegemony’ [‘vseobshchaia kul’turnaia gegemoniia’] (quoted in Sochor 1981: 72; Scherrer 1989: 201) of the proletariat precedes and determines the success of the political and economic revolution.3 For Bogdanov, writing in 1909:

There is only one solution: to use the past, bourgeois culture to create a new proletarian culture that can be counterposed to bourgeois culture, and to spread it among the masses: to develop proletarian science, strengthen genuine comradely relations among the proletarian milieu, work out a proletarian philosophy, to direct art to the side of proletarian strivings and experience. (Bogdanov 1995 [1909]: 56)

This became the focus of the school for socialist workers that Bogdanov, Lunacharskii and Maksim Gor’kii established on the Italian island of Capri in 1909, and then in Bologna in 1911. However, drawing on German Romanticism and the ideas of Joseph Dietzgen, Lunacharskii and Gor’kii accentuated the mythical dimension of proletarian culture, arguing such culture would appeal to the religious needs of the proletariat, since the individual proletarian would achieve immortality through the body of the collective.4 The programme of Vpered influenced the development of Proletarskie kulturno-prosvetitelnye organizatsii [Proletarian Cultural and Enlightenment Organizations] known as Proletkul't, which was established one week before the October 1917 revolution, with Lunacharskii as one of its main organizers. Bogdanov became involved the following year. Proletkul't was not, however, a simple expression of the Vpered programme. Between the February and October 1917 revolutions Lunacharskii returned to Russia, rejoined the Bolsheviks, was reconciled with Lenin and, following the October Revolution, became the first Commissar of Enlightenment, working alongside Lenin’s wife Nadezhda Krupskaia. As Maria Levchenko (2007: 39-40) argues, the Proletkul't programme emerged as a fusion of the Vperedist conception of culture and the Bolshevik political programme in the context of a victorious proletarian revolution, and the main pronouncements of the Proletkul't theorists at the inception of the organization constituted a ‘palimpsest’ of the two trends. Proletkul't developed into a large organization with a significant number of publications during the Russian Civil War 1918-21. This was less a result of the Vperedist programme, however, than of the success of the October Revolution, even though the Vperedist conception of proletarian culture still predominated and Bogdanov played an important role. When Lenin and Bogdanov clashed over the latter’s demands for the independence of Proletkul't from the new proletarian state, Lunacharskii sided with Lenin, and Proletkul't was subsequently subordinated to the Commissariat of Enlightenment headed by Lunacharskii. In the summer of 1920, Lunacharskii established an International Bureau of Proletkul't at a meeting that immediately followed the Second Congress of the Comintern with Nicola Bombacci as representative from Italy. The bureau identified its first tasks to be ‘spreading the principles of proletarian culture, creation of Proletkul’t organizations in all countries and to prepare for a World Congress of Proletkul’t’ (Anon. 1920: 5).

Gramsci’s intellectual debt to the ideas of the Vperedists has been discussed by Zenovia Sochor (1981), who must be credited with opening up a valuable line of enquiry by showing an important source of Gramsci’s thinking about the cultural dimensions of hegemony. Her argument is, however, based less on a search for sources than an exaggerated contrast between Gramsci and Lenin. Gramsci’s exposure to the ideas of the Vperedists came through Proletkul’t in the post-revolutionary period when the Vperedist conception of culture had been fused with the Leninist programme.5 Indeed, we can see a shift of emphasis in Gramsci’s ideas about proletarian culture that coincides with his shift towards Leninism and the foundation of the Italian Communist Party. Gramsci was involved in setting up an affiliated Institute of Proletarian Culture in Turin and was clearly familiar with the project of attaining ‘general cultural hegemony’. In June 1920 he was arguing in terms distinctly reminiscent of the Vperedists that ‘esistono già gli elementi di una civiltà originale proletaria5 (Gramsci 1987: 558) [‘elements of an original proletarian civilization already exist’ (Gramsci 1985: 18)] and that ‘esistono già le forze proletarie produttive di valori culturali5 (1987: 556) [‘there are already proletarian forces of production of cultural values’ (1985: 41)]. By January 1921, however, Gramsci was facing the defeat of the Factory Council movement and was struggling against the legacy of syndicalism and abstentionism in the workers’ movement. Focus was shifting decisively to the political terrain and to the formation of a Communist Party, with Lenin’s 1920 pamphlet Left-Wing Communism: An Infantile Disorder providing crucial guidance. Gramsci was now clear that the full development of a proletarian culture was possible only having passed ‘dal potere capitalista al potere operaio’ (Gramsci 1966: 20) [‘from capitalist power to workers’ power’], and that before this time the only foreseeable thing was

questa ipotesi generale: esisterà una cultura (una civiltà) proletaria totalmente diversa da quella borghese; anche in questo campo verranno spezzate le distinzioni di classe, verrà spezzato il carrierismo borghese; esisterà una poesia, un romanzo, un teatro, un costume, una lingua, una pittura, una musica caratteristici della civiltà proletaria, fioritura e ornamento dell'organizzazione sociale proletaria. (Gramsci 1966: 22)

[this general hypothesis: there will be a proletarian culture (a civilization) totally different from the bourgeois one and in this field too class distinctions will be shattered. Bourgeois careerism will be shattered and there will be a poetry, a novel, a theatre, a moral code, a language, a painting and a music peculiar to proletarian civilization, the flowering and ornament of proletarian social organization. (Gramsci 1985: 50—51)]

In present conditions what remains is

distruggere gerarchie spirituali, pregiudizi, idoli, tradizioni irrigidite, significa non aver paura delle novità e delle audacie, non aver paura dei mostri, non credere che il mondo caschi se un operaio fa errori di grammatica, se una poesia zoppica, se un quadro assomiglia a un cartellone, se la gioventù fa tanto di naso alla senilità accademica e rimbambita. (Gramsci 1966: 22)

[to destroy spiritual hierarchies, prejudices, idols and ossified traditions. It means not to be afraid of innovations and audacities, not to be afraid of monsters, not to believe that the world will collapse if a worker makes grammatical mistakes, if a poem limps, if a picture resembles a hoarding or if young men sneer at academic and feeble-minded senility. (Gramsci 1985: 51)]

Gramsci’s involvement with the projected Institute was evidently significant enough for him to take a leading role in the drafting of the programme and statutes of the Institute, which were submitted to the Moscow Proletkul’t for approval in January 1922 (Gramsci et al. 1922). The Central Committee of the Institute allegedly met much less frequently after Gramsci left for Moscow in May of that year (Carlucci 2009: 137). While in Moscow as delegates to the Comintern in October 1922, Gramsci and Angelo Tasca were among Comintern delegates who met with the chair of Proletkul't Valerian Pletnev to develop the cultural dimensions of the work of the International (Biggart 2001). In this light it is highly likely that Proletkul't conceptions of cultural hegemony and what Gramsci was later to call organic intellectuals informed his sensitivity of the cultural and political dimensions of proletarian hegemony, even if there is little evidence he shared the utopianism of the organization's founders (Sochor 1981; Scherrer 1989 and 1999). By this time, however, Proletkul't was in terminal decline, starved of resources as part of the swingeing public spending cuts that followed the end of the Civil War (Mally 1990: 193—228).

During the NEP period, many of Bogdanov's ideas about proletarian culture found an advocate in Nikolai Bukharin, who ultimately tried to reconcile certain of Bogdanov's ideas with Lenin's final writings about combating the growth of the bureaucracy to create a general theory of cultural revolution (Biggart 1992). One of the many differences between Lenin on the one hand and Bogdanov and Bukharin on the other, regarding this question, was the latter's contention that it was the technical intelligentsia that represented the greatest danger to the revolution, by potentially becoming a new ruling class. Bukharin thus linked the struggle against bureaucratization with the development of proletarian culture, but this was to develop fully only after Lenin's death, since the latter specifically viewed the intelligentsia as an ally in the fight against bureaucratization. The debate about proletarian culture was launched in the Soviet press while Gramsci was in Russia, as a result of rising concern that a restoration of bourgeois ideology would accompany the restoration of market forces under the NEP. The Politburo launched the debate in Pravda at the end of August 1922, and it engaged the Party's leading theoreticians for a number of years. As Biggart (1987: 235) notes, the debate concerned whether, in exercising political and economic dominance, the proletariat had a culture specific to itself, and it ‘raised the broader issue of redefining socialist revolution in cultural terms'.

The term ‘hegemony' (gegemoniia) soon became a crucial point of contention in the debate. On 16 September 1923 Trotskii published an article in Pravda, which would also appear in his book Literature and Revolution, arguing that the idea of proletarian culture was incoherent since the proletarian dictatorship would only mark a relatively brief period between capitalism and a classless society. He thus maintained that a party that lays claim to ‘ideological hegemony’ should not presume to judge the work of fellow traveller writers with the arrogance characteristic of certain ‘Marxists in literature5 (Trotskii 1991 [1923]: 251, 243). The point infuriated bellicose advocates of proletarian literature, who linked Trotskii’s position with his lack of confidence in the ability of the Russian proletariat to move towards socialism in conditions when the immediate revolutionary wave in Europe had subsided. The argument was thus connected to Trotskii’s move towards opposition to the policy that would subsequently become ‘socialism in one country’. Writing in one of the periodicals of Proletkul't, Nikolai Chuzhak (1923: 81) objected that Trotskii reduced the exercise of the Party’s ideological ‘hegemony’ in literature to ‘attentive monitoring’， while between 1923 and 1925 the Moscow-based journal Na Postu [On Guard] constantly demanded the implementation of the hegemony of proletarian literature by giving its advocates a leading role in all Soviet literary publications. These claims became especially bold after the On Guardists had gained control of the All-Union Association of Proletarian Writers (VAPP). At the First Congress of VAPP in January 1925 a resolution was passed in which it was stated that mere recognition of proletarian literature was no longer sufficient, for now there must be ‘recognition of the principle of the hegemony of this literature [...] an unyielding, systematic struggle [...] for victory, for the absorption of all types and kinds of bourgeois and petty-bourgeois literature’ (VAPP 1925).

At a meeting of the Central Committee of the Russian Communist Party to discuss the question of the Party’s literary policy a month later Bukharin (1993 [1925]: 73) slapped down the On Guardists for actually demanding the ‘principle of the hegemony of VAPP’, but he endorsed the principle of the hegemony of proletarian literature:

When we won power, then in that very struggle, the direct revolutionary overturn, we already won the historical right to hegemony. We have that. We earned it by standing out in the struggle on the barricades, a struggle that brought all our previous organizational work, political tempering, political experience — all those features that are necessary for a triumphant revolution, to fruition. But when we turn to the question of art, science and so on, and we ask ourselves whether our hegemony has matured, then I maintain that it has not. If it has still not matured, and if we are entering an epoch when we conquered political power while our cultural hegemony had still not matured, then, comrades, it is quite clear that it is our task to pose the matter in such a way that will enable us to win that hegemony. Or, as I say, we must earn the historical right to social leadership [rukovodstvo] through our own prominence in the fields of literature and culture.

This principle was codified in the Party decree of July 1925, in which the possibility of proletarian culture was officially accepted for the first time, and where it was stated that ‘There is not yet a hegemony of proletarian writers, and the Party must help these writers win for themselves the historic right to this hegemony’ (RKP(b) 1925).

Herman Ermolaev (1963: 44—54) was undoubtedly correct to note that in placing proletarian culture as ‘a practical task of the moment’ the 1925 resolution marks the abandonment of the Leninist policy towards literature. It nevertheless codified the merging of the Vperedist and Leninist approaches that had coexisted since the beginning of the revolution. Gramsci inherited this dual perspective, and it formed one of the most fundamental aspects of his theory of hegemony. Thus, in the Notebooks, Gramsci highlights the ‘contrasto tra il pensare e l'operare' [‘contrast between thought and action'] that expresses the ‘contrasti più profondi di ordine storico sociale' (Gramsci 1975: 1379) [‘profounder contrasts of the social historical order']. Gramsci's famous discussion of the ‘coscienza contraddittoria' [‘contradictory consciousness'] of the ‘uomo attivo di massa' [‘active man-in-the-mass'] revolves around a contrast between a conception ‘implicita nel suo operare e che realmente lo unisce a tutti i suoi collaboratori nella trasformazione pratica della realtà e una superficialmente esplicita o verbale che ha ereditato dal passato e ha accolto senza critica' (Gramsci 1975: 1385) [‘implicit in his activity and which in reality unites him with all his fellow-workers in the practical transformation of the real world; and one, superficially explicit or verbal, which he has inherited from the past and uncritically absorbed' (Gramsci 1971: 333)]. Here we have precisely the Vperedist contrast between embryonic proletarian culture which, in Bogdanovian style, is implicit in the collective labour experience of the proletariat, and the inherited culture of the bourgeoisie which bears the organizing principle of social life appropriate to that class. The development of a ‘comprensione critica di se stessi' [‘critical understanding of self] now grows out of a struggle of hegemonies, moving from the ‘senso [...] di indipendenza appena istintivo' [‘instinctive feeling of independence'] to the ‘elaborazione superiore della propria concezione del reale' (Gramsci 1975: 1385) [‘possession of a single and coherent conception of the world']. This involves the creation of intellectuals who are specialized in the ‘elaborazione concettuale e filosofica' (1975: 1386) [‘conceptual and philosophical elaboration of ideas'] but who ‘sorgano direttamente dalla massa pur rimanendo a contatto con essa per diventarne le “stecche" del busto' (1975: 1392) [‘arise directly out of the masses, but remain in contact with them to become, as it were, the whalebone in the corset' (Gramsci 1971: 340)].

The national-popular question

Gramsci develops this argument in a very different direction to Bogdanov, however. While he was in Russia Gramsci was won over to the perspective of the United Front, which meant the need for the proletariat's ‘economic-corporate' self-interest to be subordinated to the cause of building alliances with the peasantry and other ‘subaltern' social groups. In place of proletarian culture we now have the need to build a ‘national-popular' collective will, which entailed, inter alia, the development of a shared language and cultural forms. In these discussions Gramsci went beyond both Lenin and the Vperedists in developing a theoretical understanding of the importance of language in political life. Lenin had significant insights into the relationship between the language and national questions, a sensitivity to the importance of language use in concrete political situations and he was keenly aware of the importance of raising the level of literacy among the general population, but this was not backed by theoretical insight into linguistic questions.6 Bogdanov’s writings on language were largely a restatement of the ideas of the German monistic philosopher and philologist Ludwig Noiré (1885) who, following Schopenhauer, grounded both thought and language in the Will. In Noiré’s interpretation this meant language originated in labour cries, which Bogdanov linked to his own theory that forms of culture all derive from the work process as such.7 As recent scholarship has shown, Gramsci’s grounding in Italian linguistic theory led him in a different direction, however, and this allowed him to distil theoretical principles from the extraordinarily prescient and complex linguistic issues that forced their way into the attention of political leaders and intellectuals more generally as the Soviet Union was in the process of formation.

The Tsarist linguistic legacy did not provide a common vernacular any more than in the Italian case, but for different reasons. Full literacy existed in pockets across a huge area, while the majority of the population was either illiterate or partially literate, and spoke a range of non-standard dialects among themselves. The collapse of the state bureaucracy, military disintegration and tsunami of mass democracy destroyed the official public discourse, while the Civil War destroyed the social ties within communities, mixed up the population, led to a militarization and bureaucratization of what remained. Semantic shifts, neologisms, acronyms, foreign borrowings and military metaphors flooded the spoken language, disrupted communication and obstructed education among the nominally Russian-speaking population. This attracted the attention of linguists as early as 1919, and Lenin himself was among the Party leaders who expressed concern about the situation. By the mid-1920s a series of competing solutions were being formulated, ranging from the propagation of the language of the pre-revolutionary classics (favoured by Gorky and others), through investing the colloquial language with wider social functions and encouraging the emergence of a standard that was close to that spoken by the masses, to an interventionist strategy through which radical intellectuals (poets, linguists, journalists) would act as linguistic technicians (favoured by the futurists and given theoretical expression by the leading linguist Grigorii Vinokur), drawing on the linguistic creativity of the newly enfranchised masses to renew the public discourse and make it into a medium of enlightenment.8 This was precisely a debate about the relationship between what in Notebook 29 Gramsci was to call normative and spontaneous or immanent grammars (1975: 2342—45, 2346—48; 1985: 180—82, 184— 85): was the former to be imposed on the latter, or was a new norm to emerge from the interactions between spontaneous grammars? It also, crucially, raised the issue of the role of intellectuals in this process: of the traditional intellectuals inherited from pre-revolutionary times, and of the organic intellectuals that arose from the workers and peasants themselves. This last group included proletkul't but also the worker and peasant correspondents (rabkory and sel'kory) that formed the backbone of the Soviet popular press in the 1920s and acted as verbal conduits between the state and the masses (Clibbon 1993).9 Here, language was by no means simply a technical medium, but the embodiment and articulation of socio-specific world views, and the attention of many Party leaders, including Trotskii (1973 [1924]) and Bukharin (1924), were concerned with the delicate balance between the need to adj ust the language of the press to the needs of the masses, and the need to raise the verbal skills of the masses. The same issue came to light in a path-breaking 1924—25 study of the language of Red Army soldiers in which it was found that many soldiers left the army still making elementary mistakes, mixing up the meaning of words on the basis of phonetic misrecognition and mechanical assimilation of political language into a substratum of pre-existing notions. Instead of being integrated into the world view of the recruits, helping to structure and enable independent thought and articulation, jargon led to a distorted understanding where the capacity to form an independent and coherent perspective was being undermined (Brandist 2010). The question of normative grammar was the question of hegemony, and the principle that needed to be decided was which hegemonic principle would be adopted.10

These questions were particularly being pursued at Party pedagogical and state research institutions in Petrograd when Gramsci visited there, beginning with the formation of the Institute of the Living Word in 1918 but quickly spreading to other institutes. At the opening of the Institute of the Living Word in Petrograd in 1918, Lunacharskii explicitly connected the mission of the institute to ‘teach the masses to speak publicly’ to isegoria, the equality of speech, that formed the basis of ancient Athenian democracy (Zapiski 1919: 23—25). It was in these institutions that some of the pre-revolutionary linguistic scholarship, which had just begun to turn to questions of the social stratification of language, began to form into path-breaking work on the relationship between social dialects and the standard language, and between what the Formalist turned Marxist, Lev Iakubinskii (1931), would call ‘proletarian discursive method’ and political leadership (see also Brandist 2007 and Brandist and Lähteenmäki 2010). We now know that Gramsci visited party schools in Petrograd in 1923 and the Red Army Pedagogical (previously the Tolmachev) Institute in 1925 (Lussana 2007), at precisely the time when techniques of agitation and propaganda were being subjected to linguistic analysis, along with systematic attempts to address the much-discussed communication gap. Top linguists were working simultaneously at Party pedagogical and state research institutes. While the theoretical work only really began to find systematic exposition in the later part of the 1920s, when the political situation had changed quite drastically, the practical work at this time laid the basis for important theoretical work that, as we shall see, has so many conceptual and terminological parallels with the later work of Gramsci, that it seems very unlikely that there was no significant influence.

The national question

Another crucial area in which hegemony remained a vital concept, and was closely entwined with linguistic and cultural issues, was the national question. Speaking at the Twelfth Party Congress in April 1923, Zinoviev noted that ‘we must remain the hegemons of the Union of Soviet Republics and be an example to all the peoples of the East and to the whole world’，the ‘hegemony of the proletariat [...] cannot properly exist if we do not solve the national question’ (RKP(b) 1968 [1923]: 606—7). The Russian proletariat had to try to achieve and maintain leadership over a wide variety of ethnic groups and cultures, many of whom had none of the features fundamental to a nation state such as a specifically national sense of identity, culture or even a standard form of language. Here both Bukharin and Zinoviev followed Lenin’s advice, the former arguing that as members of a ‘former great-power nation’ the Russian proletariat must ‘head-off national strivings and place ourselves in an unequal position in the sense of making even greater concessions to national currents’ as only this would allow us to ‘purchase the real trust of previously oppressed nations' (RKP(b) 1968 [1923]: 613). Zinoviev claimed that ‘despite our poverty', and though ‘our nation’s resources are miserly’, we must provide ‘material help to the peasants, and especially to the peasants of the frontier areas that speak other languages, to all peoples that were previously oppressed' (RKP(b) 1968 [1923]: 605).

The language question was here a particularly important aspect of maintaining the hegemony of the Russian proletariat. Before the revolution Lenin had specifically opposed all calls for the status of Russian as the official language and demanded all nationalities have the right to education and administration in their native language. Imposition of Russian could only be perceived as a colonial policy, but Lenin believed that as long as there was no compulsion and all languages had equal rights, the Russian language would naturally become the lingua franca of the voluntary union because of the advantages its use implied (Lenin 1983: 134—36). This became policy in 1917, but the problem was that many peoples had a very weak sense of national identity and no standard, written form of language, making implementation an enormous task, while resources were scarce indeed. The proletariat here still had to lead the struggle to achieve the tasks of the bourgeois revolution, but this no longer required the overthrow of an autocracy, but the construction of the cultural forms of the nation state in alliance with the progressive intelligentsias of the former colonies. Here the formation of normative grammars from spontaneous grammars was even more problematic than in the Russian-speaking territories since there was no previous norm that could inform it. There could scarcely have been a better example of the entwinement of language, culture and hegemony. Across central Asia and the Caucasus, Soviet ethnographers and linguists worked with groups of nationalist intellectuals such as the Jadids, to delimit national territories and codify standard forms of languages that would facilitate the development of an indigenous administration, education system and publishing industry.11 Resources were redirected from the Russian heartland to the less developed national regions to facilitate this development, all understood as economic concessions made by the Russian proletariat to demonstrate to the national regions that their interests were best served through voluntary alliance with the Russian proletariat. Here, writ large, was a clear illustration of the need for hegemony to be won and maintained through economic-corporate concessions by the northern Italian proletariat to the less developed parts of the Italian peninsula.

Throughout 1922 and 1923 it became increasingly apparent that there were important areas in which this policy was not being implemented, and influential figures within the Party and administration, such as the head of the Jewish Commissariat and chief Narkomnats spokesman on education S.M. Dimanshtein (1886—1938), arguing that since the revolution had overthrown the domination of a single nationality, that is, Russia, there was no longer a need for any national guarantees. For Dimanshtein the national question was now simply one requiring the translation of central policies into local languages, for language was merely a technical medium rather than the embodiment of a world view (Smith 1999: 146—47). The central administration was now beginning to assert itself at the expense of the autonomous regional administrations that formed the foundation of what became known as the policy of korenizatsiia or 'indiginization' (Martin 2001). The conflict came to a head with the so-called Georgian affair that led to a split between an already ailing Lenin and Commissar of Nationalities and Party General Secretary Stalin. Lenin's critical letters on Stalin's approach to the national question were released to delegates as the Twelfth Party Congress opened in April 1923, but it seems that despite Lenin asking Trotskii to champion this cause, Trotskii agreed with the Party leadership not to do so either in exchange for the right to state his positions on the economy or because he knew Stalin would accept amendments on the issue (Deutcher 1987: 92, 98—99; Vilkova 1996: 23). After an extremely lively debate Stalin did indeed face a series of amendments on the national question, to which he yielded. As Jeremy Smith notes, while centralization of the political and economic structures was being reinforced, the rights and status of the national minorities remained strong for most of the 1920s as a result (1999: 213—28). Central to the concessions Stalin made were legal guarantees for the language and education rights of the nationalities, with the result that national cultures would be promoted as a crucial element of the Soviet Union (Smith 1999: 227—28). While the issues surrounding the treatment of national minorities and cultures were less important for the Italian situation than for Russia, exposure to such debates heightened Gramsci's sensitivity to this issue, as is illustrated by the April 1926 programme of work for the PCI, part of what is better known as the Lyons Theses. Archival material shows Gramsci authored a short section on the 'National Movement', in which he argues the Party needs to pay special attention to the German and Croat national minorities in order to create a left wing within national parties to oppose the opportunism of their leaders, limit bourgeois influence and promote union with the revolutionary proletariat (RGASPI 513/1/398/ll.19-41, l.18; cf. Pecchioli 1985: 321).

Being schooled in Bartoli's linguistic geography, Gramsci was well placed to perceive the cultural and linguistic dimensions of the national question and to appreciate the political significance of the relationship between national languages and regional and social dialects. In the early 1920s philologists and orientalists, many of whom had advocated policies strikingly similar to korenizatsiia in the years between 1905 and 1917 (Hirsch 2005; Tolz 2011), were drafted in to codify standard forms of languages and create scripts for them (Smith 1998). Grants were made available for these practical matters and for theoretical reflection on the relationship between language, world view and social structure. A variety of theoretical approaches arose, most claiming to be specifically Marxist, and some claiming to be leading to a specifically Marxist linguistics. However, all tended to be Marxist recastings of preexisting philological, anthropological and sociological trends (Alpatov 2000). The results were no less impressive for all that: for the first time an elaborated sociolinguistics emerged along with path-breaking investigations into what is now generally known as ‘linguistic ideology’ (Brandist 2003). The relationship between language structure and other domains of culture were pioneered decades before structuralists turned to the problem, and the relationship between philology, oriental scholarship and imperialism was subject to a systematic analysis long before Edward Said was to launch the paradigm of ‘orientalism’ at the end of the 1970s.

The resulting formulations of Soviet linguists in the late 1920s and 1930s are remarkably similar to Gramsci’s writings on language and hegemony in the Notebooks, which may explain why one of the earliest works dedicated to Gramsci’s linguistic ideas was published in Russia (Egerman 1954). One notable example is Evgenii Polivanov, who simultaneously worked on the creation of national languages for the Turkic-speaking peoples of central Asia and theorized the relationship between national languages and social dialects. In Russia, he argued, in terms distinctly reminiscent of Gramsci’s adoption of Ascoli’s theory of linguistic substratum, there had been a transferral of the national language to what he called a new ‘collective human substratum’, which inevitably brought about changes in the language itself (Polivanov 1974 [1927]: 181). Polivanov seeks to characterize the mechanism of ‘evolutionary innovations' (novshchestvo) (1974 [1931]: 84; 2003 [1931]: 40), tracing the sources of new terminology and concepts that have entered official languages and ‘collective consciousness’ (1974 [1928]: 197) because of the revolution. These are found, variously in other national languages, social dialects or political discourse, the latter of which had changed fundamentally. Gramsci similarly traces the sources of diffusion of linguistic innovations in Notebook 29 (1975: 2345—46). In Notebook 6 Gramsci argues the following:

La storia delle lingue è storia delle innovazioni linguistiche, ma queste innovazioni non sono individuali (come avviene nell'arte) ma sono di un'intera comunità sociale che ha innovato la sua cultura, che ha ‘progredito' storicamente: naturalmente anch'esse diventano individuali, ma non dell'individuo-artista, dell'individuo — elemento storico-[culturale] completo determinato. Anche nella lingua non c'è partenogenesi, cioè la lingua che produce altra lingua, ma c'è innovazione per interferenze di culture diverse ecc.[...] L'interferenza e l'influenza ‘molecolare' può avvenire nello stesso seno di una nazione, tra diversi strati ecc; una nuova classe che diventa dirigente innova come ‘massa'; il gergo dei mestieri ecc. Cioè delle società particolari, innovano molecolarmente. (Gramsci 1975: 738-39)

[The history of languages is the history of linguistic innovations, but these innovations are not individual (as is the case in art). They are those of a whole social community that has renewed its culture and has ‘progressed' historically. Naturally, they too become individual, yet not in the artist-individual, but in the individual as a complete, determinate historical-cultural element. In language too there is no parthenogenesis, language producing other language. Innovations occur through the interference of different cultures (...). There can be interference and a ‘molecular' interference within a single nation, between various strata, etc.; a new ruling class brings about alterations as a ‘mass’ but the jargons of various professions, of specific societies, innovate in a molecular way. (Gramsci 1985: 177-78)]

The problem was that, just as these developments were reaching fruition in the USSR, the entire sociopolitical situation was changing fundamentally. With the launch of the first Five Year Plan the bureaucracy decisively separated itself from the interests of the proletariat and oppressed masses and was transformed into an independent and self conscious force. Korenizatsiia was drastically curtailed. The distinction between Party and state institutions collapsed along with the primacy of scientific over statutory authority in the distribution of what Bourdieu calls symbolic capital. Debates over the way to solve the communication gap and forge a new public discourse were resolved in one way: the Party-state bureaucracy would regulate the production, and nurture the growth, of a new public discourse according to the necessities of its own reproduction. Figures closely associated with propagating alternative approaches to the questions of cultural and linguistic hegemony were removed from positions of influence, expelled from the Party or sometimes worse. The National Communists, who were the embodiment of the attempt to integrate and organize diverse world views, were subjected to particularly harsh treatment, and few survived the 1930s. Political discourse underwent a fundamental distortion, symptomatic of which was the fate of the Institute of the Living Word, which ultimately became the Volodarskii Institute of Agitation, a management training institute aimed not at facilitating democratic engagement but cajoling workers into fulfilling plans laid down in advance.

Effects on the theoretical work that emerged in the wake of these political and institutional changes were profound, but less direct and immediate. One of the most significant works of the late 1920s was Lev lakubinskii’s 1929—30 articles on the formation of the Russian national language, in which he traced how the development of capitalism had led to the rise of a common urban language that progressively but unevenly displaced the self-enclosed, dialectal plurality of the peasantry.12 Under capitalism, public speaking assumes the character of mass communication, both oral, in parliaments and courts, and written. As large-scale industrialization gathered the proletariat into large units and the national language was consolidated, professional began to displace regional differentiation, but it became clear to workers that their interests lay in the adoption of the common, public language. They also needed to participate in fora such as trade union meetings, court etc. lakubinskii saw this in the splintering of the unitary language according to the ideological fissures of the contending classes under capitalism, for the proletarian social dialect embodies a socio-specific psychology and ideology. For lakubinskii, this ideology is not defined by specific linguistic differences as such, but through the way in which common linguistic material is selected and applied in concrete circumstances. Lenin’s use of language in his polemical writings is held up as a model for this ‘proletarian discursive method’. Three years later, in 1932, one of lakubinskii’s most talented students, Viktor Gofman (1932), developed this into a full-scale study, The Word of the Orator, in which the Party of Lenin and Stalin was held up as the model for a unitary proletarian discourse in all areas of social life and the chief legislator in the formation of a truly common national language which is only possible under socialism. Social dialects would now disappear into a unitary national language.

While the ideological distortions of Stalinism are here quite plain to see, the conceptions underlying Gramsci’s ideas about the politics of language have also survived. This is especially clear if we turn to Viktor Zhirmunskii’s 1936 study National Language and Social Dialects. In a passage from Notebook 6, immediately preceding the passage about innovations quoted above, Gramsci argued that ‘tra il dialetto e la lingua nazionale-letteraria qualcosa è mutato: precisamente l’ambiente culturale, politico-morale-sentimentale’ (Gramsci 1975: 738) [‘between the dialect and the national-literary language something changes: precisely the cultural, politicomoral-emotional environment5 (Gramsci 1985: 177)]. Basing his discussion on the formation of the German and French national languages, which relieved him of the necessity for excessive ideological genuflection, Zhirmunskii (1936: 15—16) defined ‘national languages' as the ‘late products of the convergent developments of dialects [...] [evolving] under definite historical conditions, after nations and national governments have been formed，. The fundamental difference between the national language and social dialects was now defined as one of social function:

The social dialects arising as a result of the class differentiation of society are in no way [the national language's] equals, and their interrelationship is not limited to mechanical co-existence: they are interconnected by complex interaction, by hierarchical subordinations and struggles evoked by the general direction of social evolution of the given epoch and country. In this interaction and struggle the national language acts as social norm which dominates all other social dialects [...]. The cultural hegemony of the ruling class in turn conditions its linguistic hegemony.

Here we see precisely the same convergence of dialect geography, historical linguistics and the Marxist political theory that we find in Gramsci's work. Like Gramsci, Zhirmunskii points out that alongside the written standard, the territorially varied social dialects spoken by subordinate social groups constitute unwritten languages whose functional use is limited to unofficial private situations. Here is precisely the same distinction as between Gramsci’s normative and spontaneous grammars, for the national language (normative grammar) is posited as ‘una “fase esemplare”’ (1975: 2343) [‘an “exemplary phase”’ (1985: 181)] of the language, ‘un atto di politica culturale-nazionale’ (1975: 2344) [‘an act of national-cultural politics’ (1985: 182)]. The difference is that Gramsci was largely spared the crippling effects of Stalinist orthodoxy and so was able better to think through the political lessons of the debate in the Soviet Union of the mid-1920s and continue to apply them to the specific context of Italy.

Acknowledgements

Research for this article, and for the translation published in the appendix to this volume, was supported by a small research grant from the British Academy.

Notes

1. For an overview of what we know of Gramsci’s time in Russia see Grigor’eva (1998).

2. On the passage from syndicalism to proletarian culture see Williams (1980). On the pedagogical dimension see Marot (1990a, 1990b).

3. Bogdanov wrote a huge amount, but his most important ideas about proletarian culture can be found in Bogdanov (1910, 1911). For a general view of Bogdanov’s ideas about proletarian culture see, inter alia, Dement’eva (1971), Scherrer (1989), Mally (1990： 3—16), Marot (1991) and Karpov (2009： 52—66). Both Sochor and Scherrer cite Bogdanov as using the term ‘general cultural hegemony’，but I have been unable to verify this quotation.

4.  See, especially, Lunacharskii (1908, 1911). It is worth noting that in a 1931 letter to his mother from prison Gramsci makes the following comment: ‘If you think about it seriously, all questions about the soul and immortality of the soul and paradise and hell are at bottom only a way of seeing this very simple fact： that every action of ours is passed on to others according to its value, of good or evil, it passes from father to son, from one generation to the next, in a perpetual movement' (Gramsci 1994, Vol. 2, p. 40). The notion of the proletariat making up a ‘collective body’ later runs throughout Gor’kii’s speech to the 1934 Soviet Writers’ Congress at which the principles of Socialist Realism were encoded (Gorky 1977 [1934]). On the roots of the conception see Beiser (2003： 43-55) and Dietzgen (1906 [1870-75]).

5. It appears Gramsci did have some direct acquaintance with Bogdanov’s work since he and his wife began to translate one of Bogdanov’s novels, most likely Red Star, into Italian, and three further pieces of Bogdanov’s work were published in the daily Ordine Nuovo [The New Order] (Gramsci 2010: 415-20). I am indebted to Alessandro Carlucci for this information. Gramsci (1971： 323) and Bogdanov (1923：19) both argue that all people are spontaneous philosophers. There is also is a striking similarity between Gramsci’s rejection of epistemological realism on the grounds that it is rooted in religious belief (1971： 44048), and that developed by Bogdanov (1910), but this falls outside the current article and will be developed separately. Gramsci was, however, much more familiar with the ideas of Lunacharskii, whose work Gramsci knew well, and published several of Lunacharskii’s writings in his periodicals (Il Grido del Popolo, L'Ordine Nuovo), on which see Béghin (2007： 223-29).

6. Lenin’s scattered comments on language were collected and published more than once after his death (in English see Lenin 1983).

7. Noiré’s work makes an appearance in much of Bogdanov’s work, but see especially the first part of Bogdanov (1910). It should be noted that Noiré’s work was highly respected both by Georgii Plekhanov and Nikolai Marr, both of whom exerted a considerable influence on Russian linguistics in the early Soviet period.

8. For an overview see Gorham (2003).

9. Gramsci mentions the rabkor movement in letters he wrote to his wife from Vienna (see Gramsci 1992: 144, 321).

10.  In an article on orthographic reforms in the USSR, the Marxist linguist Evgenyi Polivanov argued that the specific direction the reforms take depends mainly on ‘which class holds political power and the hegemony of book culture in a given country1 (1968 [1937]： 257).

11.  See, inter alia, Hirsch (2005); Martin (2001); Khalid (1998).

12. The articles were published as a separate volume as Ivanov and Iakubinskii (1932); for an overview see Brandist and Lähteenmaki (2010) and for a discussion of the place of the articles in the rise of a theory of the national language see Desnitskaia (1974).

Works cited

Archival

Russian State Archive of Socio-Political History (RGASPI), Moscow, fond 513： Italianskaia kommunisticheskaiapartiia (in text reference to fond/opis/delo/list).

Published

Alpatov, V.M. (2000) ‘What is Marxism in Linguistics?’，in Materializing Bakhtin: the Bakhtin

Circle and Social Theory, ed. C. Brandist and G. Tihanov (Houndmills: Macmillan),173—93. Anderson, P. (1976) (The Antinomies of Antonio Gramsci’, New Left Review 100, 5—80. Anon. (1920) (Mezhdunarodnoe Biuro Proletkul’ta’，Proletarskaia kul'tura 17—19, 5.

Béghin, L. (2007) Da Gobetti a Ginzburg. Diffusione e ricezione della cultura russa nella Torino del primo dopoguerra (Rome: Institut historique belge).

Beiser, F. (2003) The Romantic Imperative: The Concept of Early German Romanticism (Cambridge, Massachusetts: Harvard University Press).

Biggart, J. (1987) ‘Bukharin and the Origins of the “Proletarian Culture” Debate’，Soviet Studies 39.2, 229-46.

Biggart, J. (1992) (Bukharin’s Theory of Cultural Revolution', in The Ideas of Nikolai Bukharin ed. A. Kemp-Welch (Oxford: Clarendon Press), 131-58.

Biggart, J. (2001) (Bogdanov i "Kul’tintern”’，Vestnik mezhdunarodnogo instituta A. Bogdanova,

7. Online at http://www.bogdinst.ru/vestnik/v07.htm (accessed 13 March 2011).

Bogdanov, A.A. (1910) Padenie velikogo fetishizma (Moscow: Dorovatovskii i Charushnikov).

Bogdanov, A.A. (1911) Kul'turnye zadachi nashego vremeni (Moscow: Dorovatovskii i

Charushnikov).

Bogdanov, A.A. (1923) Filosofila zhivogo opyta (Moscow: Kniga).

Bogdanov, A.A. (1995 [1909]) (Platforma gruppy “Vpered”，“Sovremennoe polozhenie i zadachi partii” Dekabr’1909g.’，in A.A. Bogdanov i gruppa RSDRP "Vpered” 1908—1914, ed. G.A. Bordiugov (Moscow: Airo-XX), 36—76.

Boothman, D. (2008) (The Sources for Gramsci’s Concept of Hegemony’, Rethinking Marxism, 20.2, 201—15.

Brandist, C. (2003) (The Origins of Soviet Sociolinguistics’，Journal of Sociolinguistics 7.2, 213—31.

Brandist, C. (2007) (Konstantin Siunnerberg (Erberg) i issledovanie i prepodavanie zhivogo slova i publichnoi rechi v Petrograde-Leningrade. 1918—1932gg.’, in Ezhegodnik rukopisnogo otdelapushkinskogo doma na 2003—2004gody (St. Petersburg: Dmitrii Bulanin), 58—82.

Brandist, C. (2010) (Psychology, linguistics and the rise of applied social science in the USSR:

Isaak Shpil’rein’s Language of the Red Army Soldier, in Brandist and Chown 2010, 151—67.

Brandist, C. and K. Chown (eds) (2010) Politics and the Theory of Language in the USSR 1917—1938 (London: Anthem Press).

Brandist, C. and M. Lähteenmäki (2010) (Early Soviet Linguistics and Mikhail Bakhtin’s Essays on the Novel of the 1930s’，in Brandist and Chown 2010, 69—88.

Bukharin, N.I. (1924) O rabkore (Moscow: Pravda).

Bukharin, N.I. (1993 [1925]) (Proletariat i voprosy khudozhestvennoi politiki’, in Revoliutsiia

i kul'tura： Stat'i i vystupleniia 1923—1936godov (Moscow: Fond imeni N.I. Bukharina), 67—77.

Carlucci, A. (2009) Antonio Gramsci's Interest in Language: Revisiting Its Origins and Significance (PhD Dissertation, Royal Holloway, University of London).

Carlucci, A. and C. Balistreri (2011) (I primi mesi di Gramsci in Russia. Giugno-agosto 1922’, Belfagor 66.6, 645—58.

Chuzhak, N. (1923) (Partiia i iskusskvo (K stat’e tov. Trotskogo v No. 209 "Pravdy”)’，Gorn 9, 81—88.

Clibbon, J. (1993) The Soviet Press and Grass Roots Organization: The Rabkor Movement, NEP to the First Five Year Plan (PhD Dissertation, University of Toronto).

Dement’eva, N.V. (1971) ‘O nekotorykh ocobennostiakh estetiki i gnoseologii Proletkul’ta (Bogdanovskaia kontseptsiia “kollektivnogo opyta”)，Pisateli zhizn'4, 124—37.

Desnitskaia, A.V. (1974) ‘Kak sozdalas’ teoriia natsional’nogo iazyka (iz istorii sovetskogo iazykoznaniia’，in Sovremennye prob le my literaturo veden iia i iazykoznaniia, ed. N.F. Belchikova (Moscow: Nauka), 398—415.

Deutcher, I. (1987) The Prophet Unarmed: Trotsky 1921—1929 (Oxford: Oxford University Press).

Dietzgen, J. (1906 [1870—75]) ‘The Religion of Social Democracy', in Philosophical Essays (Chicago: Charles H. Kerr), 90—154.

Egerman, E.Ia. (1954) ‘Voprosy lingvistiki v teoreticheskikh trudakh A. Gramshi', Voprosy iazykoznaniia 5, 114—25.

Ermolaev, H. (1963) Soviet Literary Theories 1917—1934: The Genesis of Socialist Realism (Berkeley: University of California Press).

Gofman, V. (1932) Slovo oratora： ritorika i politika (Leningrad: Izdatel'stvo pisatelei v Leningrade).

Gorham, M. (2003) Speaking in Soviet Tongues: Language Culture and the Politics of Voice in Revolutionary Russia (DeKalb, Illinois: Northern Illinois University Press).

Gorky, M. (1977 [1934]) ‘Soviet Literature', in Soviet Writers' Congress 1934: The Debate on Socialist Realism and Modernism, Gorky et al. (London: Lawrence and Wishart), 27—69.

Gramsci, A. (1966) Socialismo e fascismo. L'Ordine Nuovo 1921—1922 (Turin: Einaudi).

Gramsci, A. (1971) Selections from the Prison Notebooks (London: Lawrence and Wishart)

Gramsci, A. (1975) Quaderni del carcere, ed. V. Gerratana (Turin: Einaudi).

Gramsci, A. (1985) Selections from the Cultural Writings (London: Lawrence and Wishart).

Gramsci, A. (1987) L'Ordine Nuovo 1919—1920, ed. V. Gerratana and A.A. Santucci, (Turin: Einaudi).

Gramsci, A. (1992), Lettere 1908—1926, ed. A.A. Santucci (Turin: Einaudi).

Gramsci, A. (1994) Letters From Prison, ed. Frank Rosengarten, 2 volumes (New York: Columbia University Press).

Gramsci, A. (2010) Epistolario, Volume 1 : gennaio 1906—dicembre 1922, ed. D. Bidussa, F. Giasi, G. Luzzatto Voghera and M.L. Righi (Rome: Istituto della Enciclopedia Italiana).

Gramsci, A. et al. (1922) ‘Institut Proletkul’ta’, Gorn 1.6, 121—27.

Grigor'eva, I.V. (1998) ‘Rossiiskie stranitsy biografii Antonio Gramshi (1922—1926) po dokumentam arkhiva kominterna', Rossiia i Italiia 3, 96—123.

Hirsch, F. (2005) Empire of Nations: Ethnographic Knowledge and the Making of the Soviet Union (Ithaca: Cornell University Press).

Iakubinskii, L.P. (1931) (Klassovyi sostav sovremennogo russkogo iazyka: iazyk proletariat. Stat'ia piataia', Literaturnaia ucheba 7, 22—33.

Ivanov A. and L.P. Iakubinskii (1932), Ocherki po iazyku (Leningrad and Moscow: Khudozhesvennaia literatura).

Ives, P. (2003) Gramsci s Politics of Language: Engaging the Bakhtin Circle and the Frankfurt School (Toronto: University of Toronto Press).

Ives, P. (2004) Language and Hegemony in Gramsci (London: Pluto Press).

Karpov, A.V. (2009) Russkii Proletkul't: ideologiia, estetika, praktika (St. Petersburg: SPbGUP).

Khalid, A. (1998) The Politics of Muslim Cultural Reform: Jadidism in Central Asia (Berkeley: University of California Press).

Lenin (1983) Lenin on Language (Moscow: Raduga).

Levchenko, M. (2007) Industrial'naia svirel': Poeziiaproletkul'ta 1917—1921gg. (St. Petersburg: PBGUTD).

Lo Piparo, F. (1979) Lingua, intellettuali, egemonia in Gramsci (Rome and Bari: Laterza).

Lunacharskii, A.V. (1908 and 1911) Religiia i sotsializm, 2 volumes (St. Petersburg: Shipovnik).

Lussana, F. (2007) In Russia prima del Gulag. Emigrati italiani a scuola di comuniSmo (Rome: Carocci).

Mally, L. (1990) Culture of the Future: The Proletkult Movement in Revolutionary Russia (Berkeley: University of California Press).

Marot, J. (1990a) ‘Alexander Bogdanov, Vpered, and the Role of the Intellectual in the Workers' Movement', Russian Review 49.3, 241—64.

Marot, J. (1990b) ‘The Bogdanov Issue: A Response to My Critics', Russian Review 49.4, 457-65.

Marot, J. (1991) ‘Politics and Philosophy in Russian Social Democracy: Alexander Bogdanov and the Sociotheoretical Foundations of Vpered, Canadian Slavonic Papers 33.3-4, 26384.

Martin, T. (2001) The Affirmative Action Empire: Nations and Nationalism in the Soviet Union, 1923—1939 (Ithaca: Cornell University Press).

McNally, M. (2009) ‘Gramsci and Bukharin: Neglected Legacies' online at www.psa.ac.uk/ journals/pdf/5/2009/McNally.pdf (accessed 14 March 2011).

McNally, M. (2011) ‘Revisiting the Gramsci-Bukharin relationship: neglected symmetries', History of European Ideas 37.3, 365—75.

Noiré, L. (1885) Logos: Ursprung und Wesen der Begriffe (Leipzig: Engelmann).

Pecchioli, R. (ed.) (1985) Da Gramsci a Berlinguer. La via italiana al socialismo attraverso i congressi del Partito comunista italiano I, 1921—1943 (Milan and Venice: Edizioni del Calendario).

Polivanov E.D. (1968 [1937]) ‘O trekh printsipakh postroeniia orfografiia', in Izbrannye raboty: stat'ypo obshchemu iazykoznanniu (Moscow: Nauka), 254—62.

Polivanov E.D. (1974 [1927]) ‘Revolution and the Literary Languages of the USSR', in Selected Works: Articles on General Linguistics (The Hague: Mouton), 179—94.

Polivanov E.D. (1974 [1928]) ‘On the Phonetic Features of the Dialects of Social Groups and, in Particular, of Standard Russian', in Selected Works: Articles on General Linguistics (The Hague: Mouton), 195-210.

Polivanov E.D. (1974 [1931]) ‘Where Do the Reasons for Language Evolution Lie?', in Selected Works: Articles on General Linguistics (The Hague: Mouton), 81—92.

Polivanov E.D. (2003 [1931]) ‘Gde lezhat prichiny iazykovoi evoliutsii?', in Za Marksistskoe iazykoznanie (Smolensk: SGPU), 36—53.

RKP(b) (1968 [1923]) Dvenatsatyi s'ezd RKP(b) 17—25 aprelia 1923 goda: steno^fraficheskii otchet (Moscow).

RKP(b) (1925) ‘On The Policy Of The Party In The Sphere Of Artistic Literature (1 July 1925)'. Online at http://www.sovlit.com/decreejuly1925/ (accessed 10 April 2011).

Scherrer, J. (1989) ‘The Cultural Hegemony of the Proletariat: The Origins of Bogdanov's Vision of Proletarian Culture', Studies in History 5, 195—210.

Scherrer, J. (1999) ‘The Relationship Between the Intelligentsia and Workers: The Case of the Party Schools in Capri and Bologna', in Workers and the Intelligentsia in Late Imperial Russia: Realities, Representations, Reflections, ed. Reginald E. Zelnik (Berkeley: University of California Press), 172—85.

Smith, J. (1999) The Bolsheviks and the National Question, 1917—1923 (Houndmills: Macmillan).

Smith M. (1998) Language and Power in the Formation of the USSR 1917—1953 (Berlin: Mouton de Gruyter).

Sochor, Z.A. (1981) ‘Was Bogdanov Russia's answer to Gramsci?', Studies in East European Thought 22.1, 59—81.

Thomas, P. (2009) The Gramscian Moment (Leiden and Boston: Brill).

Tolz, V. (2011) Russia s Own Orient: the Politics of Identity and Oriental Studies in the Late Imperial and Early Soviet Periods (Oxford: Oxford University Press).

Trotskii, L. (1973 [1924]) ‘The cultural role of the worker correspondent', in Problems of Every

Day Life and Other Writings on Culture and Science (New York: Monad Press), 162—83.

Trotskii, L. (1991 [1923]) Literature and Revoution (London: Redwords).

Williams, R. (1980) (Collective Immortality: The Syndicalist Origins of Proletarian Culture, 1905-1910’，Slavic Review 39.3, 389-402.

VAPP (1925) (Ideologicheskii front i literatura', Online at http://www.teencity.ru/projects/ myaeots/bibl_11/manifest/proletcult/proletcult3.htm (accessed 10 April 2011).

Vilkova, V. (1996) The Struggle for Power: Russia in 1923 (New York: Prometheus Books).

Zapiski (1919) Zapiski instituta zhivogo slova 1.

Zhirmunskii, V.M. (1936) Natsional'nyi iazyk i sotsial'nye dialekty (Leningrad: Khudozhestvennaia literatura).

1

Antonio Gramsci, Selections from the Prison Notebooks, Q. Hoare and G. Nowell Smith, eds, London 1971, p. 41. See also Selections from Cultural Writings, Forgacs and Nowell-Smith, eds, London 1985, pp. 165—7.

2

B. Croce, Aesthetic as Science of Expression and General Linguistic, London 1953, p. 14.

3

Ibid., p. 13.

4

Ibid., p. 151.

5

Gramsci, Selections from the Cultural Writings, p. 174.

6

Michel Acouturier, ‘Theatricality as a Category in Twentieth-Century Russian Culture1, in Kleberg and Nilsson, eds Theater and Literature in Russia 1900—1930, Stockholm 1984, p- 17

7

On this see K. Hirschkop and D. Shepherd, Bakhtin and Cultural Theory, Manchester 1989, pp. 6—8- Perhaps the clearest example of this by a member of the Bakhtin school is Matvey Kagan's 1923 essay ‘Judaism and the Crisis of Culture' in Minuvshee 6, Moscow 1992.

8

Bakhtin and Cultural Theory, p. 8.

9

P.N. Medvedev, The Formal Method in Literary Scholarship, Baltimore 1978, pp. 59—61.

10

This was how Bakhtin's older brother defined the demand some years later. Nicholas Bachtin, Lectures and Essays, Birmingham 1963, p. 26.

11

Ibid., pp. 26—7.

12

On this see L.E. Blyakher, ‘Through the Ideas of Russian Humboldtism', in I. Malchenkova, ed., M.M. Bakhtin: Estetichakoye naslediye i sovremennost (M.M. Bakhtin: Aesthetic Heritage and Modernity), Saransk 1992, vol. 2.

13

V.N. Voloshinov, Marxism and the Philosophy of Language, Cambridge, Mass. 1973, p. xiv.

14

Quoted in T. Nemeth, Gramsci's Philosophy, Brighton 1980, pp. 159, 48.

15

Selections from the Cultural Writings, p. 177.

16

M.M. Bakhtin, “Toward the Aesthetics of the Word", in Dispositio vol. 4, no. 11—12, p- 312・

17

K. Vossler, The Spirit of Language in Civilization, London 1932, p. 13.

18

Ibid.

19

Ibid., p. 182.

20

M.M. Bakhtin, Problems of Dostoyevsky's Poetics, Manchester 1984, p. xxxi.

21

Vossler, The Spirit of Language, pp. 172—6.

22

Selections from the Cultural Writings, p. 178.

23

M.M. Bakhtin, The Dialogic Imagination, Austin 1981, p. 270.

24

Selections from the Cultural Writings, p. 181.

25

Ibid., pp. 189, 180, 189.

26

Ibid., p. 172.

27

Ibid., pp. 182, 184.

28

An interesting and contemporary literary exploration of this parallel is Andrei Platonov's ‘Yepifanskie shluzy' (‘The Epifan Locks') which can be found in English in Russian Literature Triquarterly, 8, 1974.

29

Nicholas Bachtin, Lectures and Essays, p. 97.

30

Boris Kagarlitsky, The Thinking Reed, Verso, London 1989, p. 87.

31

M.M. Bakhtin, Rabelais and His World, Bloomington 1984, p. 96.

32

Selections from the Prison Notebooks, p. 252.

33

Hirschkop and Shepherd, Bakhtin and Cultural Theory, p. 8.

34

Rabelais and His World, p. 204.

35

Selections from the Prison Notebooks, p. 155.

36

Rabelais and His World, p. 204.

37

Selections from the Prison Notebooks, p. 155. Bakhtin's treatment of the novel as a 'legality' of languages is a development along the lines of semantics, from the aesthetic of Hermann Cohen, who proposed a ’juridical' model of Greek tragedy, and Ivanov's notion of Dostoyevsky's novel as a (novel-tragedy'. A similar approach is taken by another member of Bakhtin's group Lev Pumpiansky in Dostoyevsky i antichnost (Dostoyevsky and Antiquity) Petrograd 1922, while in a preface to Turgenev's Nakanunye (On the Eve) he notes that (judgement [sud] is inseparable from literature': Turgenev, Sochineniye (Collected Works), vol. 6, Moscow 1929, p. 9. Cohen's conception is outlined in Voloshinov's 1926 essay (Discourse in Life and Discourse in Poetry', in Shukman, ed., Bakhtin School Papers, Essex 1983, p. 25.

38

The Dialogic Imagination, p. 342.

39

Bachtin, Lectures and Essays, pp. 97—8.

40

Ibid., p. 345.

41

Selections from the Prison Notebooks, pp. 327, 333.

42

Rabelais and His World, p. 345.

43

Selections from the Prison Notebooks, p. 335. As the editors point out, ‘totalitarian1 here is in the sense of ‘simultaneously “unified" and “all absorbing" 1 rather than the modern sense.

44

Ibid., pp. 442, 445.

45

The Spirit of Language, p. 120.

46

Ibid., p. 135.

47

Ibid., p. 191.

48

Selections from the Prison Notebooks, p. 363.

49

Hirschkop, (The Author, the Novel and the Everyday', Times Higher Education Supplement, 1 May 1992, p. 27.

50

The Dialogic Imagination, p. 400.

51

Rabelais and His World, p. 69.

52

Selections from the Prison Notebooks, p. 341.

53

The Dialogic Imagination, p. 409.

54

Selections from the Prison Notebooks, p. 341.

55

Lectures and Essays, p. 37.

56

The Dialogic Imagination, p. 288.

57

In certain cases, however, the Soviet novel does exactly that. The works of Bakhtin’s close friend Konstantin Vaginov and certain works by Daniil Kharms are examples of this.

58

See especially Ernesto Laclau and Chantal Mouffe, Hegemony and Socialist Strategy, Verso, London 1985.

59

Selections from the Prison Notebooks, p. 133.

60

Michael Dummett, Frege: Philosophy of Language, London 1973, p. 529. This point is made very well in Alex Callinicos, Marxism and Philosophy, Oxford 1985, pp. 147—53.

61

‘Realism Reconsidered: Bakhtin's Diologism and the “Will to Reference"', in Australian Journal of French Studies, vol. 23, no. 2, 1986, pp. 182—3.

62

Most of us refer to the classic, thematically organized and selected English edition of Prison Notebooks by Hoare and Smith (1971). Ruggeri prefers his own translation of the complete Italian edition (2007) in which the Notebooks appear in their original order. However, we all employ the standard notation of the Notebook number (Q) and then paragraph number (§) so readers can easily locate these passages in various anthologies or critical editions.

Glasius, Marlies. (2012) Gramsci for the Twenty-first Century: Dialectics and Translatability. International Studies Review, doi: 10.1111/misr.12011

© 2012 International Studies Association

63

According to an anonymous referee «the literary more than philosophical training of many of its [IPL] elder scholars made them more keen on (and expert of) linguistics than on logic and ontology / metaphysics, therefore rather peripheral to the analytic vs. continental debates». This is true, but while the reviewer seems to see such a specific character of iPL tradition like a limit or a defect, on the contrary such a 'peripheral' and untopical character is what gives to iPL its contemporary attractiveness. IPL is returning central in contemporary philosophical debate just because the analytic vs. continental debate is no longer viable (one has not to forget that both traditions are different forms of the same 'linguistic turn', nowadays a completely unfashionable 'turn'). For example, according to iPL one cannot study ontology separately from language, or metaphysics separately from politics. in the previous quotation there is another aspect that is worth commenting; it seems that according to the reviewer a “literary more than philosophical training” is not that a background good to become what a philosopher of language should be. in fact, such statement seems more a prejudice than a description of what actually is the case. Take the exemplar case of Eco Kant e l'ornitorinco (1997). Eco’s semiotic and literary background is elegantly and pertinently used to face the classical philosophy of language problem of 'reference'. As to this point, on the contrary a philosopher is akin to iPL tradition who does not rigidly separates philosophy from literature. More specifically, iPL tradition does not adheres to the modern prejudice in favor of logic and science in respect to literature and history.

64

However, Fabbrichesi (2012) seems quite sympathetic with many of IPL main tenets.

65

According to an anonymous reviewer the present reconstruction of IPL tradition «seems to omit deliberately and shrewdly that the so-called ‘anthropological’ and ‘bio political' stance at the beginning was tied up with a (no more fashionable) strong and active political commitment from a Marxist perspective». Such an historical statement is factually false. Contemporary philosophers who more or less directly participate to IPL, De Mauro, Lo Piparo, Cimatti and Agamben, for example, are never been Marxist philosophers or activists. A philosopher can be define Marxist if explicitly adheres to historical materialism and to the distinction between 'base' and 'superstructure'. IPL strong consideration for the socio-political aspect of language does not imply at all to adhere to such a doctrine; on the contrary, it is one of the main points of IPL that such a distinction does not apply to human form of life. There is an important IPL philosopher only, who can be defined Marxist, Paolo Virno. However, if one actually reads his own books on language (2003; 2005; 2010; 2013) it is apparent that the bibliographic references to Marx are few, and sometimes completely absent. In Italy a somewhat Marxist tradition in philosophy of language existed (cf. Rossi-Landi 1968; Ponzio 1970), however it had marginal contacts only with IPL tradition. A last note on the reviewer comment: that a philosophy is 'no more fashionable' is not that a sound argument against such a philosophy. Philosophy has to deal with truth, not with fashion.

66

An anonymous referee observed that «the relevance of the truth-quest is taken into consideration only to underline its insufficiency, while at the end of the article the notion of ‘use’ seems to be introduced as a proposed alternative leading idea, without adequate explanation or justification». This is one of the major characters of IPL tradition, in particular in respect of analytical philosophy. While in the latter tradition the question of truth/falsity is the question about human language, according to IPL the possibility to assert the way things are ‘in reality’ is just a function of language, nor the principal neither the most used. According to IPL language makes part of a form of life, therefore language is more an action than a representational medium (cf. RoRTY 1979). IPL does not share the widespread idea that philosophy is somewhat similar to science. The main consequence is that the exclusive privilege accorded to ‘truth’ by most contemporary philosophy is misleading. The vast majority of human phenomena - art, religion, literature, playing, poetry and son - have very few or nothing to do with truth or falsity; IPL tries to describes human life like it actually is, without any normative intention. As to the question of 'use', this is not an alternative to a truth-functional semantics. On the contrary, such a notion aims to stress how the value of a linguistic expression lies in the same linguistic act. The ‘value’ of a gesture lies in the way it does something; the same applies to language.

67

An anonymous referee observed that the present paper disregards the «balance between the care about what is different and the care about what is the same throughout languages». In respect to human language IPL assumes the very same attitude Darwin assumed in respect to the concept of species: «I look at the term species as one arbitrarily given, for the sake of convenience, to a set of individuals closely resembling each other, and that it does not essentially differ from the term variety, which is given to less distinct and more fluctuating forms. The term variety, again, in comparison with mere individual differences, is also applied arbitrarily, for convenience' sake» (Darwin 2009: 42). The IPL biological stance is neither centered on what make languages different between them, nor on the common core, it is presumed they share.

68

According to an anonymous referee «the interesting point against ‘mentalese’ or private language and against the connected disregard about the plurality of languages does not prevent [the present paper] from omitting the important distinctions between the psychological and logical sides of meaning». This is really a major point. The key question is: does it really exist such a distinction? Is there a logical side and a psychological one within human animal? Is human organism divided into mind and body? According to IPL such a distinction does not hold. In fact, such an internal separation of human organism into two parts is required more by a theoretical prejudice than an empirical need. Take the case the embodied explanations of linguistic behavior (cf. Borghi, Cimatti 2010; Liuzza et al. 2010; Pulvermüller 2013): such explanations do not need any more to presuppose the very existence of such an internal duality between logic and psychology. on the contrary, the very need to individuate a 'logical side of meaning' seems to be a consequence of an unnatural way to conceive human language experience. In fact, a theory that does not dispose of the notion of language as a socio-political entity, it is unable to explain how mutual comprehension is possible. IPL mainly focus on the interrelationships between human biology and human bodies; a natural-historical language like Italian is properly the place where such a relation takes place.

69

Take the example of Dante's De Vulgari Eloquentia or Gramsci's Quaderno 29 (cf. Note per una introduzione allo studio della grammatica, in Lo Piparo, F. (2004), Lingua, intellettuali ed egemonia in Gramsci, Laterza, Roma- Bari, Ist ed. 1979).

70

Cf. The Italian translation by Tullio De Mauro (1967).

71

An anonymous referee rightly observes that the 'entity' can appear the same to an external look only, for example to a Martian anthropologist. Different languages think differently to the world. Within a particular language what a sign means is inseparable from the peculiar way such a meaning is articulated. The referee also adds that according to Saussure linguistic signs «cannot stand for objects but only (if ever) for concepts». This is not properly the case, because according to Saussure each sign has a specific 'value' within the signs system of a language: that is, every sign is a 'move' inside the 'language game' (like in the famous chess example). Once again IpL stresses language as a form of action more than a representational medium.

72

According to an anonymous referee, Agamben and Esposito «are not philosophers of language». Such a statement is true if, and only f one accepts the extravagant idea (although widespread in Anglo-American philosophical tradition) that one can study language in isolation from the rest of all human social and political activities. on the contrary, the main theoretical point of IPL is exactly that such a separation is impossible and misleading; therefore, from IPL point of view they are philosophers of language just because they do not separate the analysis of language from the whole of human form of life. As to Agamben he explicitly asserts that «nei libri scritti e in quelli non scritti, io non ho voluto pensare ostinatamente che una sola cosa: che significa ‘vi è linguaggio', che significa ‘io parlo’ ?» [In written and not written books, I stubbornly wanted to think but one thing: "what does it mean "there is language”，what does it mean "I speak”？] (Agamben 2001: X).

73

An anonymous referee somewhat charges the present IPL reconstruction to adopt a «naive materialistic framework, revealed by the frequent use of the ‘body’ category instead of that one of ‘person’，‘subject’，‘man’ or ‘human agent’ etc.». It is not immediately apparent why to avoid such ontologically and psychologically shaking entities like 'person', 'subject' or 'human agent' should be naive. On the contrary, the strong IPL biological stance stresses that what is real and actual, within human language activity, is just the body presence. According to the same referee such an attention to the actual body «doesn’t seem to be thoroughly consistent» [...] «with the declared and appreciable will to avoid reductionnisms». I thank the anonymous reviewer for this observation, because it allows to be more explicit about such a point. IPL looks for reducing to a minimum the entities required to give account of human language. Following the Saussure theory of language, there are three levels of explanation: the biological level of the language faculty (faculté de langage); the socio-political level of the different spoken (signed) languages (langues); finally the body that actually uses a language (parole). No other entity is required.

74

Gramsci 1994, 20

75

Gramsci 1994, 20

76

Gramsci 1994, 20

77

Gramsci 1977, 52

78

Gramsci 1994, 21.

79

Gramsci 1971, 450

80

Gramsci, Q7§36 (This refers to Notebook (Quaderni) 7, section 36. Notebooks 1-8 are available in their entirety in English, and Notebooks 1-29 are available in an Italian critical edition. Much of the ‘Selections' are from the notebooks, but are not often well cross-referenced. In most peer-reviewed published writing on Gramsci, citations are given either exclusively with reference to the notebooks or as cross-references. For this conference paper, I have only included the citation that I used directly. Navigating the notebooks is a job unto itself!)

81

Ibid.

82

Ibid.

83

Gramsci 1971, 453, Q11§16

84

Gramsci 1985, 27

85

Gramsci 1985, 29.

86

Ibid., 30.

87

Ibid., 27.
